<?xml version='1.0' encoding='UTF-8'?>
<DOC><DOCNO> FR881017-0018 </DOCNO><DOCID>fr.10-17-88.f2.A1017</DOCID><TEXT><FTAG tagnum="4701"/><ITAG tagnum="90"><T4>Federal Register</T4> / Vol. 53, No. 200 / Monday, October 17, 1988/ Rules and Regulations <ITAG tagnum="52">ENVIRONMENTAL PROTECTION AGENCY </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">40 CFR Parts 122 and 403 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="41">[FRL 3295-4] </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">General Pretreatment Regulations for Existing and New Sources </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>AGENCY:</T2> Environmental Protection Agency.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>ACTION:</T2> Final rule. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUMMARY:</T2> The Environmental Protection Agency (EPA) today is finalizingrevisions to the General Pretreatment Regulations (40 CFR Part 403). Theserevisions will clarify existing regulations, respond to recommendationsof the Pretreatment Implementation Review Task Force (PIRT), and conformthe pretreatment regulations, where appropriate, to the National PollutantDischarge Elimination System (NPDES) permit regulations (40 CFR Part 122).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>DATES:</T2> This regulation shall become effective November 16, 1988.For purposes of judicial review, this regulation is issued at 1:00 p.m.eastern time on October 31, 1988.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>ADDRESSES:</T2> Comments of a technical nature should be addressedto: George Utting, Permits Division (EN-336), Environmental ProtectionAgency, 401 M Street SW., Washington, DC 20460. The record for this rulemaking,including all public comments received on the proposal, will be availablefor inspection and copying from 8:00 a.m. to 4:30 p.m. at the EPA PublicInformation Reference Unit, Room 2904, 401 M Street SW., Washington, DC.The EPA public information regulation (40 CFR Part 2) provides that a reasonablefee may be charged for copying.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>FOR FURTHER INFORMATION CONTACT:</T2> George Utting, Permits Division(EN-336), Environmental Protection Agency, 401 M Street SW., Washington,DC 20460, (202) 475-9534.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUPPLEMENTARY INFORMATION: </T2><ITAG tagnum="110"><C>1,L0,tp0,p0,8/9,g1,t1,i1,s100</C> <H1> </H1>I. Background II. Regulatory Change <ITAG tagnum="13">A. Pretreatment Standards and Requirements </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">1. Concentration and Mass Limits </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">2. Local Limits </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">3. Combined Wastestream Formula </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">4. Prohibition Against Dilution </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="13">B. POTW Pretreatment Program Requirements </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">1. Deadline for Program Submission_Newly Required POTW Programs </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">2. POTW Program Requirements_Remedies </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">3. Modification of Approved POTW Pretreatment Programs </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="13">C. POTW and State Pretreatment Program Approval </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">1. POTW Pretreatment Program and Removal Credit Application Submission_ApprovalAuthority Action </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">2. Approval of State Pretreatment Programs_State Regulations </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">3. Approval Procedures for POTW Pretreatment Programs and POTW Revisionsof Categorical Standards </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="13">D. Reporting and Compliance Monitoring </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">1. Baseline Monitoring Report_Deadline for New Sources </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">2. Measurement of Pollutants </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">3. Sampling Techniques </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">4. Annual POTW Reports </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">5. Signatory Requirements for Industrial User Reports </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">6. Reporting Requirements_Extension of Non-Categorical Discharges</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">7. Notification of Slug Loadings </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">8. 90-Day Compliance Report </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">9. Industrial User Compliance Reports_Monitoring Requirements </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">10. Self-Monitoring vs. POTW Monitoring </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">11. Notification by Industrial Users of Changed Discharge </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="13">E. Miscellaneous </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">1. New Source Criteria </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">2. New Source Compliance Deadline </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">3. Net/Gross Calculations </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">4. Upset Provision </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">5. Bypass Provision </ITAG>III. Judicial Review of Provisions Not Amended IV. Technical Revisions V. List of Subjects in 40 CFR 403 VI. EPA Documents Cited in This Notice VII. Executive Order 12291 VIII. Paperwork Reduction Act IX. Regulatory Flexibility Act</ITAG> <ITAG tagnum="84">I. Background </ITAG>On June 12, 1986, the Environmental Protection Agency (EPA) proposed revisionsto the General Pretreatment Regulations 40 CFR Part 403 (51 FR 21454).These proposed revisions were intended to achieve several goals. They madeseveral substantive changes to address shortcomings in the existing regulationsthat had been discovered since the January 28, 1981, pretreatment amendmentswere promulgated. The proposed revisions also responded to recommendationsof the Pretreatment Implementation Review Task Force (PIRT). PIRT was established,in accordance with the Federal Advisory Committee Act, by the Administratorof EPA on February 3, 1984, to provide the Agency with recommendationson improving implementation on the national pretreatment program. The TaskForce, which was made up of representatives of POTWs, States, industry,environmental groups and EPA Regional Offices, arrived at its recommendationsthrough consensus among the members after extensive discussion. The TaskForce's Final Report to the Administrator was issued on January 30, 1985.Recommendations were made in the areas of program simplification and clarification,enforcement, resources, and roles and relationships within the nationalpretreatment program. The recommendations generally focused on the needfor guidance, training programs, technical assistance, policy statementsand regulatory amendments in these areas. Finally, the proposed revisions also made several provisions of the pretreatmentregulations compatible, where appropriate, with their counterparts in theNPDES regulations (40 CFR Parts 122, 123, 124 and 125). Consistent regulationsare generally appropriate because in many cases the logic supporting theNPDES provision is equally applicable in the pretreatment context. The June 12 notice set a period of 60 days for the receipt of public comments.In response to requests to lengthen the comment period, the Agency extendedthe comment period, on August 21, 1986, until September 22, 1986 (51 FR29950). In all, the Agency received comments from 94 commenters. This group includedStates, POTWs, industries, trade associations, and environmental groups.The range of comments received was very broad and represented many divergentpoints of view. Significant comments are addressed below in the discussionof each issue. Additional discussion of comments is contained in the recordfor this rulemaking. There were twenty-eight separate issues in the proposed rule. Of these,twenty-six are included in today's final rule. One change omitted fromthe final rule is a revision of the fundamentally different factors (FDF)provision (40 CFR 403.13). EPA proposed to modify the pretreatment FDFrule to provide POTWs with the opportunity to object to a FDF request filedby an industrial user (or other interested party) discharging to its system.If the POTW objected, the request would automatically have been denied.However, because of statutory amendments in the Water Quality Act of 1987directly affecting FDFs, the Agency has decided not to finalize the changeas proposed in June 1986. Rather, this change will be considered in a laterrulemaking. The second issue omitted from the final action concerns the applicationof pretreatment standards and requirements to centralized waste treatment(CWT) facilities. The specific regulatory action proposed on June 12, 1986,was to codify the application of the combined wastestream formula to thecalculation of discharge limits for such a facility. In addition, EPA proposedto add specific regulatory language requiring that industrial contributorsprovide the CWT facility information on the nature of their processes (includingrelevant production and flow rates where necessary), volume of wastes,pollutant constituents, and any categorical pretreatment standards applicableto the contributor's processes. This information was deemed necessary forthe CWT facility to apply the combined wastestream formula, and thus determineeffluent limits. This issue was the most controversial aspect of the June 12, 1986, proposaland clearly received the most comments. Commenters generally focused ontwo points: The practical difficulties of applying the combined wastestreamformula to CWT facilities, and the legal issue regarding the extensionof pretreatment standards and requirements to CWTs. Rather than withholdfinalization of all of the other regulatory changes until the CWT issuecould be resolved, the Agency has decided to omit the regulatory changeaffecting CWT facilities from today's action and address CWTs and pretreatmentrequirements in a later rulemaking forum. In the future, additional changesto the General Pretreatment Regulations will be proposed to address thefindings and recommendations of the Congressionally-mandated Domestic SewageStudy (<T3>see</T3>, 51 FR 30166). Reconsideration of the CWT issue will be madepart of that effort. The twenty-six revisions being finalized today fall into five major areas:(1) Pretreatment standards and requirements, (2) POTW pretreatment programrequirements, (3) POTW and State pretreatment program approval procedures,(4) reporting and compliance monitoring, and (5) miscellaneous provisions.The overall impact of the revisions is to make the regulations easier tounderstand and to improve the implementation of the national pretreatmentprogram generally. The final revisions do not alter the overall existing regulatory framework,nor do they affect the ability of POTWs or industrial users to comply ina timely manner with existing or forthcoming pretreatment standards andother regulatory requirements. General prohibitive discharge standards,specified in andSection; 403.5 of the regulations, are unchanged. Similarly,categorical pretreatment standards are unaffected by these revisions. Asbefore, most major POTWs are still required to develop and implement localpretreatment programs, pursuant to andSection;andSection; 403.8 and 403.9,to ensure that non-domestic users of the municipal system comply with applicablestandards and pretreatment requirements. Approval of State requests forauthority to administer the pretreatment program will continue as before.The basic reporting requirements of the regulations (e.g., andSection; 403.12)remain intact. <ITAG tagnum="84">II. Regulatory Changes </ITAG>A. Pretreatment Standards and Requirements <ITAG tagnum="81">1. Concentration and Mass Limits [40 CFR 403.6(c)] </ITAG>a. <T3>Existing rule. </T3>National categorical pretreatment standards establishlimits on pollutants discharged to POTWs by certain industries. In somecases, the categorical standards set limitations in terms of pollutantconcentration. Other standards establish limitations in terms of both concentrationand pollutant mass, while, in certain categorical standards, EPA has setonly production-based mass limitations. The purpose of such limitationsis generally to reflect the use of flow reduction as part of the technologicalmodel for establishing the standard. Production-based limitations, which are established on the basis of production(i.e., x pounds of pollutant per unit of production), are administrativelymore difficult for the Control Authority to implement than concentrationlimitations. To test for compliance with a concentration-based standard,a Control Authority need only take a wastewater sample, measure the concentrationof the regulated pollutant(s), and compare this result to the standard.For the production-based standards, however, one must also measure theflow of the regulated wastestream to translate the concentration measurementinto a pollutant mass and determine the discharger's production rate atthe time of sampling. The most difficult step in determining whether anindustrial user (``user'', ``IU'') is in compliance with a production-basedstandard, according to PIRT, is determining the applicable production rate.This rate will vary over time, and in some industries will even fluctuatedaily. For direct dischargers, the NPDES regulations simplify the implementationof production-based mass effluent limitations guidelines by requiring thatthe permit limits be based upon a reasonable measure of the actual production.Generally, this should be a long-term average of the facility's production.The permit (or a fact sheet describing the basis for the permit) must specifythe production level that was used to derive the permit limit. This processestablishes a single mass limit that the permittee must meet, even thoughproduction and flows may vary over time. (However, if production and flowschange significantly, the permittee must report these changes and the permittingauthority may modify the permit accordingly. <T3>See, </T3>40 CFR 122.45(b) and 122.62(a)(1).) The current pretreatment regulations contain no specific provisions relatingto translation of production-based limitations into mass or concentrationlimits. Thus, an industrial user's compliance is determined based uponthe categorical standard itself since users must at all times meet thestandard. To determine compliance with production-based standards, theproduction and flow at the time of compliance evaluation must also be determined(because any monitoring results would be expressed in terms of concentration).In its final report, PIRT stated that POTWs would like to translate production-basedcategorical pretreatment standards into enforceable mass limits. Many POTWswould also like to convert these mass limits into equivalent concentrationlimits. As noted above, such conversions simplify compliance evaluation.However, PIRT indicated that POTWs are unsure whether this is allowed underthe pretreatment regulations, and, to the extent it is allowed, POTWs areunsure of the methodology to be used and the legal status of the equivalentlimits. As explained in EPA's ``Guidance Manual for the Use of Production-BasedPretreatment Standards and the Combined Wastestream Formula'' (1985), theexisting regulations allow Control Authorities to calculate equivalentconcentration (or mass) limits as a tool for determining compliance withapplicable categorical standards. However, an industrial user's compliancewith such equivalent limits does not relieve the user of the legal requirementto be in compliance with the production-based standard itself. Thus, theequivalent mass and concentration limits do not shield the industrial userfrom direct EPA or State enforcement of the production-based standard.Obviously, this undercuts the benefits of the equivalent limits. b. <T3>Proposed change. </T3>Based on PIRT's recommendation, EPA proposedto revise the pretreatment regulations to change the legal status of equivalentconcentration or mass limits calculated by Control Authorities from production-basedcategorical standards. The proposal added a new paragraph to andSection;403.6(c)stating that these equivalent limits, when properly calculated using proceduresincluded in the proposal, would be deemed pretreatment standards for thepurposes of section 307(d) of the Clean Water Act (CWA, The Act) and wouldbe enforceable as such. In addition, the proposal specifically stated thatindustrial users would be required to comply with the equivalent limits,when established, in lieu of the promulgated categorical standards fromwhich these limits were derived. As a result, industrial users that arein compliance with equivalent concentration or mass limits calculated inaccordance with the procedures specified in the proposal would not be subjectto direct EPA enforcement actions based on the production-based standarditself. Rather, the equivalent limits would be federally enforceable. Theproposed rule would support the efforts of POTWs to establish such limitsas part of their approved pretreatment programs. As part of the proposal, EPA also set forth in the regulations the proceduresto be used by Control Authorities to calculate equivalent concentrationand mass limits for production-based categorical standards. To converta production-based standard to a mass limitation, the limit in the standardis multiplied by an appropriate production rate. Consistent with 40 CFR122.45(b)(2) of the NPDES regulations, this production rate is based notupon the designed production capacity but rather upon a reasonable measureof the facility's actual long-term average daily production (e.g., thedaily average during a representative year). This is to ensure that facilitiesoperating below full capacity are treating their wastewater to the extentrequired by the CWA's technology-based pretreatment requirements, ratherthan reducing their level of treatment due to unused production capacity.Such an approach also ensures equity among facilities in the same industry,regardless of their design capacity. To arrive at a concentration limitation, this mass limitation is furtherdivided by the industrial user's average daily flow rate of process wastewaterregulated under the standard. Like the production rate, this flow ratemust be based on a reasonable measure of the actual long-term average dailyflow of the regulated process wastewater. The Agency proposed that thesame production and flow figures should be used for calculating both themaximum daily and maximum monthly average (or 4-day average) limitations.Examples of these calculations appeared in the proposal. The proposal also required the industrial user to immediately notify theControl Authority if either the long-term production or flow rate changessubstantially. Periodic fluctuations should not be reported under thisrequirement; these variations are factored into the development of thecategorical standard. However, significant additions to or reductions inthe production level that will represent the facility's production overthe long-term must be reported. The Control Authority will then adjustthe equivalent mass and concentration limits to reflect the changes.EPA also proposed to revise the periodic compliance report in andSection;403.12(e) to require that, for industrial users subject to production-basedcategorical pretreatment standards, the compliance reports must includethe user's actual average production rate for the reporting period. Thisis to ensure that the Control Authority has up-to-date production information.c. <T3>Response to comments. </T3>Seven of the twenty-eight commenters onthis provision gave unqualified support for the proposed revision. Allseven were Control Authorities who commented that the revision was longoverdue, it would help them implement their pretreatment programs and itwould ease the burden of sampling by the POTW because an enforceable concentrationlimit could be employed without the need for data on the production andflow rates of the industrial user during the sampling period. Only oneindustrial user commented that this change should not be made and thatcontinued reliance on design capacity should be required. The commenterstated that a facility operating below design capacity when the controlmechanism limits mass discharge should not be penalized later when it increasesproduction. This commenter stated that reliance on industrial user notificationof an increased production rate along with a request for modification ofthe pretreatment permit, contract or other control mechanism could notbe assured. This commenter also stated that industrial users will not dilutewastestreams in order to comply with pretreatment standards because ofthe prohibition against dilution.The Agency does not agree with this commenter. Modification of the controlmechanism can be accomplished in sufficient time to avoid a hardship onthe industrial user. Industrial users generally have sufficient advancedknowledge of significant changes in production levels to request a permitmodification, for example, before the fact. Changed capacity generallyshould not significantly alter compliance with properly developed equivalentlimits because water use will proportionally change as production rateschange. Furthermore, as stated in the preamble (51 FR 21454, at 21457):<ITAG tagnum="21">Consistent with 40 CFR 122.45(b)(2) of the NPDES regulations, thisproduction rate is based not upon the designed production capacity butrather upon a reasonable measure of the facility's actual long-term averagedaily production (e.g., the daily average during a representative year).This is to ensure that facilities operating below the full capacity aretreating their wastewater to the extent required by the CWA's technologyrequirements, rather than reducing their level of treatment due to unusedproduction capacity. Such an approach also ensures equity among facilitiesin the same industry, regardless of their design capacity.</ITAG>The remaining 20 commenters all agreed with the intent of the proposedchange, but suggested some minor revisions to the proposal. One commentsubmitted by this group suggested that the Agency define the terms ``significantchange in production rate or flow rate,'' ``immediate notification of significantchange,'' and ``representative year.'' One commenter suggested that ``significantchange in production rate and flow rate'' be defined as a change on theorder of plus or minus two standard deviations from the quarterly or monthlymean production rate. Another commenter suggested a 10 percent change,and two others suggested a 20 percent change from the long term averagerate.The Agency agrees that a definition of ``significant change'' is needed,and is relying on the definition provided in the ``Guidance Manual forthe Use of Production-Based Pretreatment Standards and the Combined WasteStream Formula'' (1985). That document provides that ``as a general rule,the average rate is considered to have changed significantly if the changeis greater than 20 percent.'' For the purpose of today's rule, any increaseor decrease in production (or flow) rates will generally be deemed significantif the change is equal to or greater than 20 percent of the long term averageproduction (or flow) rate at the facility.In order to allow some flexibility for POTWs, however, the Agency is notadding this definition of ``significant change'' to the General PretreatmentRegulations. A POTW may choose to use a different relative change in theproduction or flow rate as the threshold for notification. Because no twoPOTWs are exactly alike, an absolute relative change should not be placedin these regulations.One commenter requested that EPA define the term ``immediate notification''of a significant change. The Agency agrees that a definition is neededand, in the interest of consistency between the NPDES and pretreatmentregulations, is relying on the NPDES definition for immediate notificationof change in production rate found at 40 CFR 122.45(b)(2)(ii)(B)(1) fortoday's regulation. In response to this commenter's suggestion, EPA isadding the following definition to andSection; 403.6(c): ``Any industrialuser operating under a control mechanism incorporating equivalent massor concentration limits calculated from a production based standard shallnotify the Control Authority within two (2) business days after the userhas a reasonable basis to know that the production level will significantlychange within the next calendar month. Any user not notifying the ControlAuthority of such anticipated change will be required to meet the massor concentration limits in its control mechanism that were based on theoriginal estimate of the long term average production rate.''Industrial users often plan long term production quotas or rates at thefacility and can easily notify their Control Authority when these changesare significant. This would include long-term (greater than four consecutiveworkweeks) seasonal shutdowns or production slowdowns, or increased productionto meet seasonal demands. However, the change in production or flow ratemust be greater than 20% of the long term average rate before the industrialuser must notify the Control Authority.Finally, six of these commenters requested that EPA define the term ``representativeyear.'' Several suggested that the Agency should adopt the language inApplication Form 2-C for NPDES direct dischargers that allows the use ofproduction information from a one month period, ``such as production forthe highest month during the last twelve months, or the monthly averageproduction for the highest year of the last five years, or some other reasonablemeasure of actual operation.'' Four of the commenters suggested that EPAshould include the NPDES regulatory language in a pretreatment definitionof representative year. Section 122.45(a)(2)(i) provides that, ``The timeperiod of the measure of production shall correspond to the time periodof the calculated permit limitations; for example, monthly production shallbe used to calculate average monthly discharge limitations.''The Agency agrees with these commenters that a definition of ``representativeyear'' is needed and is relying on the description contained in the ``GuidanceManual for Production-Based Pretreatment Standards and the Combined WasteStream Formula'' (1985). A representative year would be the highest yearof the last five years excluding years in which production was extraordinarilyhigh or after which production lines were discontinued. Another reasonableestimate would be the average annual production rate over the last fiveyears, excluding any extremely high production year or years after whichproduction lines were discontinued. An industrial user could use the highproduction years if they are the majority of the last five years (e.g.,three of the last five), but when only one or two years are high productionyears then they should not be included in the average production rate.Furthermore, if the industrial user reasonably expects that productionwill shortly return to the higher rate, then it is justified in using thehigher rate in the calculation of the average rate. An example would bewhere an industrial user has been modernizing its facility and has sequentiallyshut-down production lines temporarily.This method of estimating the average production and flow rates is morereasonable because of the way pretreatment standards are developed. EPAselects several individual industrial users from different areas of theUnited States to monitor and sample within the category being developed.When most standards are developed, a long term average production rateis established and the relationship between production rate and flow isdetermined for each user studied. Variability factors are developed usingthe effluent concentrations or mass loading data obtained during the samplingprogram at the facilities. This variability analysis produces a determinationof the achievable maximum daily or monthly average concentration or mass.The long-term average production rate to be used in developing equivalentlimits should thus take into account the normal range of variation in production.The Agency does not agree that the suggested language from the NPDES ApplicationsForm 2-C should be included in the definition of representative year. Thislanguage was removed from the NPDES regulation [40 CFR 122.45(b)(2)] bythe final regulation package dated September 26, 1984 (49 FR 37998, at38054). (<T3>See</T3>, 49 FR 38029 for a discussion of the change, and 49 FR 38054-76for the revised form 2-C. The new forms package was published in February1985 as EPA Form 3510-2C. Previous editions are obsolete.) Therefore, thelanguage will not be added to these pretreatment regulations. The Agencyagrees, however, that the language contained in andSection; 122.45(a)(2)(i)should be incorporated into the equivalent limit setting process for pretreatmentcontrol mechanisms. This language merely requires that the average productionin a representative year be adjusted to reflect the limitation time period.For example, if the categorical standard contains a monthly average limitation,then the production rate for a representative year would be divided by12 to arrive at an average monthly production level. This language doesnot need to be incorporated into the regulation, because the Control Authoritywill do so when writing the control mechanism.One Control Authority commented that POTWs can easily determine flow ratesat industrial users by monitoring user fee bill volumes on a quarterlybasis and by noting changes during industrial user monitoring by the POTW.Although these may be available sources of information for Control Authorities,industrial users still need to notify the Control Authority of significantchanges in production or flow rates so that the Control Authority may adjustreported volumes for increased flows occurring during any non-scheduledinspection and sampling, or in evaluating semi-annual reports from theindustrial user.One commenter requested that tiered equivalent limits should be allowedwhere tiered production-based limits are allowed by the pretreatment standard.Tiered equivalent limits are not necessary for any industrial user. Ifcategorical pretreatment standards are set on a tiered basis there maynot be adequate information for the Control Authority to determine thelong-term average production rate. In that case, the better method of controllingthese users would be to use the tiered production standard with samplingfor flow rate coupled with information on the actual production rate atthe time of sampling. If a Control Authority decides to issue a controlmechanism that includes alternate mass or concentration standards for afacility covered by tiered production-based standards, then the ControlAuthority must ensure that it has adequate long term average productionrate information for that facility before issuing the control mechanism.One commenter noted that pretreatment standards contemplate greater flowreductions than may have been attained traditionally by an industrial user.Therefore, determining the average flow rate based on historical flow datagathered prior to the reduction in flow may lead to a concentration limitthat is too stringent for the reduced flow rate. The commenter suggestedthat an industrial user should be able to use projected flow rate ratherthan the historical rate to establish the average flow rate. The Agencyagrees, in part, with this commenter's suggestion, but shall require thatthe projected flow rate be based on more than just the design flow forthe facility. Information regarding: (a) The facility's expected productionrate; (b) the characteristics of its pretreatment system, wastewater, andindustrial process; and (c) the number of employees, work stations, andwork shifts, for example, might be needed to better estimate the expectedlong term average production and flow rates for a new facility. Anotheroption would be to continue use of the production based standard for aperiod of time until sufficient flow rate data are obtained to estimateaccurately the average flow rate.Two commenters suggested that the Control Authority and industrial usershould be involved in determining equivalent concentration or mass basedlimits. Cooperation between these parties is necessary in order to ensurethat truly equivalent standards are developed. Establishing the long termaverage production and flow rates will require the industrial user to provideinformation to the Control Authority. Nothing in today's regulation wouldpreclude such cooperative development of the equivalent standards.An environmental group commented that EPA had failed to comply with twoof the ``central aspects of the PIRT recommendation: (1) To ensure that,where `legally' appropriate, POTWs had authority to calculate equivalentmass and concentration limits, and (2) to specify how [the above conversion]could be implemented.'' This is not an accurate interpretation of the PIRTrecommendation on this issue. PIRT questioned: (1) Whether equivalent limitssimilar to those available to direct dischargers are available to industrialusers; (2) how such limits could be implemented; and (3) whether a POTWcould establish the production rate and flow rate for a facility and thencalculate the equivalent limit by multiplying the production rate by theproduction-based standard and then dividing by the flow rate. PIRT recommendedthat the Agency issue a statement informing Control Authorities of theways in which control mechanisms may be legally used to convert productionbased standards to equivalent mass or concentration limits. The Agencyis responding to this recommendation by promulgating today's regulatorychange.   The same commenter also stated that any process established under thisproposal should allow public notice of such equivalent limits and publicaccess to the materials on which such equivalent limits are based and shouldprovide for EPA and State oversight of the Control Authority decision-makingprocess. Nothing in today's regulation precludes public access to nonconfidentialmaterials contained in the files of a Control Authority. Under the CWA,the NPDES regulations, and the General Pretreatment Regulations, materialssubmitted by dischargers are to be made readily available to the public.In compliance with andSection;403.14 and 40 CFR Part 2, information submittedby an IU to be used in developing an equivalent mass of concentration limitwould be available to the public as prescribed by 40 CFR Part 2.   The Agency does intend to review equivalent limit determinations as partof its ongoing POTW pretreatment audit and permit compliance inspection(PCI) programs. These programs are sufficient to ensure that the appropriateequivalent limitations are established and enforced by the Control Authorities.Finally, with respect to the legal validity of equivalent limits, thisregulatory change recognizes equivalent limits, making them legally validand enforceable.   In addition to the changes to andSection;403.6(c) discussed above, EPA alsoproposed on June 12, 1986, to amend andSection;403.12(e) to require inclusionof current production data in the periodic compliance reports. Severalcommenters stated that this revision should not be made because it couldresult in a fluctuation of effluent limits from one reporting period toanother. An environmental group, on the other hand, urged that this requirementbe maintained and requested that the Agency also include a monitoring andreporting requirement for flow rates.   In view of the discussion above concerning long term production data neededfor calculating equivalent concentration or mass limitations, today's finalrule differs from the June 12 proposal. The regulation specifies that atfacilities for which a Control Authority has established equivalent limitspursuant to andSection;403.6(c), production data to be reported in the periodiccompliance report should be based upon the same measure (i.e., long termaverage) as the production rate used by the Control Authority in establishingthe equivalent limits. This is the production data necessary to determinewhether the user is in compliance with the applicable categorical pretreatmentstandard, since the equivalent limits are enforceable in lieu of the standarditself. For other Industrial Users subject to production-based effluentlimits, however, the production data necessary for determining compliance,and therefore the data that must be included in the andSection;403.12(e)report, is the production corresponding to the period during which thesampling for the report was performed. This same requirement will applyfor the 90 day initial compliance report (see discussion in Part II.D.8.below).   d. <T3>Today's rule. </T3>EPA is promulgating andSection;403.6(c) as proposedwith the addition of language to reflect the commenters' concerns regardingthe definition of immediate notification. As noted above, andSection;403.6(c)(7)is amended to read: ``Any Industrial User operating under a control mechanismincorporating equivalent mass or concentration limits calculated from aproduction based standard shall notify the Control Authority within two(2) business days after the User has a reasonable basis to know that theproduction level will significantly change within the next calendar month.Any User not notifying the Control Authority of such anticipated changewill be required to meet the mass or concentration limits in its controlmechanism that were based on the original estimate of the long term averageproduction rate.''   Regarding andSection;403.12(e), the final rule differs from the proposalin that it specifies that for industrial users subject to equivalent massor concentration limits established by the Control Authority under theprocedures in revised andSection;403.6(c), the periodic compliance reportmust include a reasonable measure of the user's long-term production rate.For all other uses subject to production-based standards, the productionrate included in the periodic report is to be the actual production duringthe sampling period.<ITAG tagnum="81">A.2. Local Limits [40 CFR 403.8(f)]    </ITAG>a. <T3>Existing rule. </T3>Section 403.5 states when specific local limitsmust be developed by POTWs. POTWs required under andSection; 403.8 to developpretreatment programs must develop local limits to implement the generalprohibitions against interference and pass-through in andSection; 403.5(a)and the specific prohibitions listed in andSection; 403.5(b). (<T3>See</T3>, andSection; 403.5(c)(1)).    Section andSection; 403.8(f) sets forth the required elements of an approvablePOTW pretreatment program. That section requires a POTW seeking pretreatmentprogram approval to demonstrate that it has sufficient legal authorityto enforce local limits developed pursuant to andSection; 403.5(c), but doesnot explicitly make the actual promulgation of such limits (if needed)a prerequisite to local program approval. Questions have arisen as to whetherPOTWs required to develop pretreatment programs must develop any neededlocal limits prior to receiving program approval. In the preamble to the1981 amendments to the General Pretreatment Regulations, EPA stated that``[local] limits are developed initially as a prerequisite to POTW pretreatmentprogram approval.'' (46 FR 9417, January 28, 1981). However, the currentregulations themselves are not explicit on this point.    b. <T3>Proposed change. </T3>The Agency proposed to revise the regulationsto clarify that the development of local limits (or a demonstration thatthey are not necessary) is a prerequisite to POTW pretreatment programapproval (and the continuing legal acceptability of a local program). Theproposal added a new paragraph to the local program requirements in andSection;403.8(f). As a minimum, all POTWs submitting local programs must evaluatethe need for local limits, as described above. Where the evaluation indicatesthat local limits are needed, the POTW must promptly adopt and enforcelocal limits that will protect the treatment works against interference,pass-through and sludge contamination. A POTW that proposes to rely solelyupon the application of the specific prohibitions listed in andSection; 403.5(b)and categorical pretreatment standards in lieu of numerical local limitsmust demonstrate that: (1) It has determined that the industrial pollutantsof concern will not cause problems at the treatment facility, (2) it hasadequate resources and procedures for monitoring and enforcing compliancewith the prohibitive discharge and categorical standards, and (3) fullcompliance with the applicable categorical standards will meet the objectivesof the pretreatment program.    Under the proposal, when a POTW is identified as requiring a pretreatmentprogram, the requirement to develop such local limits as are necessarywill be reflected in the POTW's approved pretreatment program and incorporatedin its NPDES permit under andSection; 403.8(c). The permit will also includea requirement that these limits be updated as necessary. Like all otherapplicable pretreatment requirements, the failure to develop (and update,as needed) necessary local limits will, of course, continue to be subjectto enforcement, either by EPA or an approved NPDES State, as a violationof the POTW's permit.    Any POTW whose program has already been approved without the analysis ofthe impact of the pollutants of concern and adoption of local limits willbe required to initiate an analysis as described above and adopt appropriatelocal limits under this proposal. This requirement will be incorporatedin the POTW's NPDES permit as soon as feasible. POTWs that have previouslyadopted local limits but have not demonstrated that those limits are basedon sound technical analysis, also will be required to demonstrate thatthe local limits are sufficiently stringent to protect against pass-through,interference and sludge contamination. POTWs which cannot demonstrate thattheir limits provide adequate protection will be required to revise thoselimits within a specific time set forth in a permit modification.    c. <T3>Response to comments. </T3>Of the 25 comments received by EPA on thisproposed change, only 12 were pertinent to the revision. The remaindermerely commented on the need for more or better guidance on how to developlocal limits, on whether EPA should have approval of local limits submissions,on the need to define the terms interference and pass-through in the regulations,on the need for local limits in general, and on the need to address thosepretreatment programs that were approved but lack local limits. The intentof the revision was to clarify that the development of local limits isrequired as a prerequisite for program approval_not to reconsider or invitecomment on whether local limits are necessary or how they should be developedand implemented. It should be noted that the revised definitions of pass-throughand interference, which had not been finalized when this revision was proposed,were promulgated on January 14, 1987 (52 FR 1586, at 1600). The Agencyhas also prepared additional guidance for the development of technicallybased local limits (``Guidance Manual on the Development and Implementationof Local Discharge Limitations Under the Pretreatment Program'' (1987)).   As of March 31, 1987, the Agency had identified 1519 POTWs needing pretreatmentprograms (45 of which were newly designated). Of the 1519, 1450 (95%) wereapproved. (If the 45 newly identified programs are removed from the total,98% of the programs have been approved.) The Agency expects that only afew new programs will be identified in the future. As noted above, existingpretreatment programs will be reviewed during audits to ensure that technicallybased local limits are in place. Local limits that are technically basedare local limits that are developed based upon a site-specific engineeringdetermination, generally utilizing a headworks analysis. (<T3>See</T3>, ``Guidance Manual on the Development and Implementation ofLocal Discharge Limitations Under the Pretreatment Program'', pp. 1-12to 1-15 (1987).) An August 5, 1985 memorandum from the Office of WaterEnforcement and Permits to the EPA Regional Water Management Division Directorsprovided guidance as to how the NPDES permits for POTWs will be modifiedat reissuance to include a requirement to develop technically based locallimits if they have not already been developed. The more recent 1987 guidancemanual expands upon the provisions of the 1985 memorandum.    In general, 11 of the 13 commenters on this proposed revision agreed thatPOTWs need to develop local limits prior to submission of their pretreatmentprograms. However, each of them had comments regarding how this shouldbe done.Three of these 11 commenters strongly urged EPA to consider the cost ofdeveloping local limits when requiring a POTW to develop them. One StateApproval Authority indicated it could not fully and immediately implementthis requirement due to insufficient resources. The guidance in the above-referencedAugust 1985 memorandum provides State Approval Authorities some flexibilityin addressing deficient existing programs. The Agency intends that as newlydesignated programs are developed, local limits will be included in theprogram submission, while deficient existing programs will have to developlocal limits and incorporate these requirements into their programs assoon as feasible.Two Control Authorities, commenting on this provision, stated that developmentof local limits by small POTWs should not be required until EPA providesthe expertise to develop the local limits for the POTWs. These two commentersalso suggested that EPA should do the analysis of the data supplied bythe POTW to reduce costs. The Agency does not agree with these commentersbecause EPA provided initial guidance for local limits development in August1985, and developed additional, more detailed guidance on this subjectin December 1987. The Agency has also made a personal computer compatiblesoftware package (Prelim 3.0) available to POTWs at no cost to enable themto develop appropriate local limits. Thus, adequate tools are available,even to small POTWs, to develop local limits. With regard to cost reduction,the greatest cost in developing local limits is the sampling and analysisof influent, effluent, and sludge. These analyses are already performedby the POTW. The commenters' proposal would not alleviate that cost. Furthermore,the POTW, not EPA, is in the best position to evaluate case-specific criteriato determine the appropriate local limits.One State agency agreed with the proposed change, but stated it would notrequire local limits where problems have not occurred, or are not expectedto occur, at the POTW. The intent of the proposed revision was to requirelocal limits development for pretreatment programs that had, or expectto have, problems with pass-through, interference, sludge quality, or workerhealth and safety. Under this regulation, POTWs are given an option ofdescribing why local limits are not necessary. Therefore, this commenter'sstatement that it will not require local limits development where problemsdo not exist or where problems are not expected to exist complies withthe intent of this provision.Two environmental groups stated that the regulatory language of this provisionshould be made more explicit by inserting the preamble discussion of thegoals and requirements of local limits development into the regulation.The preamble discussion of the items necessary to develop technically basedlocal limits was meant to further explain the regulation's language. Asnoted above, the Agency has developed a new pretreatment guidance documenton development of technically based local limits. This document will serveto explain the items needed to develop local limits. The Agency will continueto assess the needs of POTWs and will update the guidance as necessary.One environmenal group supported the proposed revision, but stated it wasnot necessary because the current pretreatment regulatory requirementsat andSection; 403.5(c)(1) require POTWs to develop and enforce local limits.This commenter stated that this regulatory language mandates that EPA cannotapprove a pretreatment program submission that lacks local limits. However,this new provision is a needed clarification of the existing regulationbecause it will ensure that POTWs developing new pretreatment programsare clearly on notice that the program submission must include local limits.One industrial user commented that industries should assist POTWs in determiningwhether local limits are necessary. This commenter also stated that perhapsa more cost efficient approach would be for industrial users to pay a surchargeto allow the POTW to upgrade its treatment, rather than having the userinstall pretreatment facilities. Although Control Authorities and industrialusers need to work together in running effective pretreatment programs,the decision and supporting documentation on the necessity of local limitsis to be made by the Control Authority. Nothing in today's action preventsan industrial user from financially assisting a POTW. However, in determiningwhether local limits are necessary or what the limits should be, the ControlAuthority should consider the effects of the discharge of the wastestreaminto the POTW, including the sewer system and the treatment plant. Problemscaused by the interference of a pollutant are not limited to the treatmentplant; sewer pipe deterioration, plugging, or explosions could result fromwastestreams discharged by industrial users that have not been adquatelypretreated.Two commenters noted that the parenthetical statement ``or a demonstrationthat they are not necessary'' which is contained in the preamble, was notplaced in the regulation, and suggested that the language be included inthe regulation. Although the intent of the provision, as clearly spelledout in the preamble, was to allow a POTW to make the finding that locallimits are not needed, the regulatory language could more clearly reflectthis intent. Therefore, today's regulatory language incorporates the phrase,``or demonstrate that they are not necessary.'' Two commenters were opposedto the proposed revision. One commenter stated that Control Authoritiesmay be unable to demonstrate that local limits are unnecessary becauseof the broad language in the preamble regarding the need to analyze forpollutants that may cause pass-through or interference at the plant. TheAgency does not expect that a POTW will be able to foresee all pollutantsthat will be discharged into the sewer system by IUs, but a reasonableapproach by the POTW is required. The Agency expects that a POTW will evaluatethe likelihood that its system will expand to serve more industrial users,or that current industrial users will move out of the system and be replacedby different industrial users. This analysis should be a part of the developmentof local limits by a Control Authority.Another commenter stated that local limits are only a small part of a pretreatmentprogram and should not delay the approval of the total program. This commentersuggested that POTWs should be given six to twelve months after programapproval to develop local limits. The Agency does not agree with this suggestion.Local limits are one of the most important aspects of a POTW's local program.National categorical standards may not provide enough treatment to protecta POTW from pass-through, interference, or sludge inhibition. POTWs cannotafford to violate their NPDES permits, have influent disrupt or destroythe treatment plant, or have sludge contaminated so that it cannot be handledin the usual way (e.g., composting, land application, or land filling).The Agency expects that the Control Authority will use local limits toprevent such occurrences, and maintain the integrity of the treatment facility.d. <T3>Today's rule.</T3> EPA is promulgating this change as proposed withthe addition of the phrase ``or demonstrate that they are not necessary''as discussed above.<ITAG tagnum="81">A. 3. Combined Wastestream Formula [40 CFR 403.6(e)]</ITAG>a. <T3>Existing rule.</T3> The combined wastestream formula (40 CFR 504.6(e))is a method for calculating alternative pollutant limits at industrialfacilities where regulated process effluent is mixed with other wastewaters(either regulated or non-regulated) prior to treatment. As stated in thepreamble to the 1981 amendments to the General Pretreatment Regulations(46 FR at 9419), the formula is of primary importance to large, diversifiedindustrial users with multiple processes:<ITAG tagnum="21">These Industrial Users of POTWs frequently have a number of individualprocesses producing different wastestreams that are not regulated by thesame categorical Pretreatment Standard or are not regulated at all. Manyof these integrated facilities have combined process sewers and a numberhave already constructed combined waste treatment plants. In these situations,the Industrial User often prefers to install, or continue to use, a pretreatmentsystem on the combined stream rather than installing separate parallelsystems on each individual stream. A combined wastestream formula permitsa facility to mix wastestreams prior to treatment by providing it withan alternative effluent limit for this combined discharge. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">EPA wishes to minimize the need for separation of wastestreams andfor treatment by parallel systems when comparable levels of treatment canbe attained in combined treatment plants. Separate treatment of wastesat an integrated plant can be costly, wasteful of energy, inefficient andenvironmentally counterproductive. In addition, such an approach reducesthe environmental gains resulting from the voluntary treatment of unregulatedstreams prior to the imposition of regulatory requirements. However, theAgency also recognizes that the countervailing concerns of avoiding theattainment of limits through dilution and ensuring that adequate treatmentis provided may sometimes lead to the conclusion that segregation of streamsis the only appropriate way to meet applicable pretreatment limits. Thecombined wastestream formula attempts to strike a proper balance betweenthese considerations. It is the Industrial User's choice whether to combineor segregate its wastestreams. However, if the User decides to combinewastestreams prior to treatment, and at least one of these wastestreamsis covered by a categorical pretreatment standard, then alternative limitsfor all regulated pollutants in the combined wastestream must be calculatedusing the combined wastestream formula.</ITAG>b. <T3>Proposed change.</T3> Where an industrial user combines waste streamsprior to treatment, compliance with an applicable categorical standardcan be determined either prior to combining the wastestreams or followingtreatment of the combined wastestream (by applying the combined wastestreamformula). Some industrial users have indicated that they would like tobe able to switch between monitoring at these two points for purposes ofevaluating compliance with categorical standards. The current regulationsare silent on whether this option is allowed.EPA proposed to add a new paragraph (e)(5) (andSection; 403.6(e)(4) in today'sfinal rulemaking) to the combined wastestream provision in andSection; 403.6to clarify the approach to be taken in such cases. Under the proposed rule,an industrial user has an initial choice of monitoring either the segregatedwastestream(s) or the combined wastestream and then applying the appropriatenumerical limits. If, at some later date, the industrial user wishes tochange its initial choice of monitoring points, it may do so only afterreceiving approval from the Control Authority. This is necessary to enablethe Control Authority to verify the applicable limits (e.g., alternativelimits calculated using the combined wastestream formula) and ensure thatthe change in sampling points will not allow the industrial user to substitutedilution (either by non-regulated process water or by ``dilution flow''as defined in andSection; 403.6(e)) for pretreatment.EPA also proposed to add stormwater and demineralizer backwash to the definitionof ``FD'' in andSection; 403.6(e)(1), which refers to streams that are treatedas dilute for purposes of calculating alternative limits under the combinedwastestream formula. Like the other streams included in this definition,stormwater and demineralizer backwash streams do not generally containsignificant concentrations of regulated pollutants.As with boiler blowdown and non-contact cooling water streams, however,in certain circumstances a stormwater or demineralizer backwash streamcould contain a significant amount of a pollutant that could be substantiallyreduced if the industrial user combined this stream with its regulatedprocess wastestream(s) prior to treatment. EPA proposed that the industrialuser could request the Control Authority to classify the stream as an ``unregulated''stream rather than a ``dilution'' stream. The industrial user would berequired to provide engineering, production, and sampling and analysisinformation sufficient to allow a determination by the Control Authorityon how the stream should be classified. The Control Authority would havediscretion to classify the stream in question as either a ``dilution''or an ``unregulated'' stream.EPA also proposed to revise andSection; 403.6(e)(3). That section describesthe self-monitoring required to insure compliance with alternative limitsderived using the combined wastestream formula, and references self-monitoringrequirements in categorical pretreatment standards. However, the categoricalstandards do not contain such self-monitoring requirements. The Agencyproposed to delete existing andSection; 403.6(e)(3) to reflect this fact.In place of the deleted provision, the Agency proposed a new andSection;403.6(e)(3) that will require compliance with the monitoring requirementsin andSection; 403.12(g), which is also being proposed to be amended today(see discussion below).c. <T3>Response to comments.</T3> Thirteen commenters responded on the proposal.EPA's responses to these comments are grouped by specific issue below.1. <T3>Notification of changed monitoring location.</T3> All three industrycommenters on this issue supported the proposal. Two POTWs also submittedcomments. One POTW concurred with the proposal to allow a choice of compliancemonitoring locations, but stated that POTWs should have a say in wheresamples are taken for compliance monitoring performed by the POTW. AnotherPOTW found the language in proposed andSection; 403.6(e)(5) ``very confusing,''and stated that it was not clear whether the reference to a ``treated processwastestream'' meant a regulated or non-regulated stream. It was also unclearto the commenter what was being combined with this wastestream.As to the first POTW commenter's concern, EPA does not intend to preemptthe Control Authority's ability to determine the point at which it collectssamples in monitoring the compliance of an industrial user. Regardlessof where the industrial user wishes to conduct self-monitoring, the ControlAuthority may select its own monitoring location, so long as the chosenlocation is an appropriate one for determining compliance with the applicablecategorical standard(s). Moreover, POTWs with pretreatment programs musthave authority to require such self-monitoring and reporting by industrialusers as is necessary to assess and assure compliance with pretreatmentstandards (<T3>see,</T3> andSection; 403.8(f)(1)(iv)(B)). Such authority should include,at a minimum, the ability to ensure that a sampling location chosen byan Industrial User will provide the necessary data. Some POTWs may alsohave more extensive authority under State and/or local law allowing themto direct the industrial user to monitor at a specific location. Today'sfinal rule would not limit such authority. It merely provides that forpurposes of determining compliance with the federal categorical pretreatmentstandards, an industrial user combining a process wastestream with otherwastestreams prior to treatment may monitor either the regulated stream(s)separately (in which case the individual categorical standard(s) wouldbe applied) or the combined stream (in which case the combined watestreamformula would apply). The rule does not affect the ability of the ControlAuthority, under its own authorities, to impose specific requirements onthe industrial user regarding monitoring location.Regarding the second POTW's comments, the term ``treated process wastestream''was intended to refer to wastestreams regulated by categorical standards.To clarify this, the term has been changed to read ``treated regulatedprocess wastestream'' in the final rule. The commenter's confusion as towhat the regulated stream was being ``combined'' with is probably at leastpartly due to the inadvertent use of the word ``of'' after ``treatment''in the first sentence of proposed paragraph (e)(5). The ``of'' should havebeen ``with,'' and has been changed accordingly in the final rule (paragraph(e)(4)). This change clarifies that the regulated stream is being combinedwith ``wastewaters other than those generated by the regulated process,''whether they be ``regulated'' (i.e., covered under a categorical standard),``dilute'' under the definition in andSection; 403.6(e), or ``unregulated''(i.e., neither regulated nor dilute).2.<T3>``Dilution'' definition.</T3> Of the six commenters on this issue,three supported the rule as proposed. The others, a POTW, an industry tradeassociation, and an environmental group, expressed opposition to variousaspects of the proposal.The POTW and the industry trade association were concerned about how theproposal would effect stormwater and demineralizer and reverse osmosisbackwash streams that may be covered under categorical pretreatment standards.The industry trade association suggested that EPA clearly indicate in thefinal rule that where these streams have been included as process wastewatersfor categorical standards development, they should not be defined as dilute,but instead should be classified as either regulated or unregulated streams,depending on the situation. The POTW asserted that reverse osmosis anddemineralizer backwash wastestreams should be considered part of the regulatedwastestream for some categories for which they are essential and integralcomponents, and gave as examples of such categories electrical and electroniccomponents, electroplating and metal finishing. In support of its comment,the POTW stated that these wastestreams contain pollutants similar to thosefrom other regulated processes, but have minimum dilution potential becausethey are irregular and infrequent.Both commenters apparently misunderstood the scope of the proposed rule.EPA does not intend to include under the definition of dilute streams inandSection; 403.6(e) wastestreams resulting from application of reverse osmosisor demineralization to process wastewaters. The proposal was intended toapply only to reverse osmosis and demineralizer backwash streams resultingfrom treatment by the industrial user of its raw intake water (e.g., foruse in industrial processes requiring high quality water). Unlike processwastewater, these streams should not contain regulated pollutants in significantamounts. Moreover, in cases where they do, the final rule would allow theControl Authority to classify them as unregulated rather than dilute.The environmental group stated that the proposal would allow an industrialuser to classify stormwater as ``unregulated,'' or not, depending uponthe most favorable status of the wastestream to the facility; i.e., forpurposes of determining compliance. The commenter recommended that (1)all stormwater be classified as ``dilution'' for purposes of the combinedwastestream formula and control authorities should be encouraged to developlocal limits for significant stormwater contamination, or (2) EPA shouldconduct a rulemaking to determine which stormwater streams should be treatedas ``unregulated'' for purposes of the formula.Both the proposal and today's final rule state that the Control Authority,not the industrial user, is responsible for determining the classificationof stormwater as either ``dilution'' or ``unregulated.'' The industrialuser may request the classification, but the Control Authority is the decisionmaker.At the outset, there is a presumption that the stormwater is dilution forpurposes of the formula. Stormwater is to be evaluated, as are all thewastewaters included in the ``FD'' definition, using the regulatory criteriato determine if the wastestream is to be deemed ``unregulated.''  Section 403.5 of the pretreatment regulations contains general and specificprohibitions against interference and pass through, and requires POTWsto develop specific local limits to implement these prohibitions. If pollutantsfound in stormwater introduced to a POTW cause interference and/or passthrough, the POTW already is required by the pretreatment regulations toestablish local limits. Additional authority specified in the regulationsis not necessary. In addition, EPA has considered contaminated stormwaterin promulgating effluent guidelines limitations and categorical pretreatmentstandards (e.g., iron and steel (40 CFR Part 420); petroleum refining (40CFR Part 419)).  3. <T3>Combined wastestream formula after treatment.</T3> Most of the commentson the combined wastestream formula were directed at EPA's clarification,in the preamble to the proposal, of the procedures to be used where treatedregulated process wastestreams are combined with other wastestreams. Severalcommenters expressed reservations about the approach described in the preamble.Moreover, the comments revealed a considerable amount of misunderstandingamong the commenters. Therefore, although there was no regulatory changeproposed on this issue, it is appropriate to address some of the commenters'concerns and resolve any misunderstandings.  One commenter stated that it preferred to separately sample the industrialuser's treatment plant effluent and the end-of-pipe combined stream fordetermining compliance with categorical standards and local limits, respectively.The commenter seemed to think that this would not be allowed under theapproach explained in the preamble to the proposal. In fact, the flow-proportioningmethod discussed by EPA would not foreclose the commenter's approach, becauseit applies only where end-of-pipe sampling is being used to determine compliancewith categorical standards as well as local limits. Separate sampling ofthe industrial user's pretreatment facility effluent for categorical standardcompliance may generally be used regardless of what other wastestreamsmight be added further downstream.  Another commenter described a scenario where large industrial users mightbe pretreating only the concentrated regulated wastes and adding the lessconcentrated remainder of the regulated wastewaters after treatment. Thecommenter stated that using the combined wastestream formula at the end-of-pipesampling manhole allows translation of end-of-process limits (i.e., categoricalstandards) into end-of-pipe limits, and thereby minimizes the amount ofmonitoring done by the Control Authority at the industrial user. Again,there appears to be some misunderstanding of the Agency's preamble explanationin the proposed rule. The flow-proportioning approach (or a more stringentapproach) must be used where wastestreams <T3>other than regulated process</T3> wastestreams are added after treatment.Where all streams added after treatment are regulated process wastestreams,the combined wastestream formula may still be used since these added streamsmust meet the applicable categorical standard(s), regardless of whetherthey are treated or not. Since there are no unregulated streams being added,the trade-off between obtaining treatment of otherwise unregulated wastewatersand allowing some dilution in certain limited situations, which underliesthe combined wastestream formula, is irrelevant.  Another commenter contended that proper use of the combined wastestreamformula would produce accurate results for the purpose of determining complianceregardless of whether it is applied before or after treatment. However,as EPA explained in the preamble to the proposed rule, this is not thecase. In certain situations, the combined wastestream formula allows alimited amount of dilution. Where the formula is used prior to combinedtreatment, this dilution is viewed as an acceptable trade-off for treatmentof otherwise unregulated wastewaters that is obtained in other situations.This careful balance of competing concerns is upset if unregulated streamsare added after treatment, because there is no opportunity to obtain incidentaltreatment of the unregulated streams. Therefore, EPA disagrees with thecommenter's contention.  The same commenter also maintained that the flow-proportioning calculationwould increase administrative and data handling burdens for POTWs and industrialusers. EPA recognizes that some additional burdens may be experienced byControl Authorities and industrial users that have been using the combinedwastestream formula in situations where they should have been performinga flow-proportioning calculation. However, this latter calculation is relativelystraightforward and, as discussed above, is necessary to ensure that compliancewith categorical standards is not achieved through dilution.An industry commenter recommended that the approach described in the preambleto the proposal be applied only to new facilities. The commenter assertedthat requiring existing metal finishers to meet limits derived using theflow-proportioning calculation where wastestreams are added after treatmentwould significantly affect their ability to show compliance. The commenteralso argued that the burden of periodically sampling each source at largeplants would be enormous while the potential for disrupting the POTW wouldbe minuscule. According to the commenter, another effect of the approachdescribed by EPA would be that some parameters (e.g., cyanide) would belimited to below detectable levels, thus requiring plant-wide source samplingand elimination of the benefit of the combined wastestream formula. EPA disagrees with the commenter's contentions. First, the prohibitionagainst dilution to achieve compliance with categorical standards appliesto existing, as well as new, sources. It would not be appropriate to exemptexisting industrial users from this basic rule. Second, while the potentialfor disrupting the POTW may be relatively small, the net effect of allowingthe combined wastestream formula to be used where dilution would resultwould be increased pollutant loadings to receiving waters, thus contraveningthe basic goal of the CWA to eliminate the discharge of pollutants to theNation's waters. Finally, the commenter provided no data to support itsassertion that certain pollutants would be limited at below detectablelevels. While this may occur in some situations, based upon all the commentsreceived, this does not appear to be a pervasive problem. Moreover, whereuse of the flow-proportioning calculation would present this or other problems,the solution is to monitor the treated and untreated wastestreams separately,not to allow dilution through the combined wastestream formula. Another industry commenter was under the mistaken impression that EPA is<T3>requiring </T3>use of the combined wastestream formula where wastestreamsare combined after treatment and the level of a particular pollutant ina nonregulated wastestream exceeds the limit on that pollutant in the applicablecategorical standard. This is not the case. Whenever nonregulated wastestreamsare combined with treated regulated wastestreams and monitoring for compliancewith applicable categorical standards is performed on the combined wastestream,the flow-proportioning calculation described by EPA in the preamble tothe proposed rule may be used. In the instance described by the commenter,the combined wastestream formula may also be used, because it would resultin a more stringent limit than straight flow-proportioning. The ControlAuthority has the final say as to which formula will be required in suchcases. For purposes of compliance with federal requirements, however, eitherformula would be acceptable. A comment by an industry trade association similarly displayed confusionregarding the correct formula to apply in a given situation. The commenterrequested clarification on whether, in a case where the combined wastestreamformula may be used (i.e., the pollutant level in an unregulated streamadded after treatment is at least at the level allowed in the applicablecategorical standard), the flow-proportioning formula may be used instead.As stated above, for purposes of determining compliance with federal standards,the answer to the commenter's question is yes (although the Control Authoritymay choose to use the combined wastestream formula instead). The ``bottomline'' is that whatever approach is used must produce limits that are atleast as stringent as those produced using the flow-proportioning calculation.Finally, one commenter requested clarification of what would be considereda ``reasonable amount of time'' for industrial users to comply with anymore stringent limits that might result from Control Authorities applyingthe flow-proportioning calculation where they had previously (and incorrectly)been applying the combined wastestream formula. The commenter, a federalagency, noted that federal facilities may need to submit budget requeststo enable them to meet more stringent limits. Although EPA is sensitiveto the commenter's concerns, it cannot provide a generic definition ofa ``reasonable amount of time.'' Instead, this will be a case-by-case determinationby the Control Authority taking into account such factors as the magnitudeof the change in the applicable limit(s) and treatment changes necessaryto respond to the change. d. <T3>Today's rule. </T3>EPA is promulgating the final rule as proposed withtwo minor modifications. First, in the first sentence of new andSection;403.6(e)(4),the term ``treated process wastestream'' has been changed to ``treatedregulated process wastestream'' to clarify that the term refers to wastestreamsregulated by categorical standards. Second, the first ``of'' in the samesentence has been changed to ``with'' to correct an inadvertent error inthe proposed rule.<ITAG tagnum="81">A.4. Prohibition Against Dilution [40 CFR 403.6(d)]</ITAG>a. <T3>Existing rule. </T3>The underlying policy of the CWA is to reduce theamount of pollutants entering the Nation's waters (section 101 of the Act).This policy will not be met if industrial users meet concentration limitsby dilution and thereby discharge the same mass of pollutants at a lowerconcentration. Section 403.6(d) of the current regulations prohibits theuse of dilution as a means of achieving compliance with categorical pretreatmentstandards in place of adequate treatment. It has been EPA's consistentpolicy that dilution may not be substituted for treatment of pollutants.The General Pretreatment Regulations promulgated in 1978 clearly statedthis policy. While dilution may in the short term minimize some water qualityproblems, it does not reduce the mass of pollutants entering the POTW.The prohibition on dilution is supported by the Act's legislative historyand subsequent case law. (See the detailed discussion of the prohibitionon dilution in the preamble to the 1981 amendments to the General PretreatmentRegulations (46 FR 9419, January 28, 1981).b. <T3>Proposed change. </T3>The language of the existing prohibition in andSection;403.6(d) applies only to the use of dilution to achieve compliance withcategorical pretreatment standards. However, the underlying statutory policyof reducing the total mass of pollutants entering waters of the UnitedStates is also applicable to other pretreatment standards and requirements,such as more stringent local limits developed under andSection; 403.5(c).To the extent that local limits regulate pollutants that the POTW is notable to effectively treat (i.e., those that pass through the POTW or contaminatethe POTW sludge), dilution is not an acceptable substitute for adequatetreatment. Therefore, EPA proposed to modify the dilution prohibition toclarify that it is not limited to categorical pretreatment standards. Thiswill more clearly track the statutory intent.Under the terms of the proposal, industrial users would be prohibited fromdiluting to comply with local limits. This prohibition will not affectthe POTW's development of such limits and its ability to factor in thedilution impact of the domestic sanitary sewage contribution to the POTW.EPA intends that an industrial user will not increase the flow of waterinto the discharge to assure compliance with the local limit. However,where a local limit allows an industrial user to mix wastestreams, usingpre-existing flow rates of non-process wastewater to ``dilute'' the processwastes, then today's regulation will not restrict such action. However,once the POTW determines its local limits in accordance with andSection;403.5(c), the industrial user may not use dilution to meet those limits.c. <T3>Response to comments. </T3>EPA received comments on this proposed changefrom 22 commenters. A number of commenters supporting the change statedthat the proposal would:(1) Recognize what the Control Authority was already doing;(2) Strengthen their regulatory control and enforcement;(3) Be consistent with sections 307 and 402(b)(8) of the CWA. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">Several other commenters requested further clarification of the languagein the preamble or regulation, or requested further EPA guidance regardingthe prohibition. An industrial user inquired whether the dilution prohibitionapplied to pollutants (such as methanol) that are hazardous in large concentrations,but also provide a food source for POTWs. This commenters stated that methanolcan be sufficiently diluted to a low concentration so that its flammabilitywill be reduced. The dilution prohibition reflects the clear intent ofthe CWA and the pretreatment regulations that dilution is not a substitutefor treatment as a means to comply with the applicable discharge requirements.However, nothing in today's regulation would deter an industrial user fromcontaining this type of pollutant in a holding tank and slowly dischargingthe pollutant into its wastestream. This is different from using cleanwater to dilute the pollutant in the wastestream while increasing the totalflow from the industrial user.Several commenters were concerned that POTWs that have developed locallimits based on the pollutant characteristics and hydraulic loading ofthe total flow at the headworks would need to redevelop those local limitsbased on the amount of process water discharged. These commenters questionedwhether a POTW that already accounted for dilution in setting local limitswould need to recalculate its local limits after discounting the dilutionflow. The answer to this question is no. This regulatory change prohibitsdilution as a means to comply with either a categorical pretreatment standardor a properly derived local limit. Another commenter noted that this dilutionprohibition should only apply to process wastestreams. The Agency doesnot agree with this commenter. Many other non-process wastestreams may,if they contain significant levels of pollutants, also need to comply withlocal limits (e.g., boiler blowdown, noncontact cooling water) and shouldalso be subject to the dilution prohibition.One commenter suggested that the Agency provide some further guidance regardingthe prohibition. This commenter specifically stated that procedures areneeded to assist Control Authorities in determining whether dilution isbeing used by an industrial user to meet a limit. The most effective methodof determining whether an industrial user is diluting its wastestream isthe industrial user site visit conducted by the Control Authority. Closeinspection of floor drains, batch discharge areas, pretreatment systems,and the sewer line can indicate whether an industrial user is using dilutionwater to ensure compliance with the pretreatment standards. Control Authoritiescould also review an industry's water use bill to determine whether excessiveamounts of water were being used at the facility. Control Authorities mayevaluate an industrial user's water consumption against the water consumptionnoted in development documents for the categorical standard applicableto that facility, or compare similar industrial users within the ControlAuthority's jurisdiction or in a neighboring jurisdiction. Of course notwo IUs are identical, but similarities in size, production rate, and waterusage can be useful.   Several commenters requested clarification on whether the combined wastestreamformula was needed to determine compliance with local limits. Under Federalregulations, the combined wastestream formula is a means to assess compliancewith categorical pretreatment standards. Many Control Authorities havedeveloped local limits to be applied at the end of the pipe from the industrialuser and apply to the total wastestream, process and non-process wastewater.In these cases, there is no reason to segregate wastestreams.   One commenter stated that the proposed revision and its accompanying preamblelanguage were unclear. This Control Authority stated that its local limitsare enforced as total industrial user facility discharge standards withoutfactoring out domestic waste, cooling water, etc. EPA did not intend forthis proposed regulation to change how local limits are developed and implementedat a Control Authority. This provision is being implemented merely to preventan industrial user from increasing water usage and discharge flow to diluteits wastestream to be in compliance with the local limits.   A commenter opposed to the revision indicated that the broad scope of theprohibition would cover non-toxic discharges which could be adequatelytreated by the POTW. The commenter provided an example where a high concentrationconventional waste could be adequately treated by the POTW if the wastestreamwas combined with other low concentration conventional wastes. The commenterstated that under the proposed revision, the high concentration waste wouldhave to be pretreated prior to mixing with the other wastes to comply withthe dilution prohibition. The Agency is not convinced by this commenter'sarguments and believes the commenter has misinterpreted the regulatoryrequirement. Conventional pollutants for non-categorical industrial userswould be controlled by local limits and the industrial user could comminglethe wastestreams prior to discharge, as long as the final wastestream compliedwith the local limit. If the industrial user was a categorical industry,then the combined wastestream formula would be applied to its total dischargeto ensure compliance with the categorical limit. Under either situation,dilution with clean water could not be used to ensure compliance with theappropriate limit.   Two Control Authorities also raised the issue of dilution and pollutantsthat a POTW could treat. Both stated that by prohibiting dilution to reducethe concentration of conventional pollutants, there may be a greater potentialfor large slug loadings of the conventional pollutants to the POTW. TheControl Authorities were concerned that the POTW might not be able to adequatelytreat the large slug loadings, but could easily treat the less concentrateddiluted flows. The Agency is not convinced that the prohibition shouldnot be required for these pollutants by this description of the situation.Although it is true that a POTW could more easily treat the diluted conventionalpollutants rather than the slugs, the increased water flow into the POTWmight lead to hydraulic overloading at the POTW that could decrease itsremoval efficiency or cause discharge of untreated wastes. Furthermore,it is generally easier to treat the higher concentration of conventionalwastes than the diluted concentration. Any high concentration wastes dischargedby an industrial user will mix in the sewer lines with other wastes andbe diluted prior to arriving at the POTW. In addition many POTWs have massbased limits in their NPDES permits as well as concentration based limits.Although the diluted wastestreams may be treated by the POTW sufficientlyto be in compliance with the concentration based limit, the total massdischarged by the POTW may violate the mass based permit limit. Technicallybased local limits should prevent interference or pass-through at the POTWfrom slugs of high-strength conventional pollutants.   One industrial user trade group questioned whether any increase in processwastewater flow rate would be prohibited by this regulation. This commentersuggested that the language be changed so that increases in process waterflow would be allowed, unless the intention of the IU was to dilute thewastestream. EPA finds the suggested change to be highly unworkable. POTWsand Control Authorities would be hard pressed to discover an industrialuser's true intent. The Agency has therefore not made this change. However,nothing in today's regulation would prohibit an industrial user from increasingits process wastewater flow if the facility modifies its process, but thisis clearly different from the situation where an industrial user uses clearwater to dilute its wastestream to comply with the pretreatment standards.   d. <T3>Today's rule. </T3>EPA is promulgating this change as proposed.B. POTW Pretreatment Program Requirements <ITAG tagnum="81">1. Deadline for Program Submission_Newly Required POTW Programs [40CFR 403.8(b)] </ITAG>a. <T3>Existing rule. </T3>Under the current regulations, POTWs required todevelop pretreatment programs under andSection;403.8(a) must request andreceive approval of such programs within three years of their NPDES permitreissuance or modification to require program development, but not laterthan July 1, 1983 (andSection;403.8(b)). Although the regulations recognizethat EPA or States may subsequently require other POTWs to develop programsafter this date, the existing rules do not specify a deadline for programsubmittal or approval for these POTWs. b. <T3>Proposed change. </T3>EPA proposed to amend andSection;403.8(b) to establishan outside compliance date for program development and submission wherethe Approval Authority identifies a POTW as needing a pretreatment programafter July 1, 1983. EPA proposed to require program submission to the ApprovalAuthority as soon as possible, but no later than one year after the dateon which the POTW was notified by the Approval Authority, in writing, ofits responsibility to develop a program. While this time period is shorterthan the ``up to three year'' period authorized for POTWs prior to July1, 1983, experience indicates that one year is reasonable for POTWs newlyrequired to develop programs. Moreover, the existing three-year deadlineincludes receiving approval of the program; the deadline being proposedtoday applies only to the submission of an approvable program. Based uponthe POTWs that have developed programs, EPA has determined that, in mostcases a complete program submission can be developed within six to twelvemonths. Moreover, EPA and the approved pretreatment States have alreadyidentified most POTWs that will be required to develop pretreatment programs;those identified in the future will be able to benefit from the work andexperience that has taken place since 1978. In addition, it is anticipatedthat the new programs will be identified over a period of time. c. <T3>Response to comments. </T3>EPA received several comments regardingthe timing for program submission. One State Approval Authority suggestedthat the regulation should also include a deadline for EPA to review andapprove the submission. No such deadline is necessary. EPA does not expecta large number of new programs to be required in the future. Therefore,there will not be a surge of program submissions needing review and approvalby EPA in a short time period, and turnaround time on the new programssubmitted will be minimal. Several other commenters stated that the one year development limit wassufficient, but that an Approval Authority should be granted the discretionto extend that time period by two or three years. An extension of the oneyear time period is not justified. As noted above, the Agency has determinedthat a complete program submission can be developed within one year. Giventhe available guidance documents produced by EPA and the experience gainedby State Approval Authorities to date, future programs identified by ApprovalAuthorities will easily be submitted within the one year time frame. Under this regulatory change, Approval Authorities will impose programdevelopment requirements on POTWs using the same procedures as for programspreviously required. When a new POTW is identified as requiring a pretreatmentprogram, the Approval Authority will modify the POTWs NPDES permit as providedunder paragraphs 403.8(e)(1) and (5) to incorporate a compliance schedulethat includes a program submission date, progress reports and such otherinterim dates as are needed to insure timely program development. d. <T3>Today's rule. </T3>EPA is promulgating the final regulation identicalto the proposed regulation. <ITAG tagnum="81">B.2. </ITAG><T3>POTW Program Requirements_Remedies </T3>[40 CFR 403.8(f)]a. <T3>Existing rule.</T3> POTWs seeking approval of local pretreatment programsmust have adequate legal authority to administer the local program. Therequired minimum legal authorities include the authority to obtain remediesagainst industrial users that violate pretreatment standards and requirements(andSection; 403.8(f)(1)(vi)(A)). In addition to having authority to seekinjunctive relief, POTWs must be able to impose monetary penalties. Thepretreatment regulations do not specify the minimum penalty amounts thatPOTWs must be able to collect.POTWs that have legislative power under State law can meet the requirementto obtain monetary penalties by simply passing appropriate legislation(i.e., local ordinances or an equivalent). However, where a POTW does nothave the authority to enact ordinances or other local legislation, theexisting regulations only require the POTW to enter into contracts withits industrial users. In this manner, POTWs can obtain monetary compensationfor breaches of contract which result in losses to the POTW, but liquidateddamages are not penalties, as discussed below.b. <T3>Proposed change.</T3> It is a general principal of contract law thatdamages for a breach of contract should adequately compensate the non-breachingparty for the loss resulting from the breach, but should not be punitivein nature. Where a contract which includes a liquidated damages clauseis breached, the compensation to be paid by the breaching party must bereasonably calculated to compensate the non-breaching party for the loss.Under the pretreatment regulations, liquidated damages clauses in contractsbetween POTWs and their users must provide for monetary damages that compensatethe POTW for any violation of pretreatment standards. However, it is difficultto determine, in advance of a breach, the extent of damage to a POTW causedby the breach and thus difficult to select an appropriate sum to be includedin a liquidated damages clause. Furthermore, Congress clearly intendedthat a violation of pretreatment standards be deterred by the possibilityof substantial penalties that are not necessarily tied to measurable damagecaused by the violations. <T3>(See</T3> section 309 of the Act.) Because liquidated damages clausesmay not contain penalties, EPA has recognized that contracts are not anadquate enforcement mechanism.To require POTWs to have adequate enforcement authority, EPA proposed todelete that portion of andSection; 403.8(f)(1)(vi)(A) that provides for theuse of contracts as a mechanism for assuring compliance with pretreatmentstandards and requirements. The proposed regulation was intended to requireall POTWs developing POTW pretreatment programs to pass local legislationenabling them to seek or assess civil or criminal penalties against industrialusers in violation of pretreatment standards and requirements. POTWs thatdo not already have authorization to pass such legislation under Statelaw would have to seek such authority prior to program approval. ThosePOTWs with approved Pretreatment programs that depend upon contracts forimplementation and enforcement of pretreatment standards and requirementswould also be required to obtain the necessary authority from the Stateto enable them to seek or assess civil or criminal penalties against violatingindustrial users. This authority would have to be obtained within one yearof the effective date of this amendment unless the State would be requiredto enact or amend a statutory provision, in which case the POTW would havetwo years in which to obtain this authority.It was not thought that the proposed regulation would have a widespreadimpact on the national pretreatment program. It appeared to EPA that arelatively small percentage of industrial users are currently being regulatedthrough contracts with POTWs. However, the Agency invited comments on thisapproach and suggestions for other approaches, such as retaining the optionto use contracts, but requiring the City Solicitor (or other appropriateperson) to certify that such contracts, and particularly the liquidateddamages provisions, were valid under State law.The proposed regulation was not intended to abruptly discontinue the useof liquidated damages clauses in contracts between POTWs and their industrialusers. Where these provisions are currently in use, POTWs would continueto invoke them where a user violates the contract. However, such a contractdoes not meet the requirements of the revised rule. EPA's intent was toensure that POTWs required to implement pretreatment programs have adequateauthority to impose monetary penalties for all violations of pretreatmentstandards and requirements, including those that do not cause any measurabledamage to the POTW. The proposed change would merely ensure the use ofmechanisms that provide adequate enforcement and remedial authorities.EPA also proposed another change to the remedies provision of andSection;403.8(f). Section 403.8(f)(1)(vi) speaks in terms of civil or criminalpenalties, but does not contain any guidance as to minimum amounts thatPOTWs must be able to collect. This has created some inconsistency in settingpenalties. Consequently EPA proposed to require that all POTWs with pretreatmentprograms have authority to impose penalties of at least $300 per day perviolation in civil or criminal penalties. This amount was thought to beconsistent with EPA's ``Procedures Manual for Reviewing a POTW PretreatmentProgram Submission'' (1983) and was intended to provide a minimally acceptabledeterrent effect. The POTW would provide for larger penalties where appropriate(e.g., where the industrial user has a history of violations, etc.). Ofcourse, by stating this minimum amount in the regulations, EPA in no wayintended to limit its (or the States') ability to seek larger penaltiesin appropriate cases. The $300 amount was simply intended as a minimumfor purposes of the POTW's authority to assess civil and criminal penalties.It was not intended to be used as a defense in an enforcement action inwhich a larger amount is sought.In proposing the minimum, EPA did not mean to imply that amount would inall cases be sufficient to deter violations or force compliance by recalcitrantindustrial users. In some cases, monetary penalties may need to be coupledwith termination of sewerage service or other measures in order to achievecompliance. However, it is important to ensure that POTWs developing pretreatmentprograms have authority to impose sufficient monetary penalties regardlessof whatever other measures might be appropriate in a given case. EPA solicited comments on this proposal, and also invited suggestions asto other appropriate minimum penalty amounts. The Agency was particularlyinterested in receiving comments on the alternatives of requiring POTWsto be able to collect at least $1,000 (per day of violation), and usingthe same minimum penalty amounts that are required for State NPDES programsin 40 CFR 123.27(a)(3) (i), (ii), (i.e., $5000 per day of violation forcivil penalties, $10,000 for criminal fines). c. <T3>Response to comments.</T3> EPA received 38 comments on this proposal,of which twenty-one were submitted by POTWs. Other commenters includedfive states, four trade associations, five corporations, and three environmentalgroups. Most commenters addressed issues concerning the requirement of POTW authorityto seek or assess monetary penalties. Some commenters, however, apparentlymisread what was proposed. Thus, some commenters were concerned that POTWswould be required to have authority to directly assess penalties. Therealso appeared to be some confusion as to whether the proposed regulationwould eliminate all use of contracts by POTWs and thereby undermine existingagreements between POTWs and their users. In proposing this amendment to the existing rule, the Agency stated thatit did not anticipate that this change would have a widespread impact onthe national pretreatment program. The Agency believed that only a smallpercentage of industrial users are currently being regulated through contractswith POTWs. The comments received in response to the proposed rule didnot dispute this opinion. Nevertheless, POTWs that lack authority to seekor assess monetary penalties will be affected by today's rule. Therefore,it is important that POTWs that depend upon various contractual arrangementsfor implementation of their programs do not misread the purpose or effectof this regulation. The existing rule at the time this regulation was proposed required thosePOTWs without authority to obtain legislation to seek or assess damagesto enter into contracts with their industrial users which would providefor liquidated damages for violations of pretreatment standards and requirements.This use of liquidated damages was intended to be an alternative meansof assuring compliance on the part of industrial users with the POTW'spretreatment program. The Agency has since recognized that the use of liquidated damages forthe imposition of penalties is not enforceable as a matter of contractlaw. Therefore, the Agency proposed to eliminate the use of liquidateddamages as satisfying the minimum legal authority required of POTWs. Amongthe few commenters who addressed this issue, several commenters agreedthat such clauses were not punitive in nature and thus not adequate asan enforcement mechanism. None of the commenters asserted that the useof liquidated damages for the imposition of penalties was a legally sufficientenforcement mechanism. Some commenters adopted EPA's suggestion that certification of the validityof such penalty clauses under state law by a city solicitor or other publicofficial might be a workable alternative. One commenter stated that certificationwould remedy the problems associated with the use of contract penaltiesand be a less drastic approach than imposing a requirement that all POTWshave penalty authority. None of the comments cited any precedent for thisapproach, however. One regional POTW admitted that it was unable to certifythat the provisions in question would be enforced under all circumstances.EPA agrees with the commenter who asserted that certification is not acceptableas a substitute for authority to seek or assess penalties because: (1)Certification would not provide criminal enforcemet, and (2) because contractlaw prohibits the use of liquidated damages for the assessment of penalties,an attorney general's statement to the contrary would have little practicaleffect. The majority of commenters took the position that POTWs should be requiredto have penalty authority, and most of the POTWs who commented indicatedthat they already had some degree of authority to seek or assess penalties.Commenters who opposed the proposed changes expressed concerns that torequire POTWs to obtain the requisite penalty authority might jeopardizethe ability of POTWs to continue to operate approved pretreatment programs,primarily because of difficulties associated with obtaining the necessaryenabling legislation under state law. Some of these commenters expressedthe concern that, if the effort failed, contracts between industries andPOTWs might have to be terminated. These commenters questioned whetherit made sense to upset a successful POTW program in order to implementthis regulation. A few of the commenters who opposed the change felt that the present mechanismwas working effectively, without the need for requiring POTW penalty authority.Two commenters took the position that termination of services or revocationof permits present an alternative deterrent to monetary penalties thatis sufficient to compel compliance with contract provisions by POTW users.One commenter stated that the municipality's self interest in protectingits treatment works and in preventing unnecessary degradation of the qualityof its effluent was the best assurance that appropriate and effective concessionswould be extracted from a user before it was allowed to use the POTW'sservices. Another commenter stated that where an existing POTW pretreatmentprogram had demonstrated adequate enforcement of categorical and localstandards without levying civil or criminal penalties, there would be norequirement for imposition of fines. Although the proposed rule stated that all POTWs should have the authorityto assess monetary penalties, what was intended was that each POTW shouldhave the authority to seek or assess penalties. This was in keeping withthe Agency's own penalty authority at the time these regulations were proposed.The legal authority contemplated by the rule, similar to that requiredof State agencies under the NPDES regulations, was that a POTW should havethe power to assess or sue to recover in court civil penalties or criminalpenalties (of course, POTWs may have both civil and criminal authority)(<T3>cf.,</T3> 40 CFR 123.27(a)(3) (NPDES State required to have authority``[t]o assess or sue to recover in court civil penalties and to seek criminalpenalties * * *'')). To avoid further confusion in this regard, the finalrule has been amended to clearly state that all POTWs shall have authorityto seek or assess civil or criminal penalties. In proposing this rule, EPA did not intend to suggest that POTWs shouldvoid all contracts or that they should do away with all contractual mechanismsconcerning enforcement by POTWs. One state recommended that all referenceto contracts as an acceptable control mechanism be deleted because theyare seldom as effective a control mechanism as a permit and are difficult,time consuming and expensive to negotiate. However, the rule was merelyintended to eliminate the use of liquidated damages as an alternative toPOTW authority to seek or assess penalties. POTWs may continue to employcontract mechanisms for other purposs (e.g., to enable POTWs to enforcecompliance through contracts with neighboring jurisdictions). Moreover,POTWs should continue to invoke such provisions when a user violates thecontract, even under today's regulation. Today's regulation estalishesthe minimum legal authority which a POTW must have in order to operatean approved pretreatment program. In response to the principal concern of those opposed to the proposed rule(that some POTWs may encounter substantial difficulty in obtaining therequisite authority), it is EPA's position that, where a POTW lacks authorityto seek or assess civil or criminal penalties, effective administrationof the POTW's program is substantially impaired. Such enforcement poweris a basic feature of an effective pretreatment program without which aPOTW program does not merit approval. Concerning POTW pretreatment programrequirements generally, andSection; 403.8(f) states, inter alia, that a POTW``(1) [S]hall operate pursuant to legal authority * * *, which authorizesor enables the POTW to apply <T3>and to enforce</T3> the requirements of secs. 307(b) and (c), and 402(b)(8)of the Act [concerning pretreatment standards and compliance therewith]and any regulations implementing those sections.'' (Emphasis added.) EPAdoes not now intend to relax this minimum requisite legal authority forapproval of a POTW pretreatment program where it lacks the minimum authoritynecessary to compel compliance with its pretreatment program merely inorder to allow certain POTWs to continue to operate approved programs.The revised rule provides that POTWs which are prohibited by state lawfrom seeking or assessing fines for violations will have two years in orderto obtain the necessary changes in state law which would enable them toimpose such penalties and to implement such penalty authority. Two yearsis sufficient time to allow states and POTWs to make the necessary changesin their laws and regulations to enable POTWs to continue to operate approvedpretreatment programs without disrupting their operations. One POTW statedthat the proposed penalties were contrary to its state constitution, butdid not provide information on the specific constitutional provision. Nosuch prohibition was identified in a review of that State's constitution.States with an interest in having approved POTW pretreatment programs willenact the necessary enabling legislation for POTWs to have at least thisminimal authority to enforce compliance with POTW programs. Some POTWs commented that they did have authority to seek fines throughlocal courts and requested clarification whether such authority fulfilledthe requirement of the revised regulation. Other commenters sought clarificationas to whether allowing state environmental protection agencies to imposepenalties on a POTW's behalf was acceptable as an alternative. The languagein the preamble for the proposed rule was not sufficiently clear on thisissue, but the final rule makes it clear that a POTW must have authorityeither to directly assess penalties or to seek civil or criminal penaltiesthrough local courts. The rule does not impose a mandatory administrativepenalty authority requirement, but only requires that a local ordinanceor other local law imposes penalties for noncompliance by POTW's industrialusers. However, the Agency's position is that other alternatives, includingthat of state agencies acting on behalf of POTWs, are not acceptable. ThePOTW itself must have the authority to seek or assess civil or criminalpenalties. In response to those commenters who favored termination of services andrevocation of permits as alternatives to POTW penalty authority, EPA'sposition is that these are extreme measures and that it is therefore questionablewhether such measures would be undertaken by a POTW except under extraordinarycircumstances. One POTW stated that it used these measures as its primaryenforcement authority. Another POTW commented, however, that disconnectionof water service was not politically feasible and plugging of sewer lineswithout water service disconnection could create health problems. Becausetermination of service does not have the flexibility of less extreme civiland criminal penalties, such measures are not adequate primary enforcementmechanisms as required by andSection; 403.8(f)(1). POTWs are required tohave authority, for instance, under andSection; 403.8(f)(1)(vi)(B), to immediatelyhalt or prevent any discharges of pollutants which pose an immediate threatto the health or welfare of persons, to the endangerment of the environment,or to interfere with the operation of the POTW. Of course, such measuresas revocation of permits and termination of services are vital complementaryenforcement tools which should be utilized in addition to normal enforcementmechanisms. A number of the commenters focused on problems presented by extraterritorialusers and multi-jurisdictional concerns. Some of the POTWs who respondedwith such concerns apparently do have the power to assess penalties withintheir jurisdictional boundaries, but either have extra-jurisdictional usersin their system or are contemplating the possibility of such a contingencyand lack the authority to directly assess penalties against extra-jurisdictionalusers. Some POTWs went into the details of their present multi-jurisdictionalarrangements. One municipal POTW, for instance, described its contractualarrangements with its suburban communities which provide that each suburbancommunity is required to have its own ordinance which provides for civilor criminal penalties which, by virtue of its delegation agreements, thePOTW may seek to impose. Various arrangements may be necessary to insure compliance by extra-jurisdictionalusers. While multi-jurisdictional concerns are valid, the Agency has discussedthem in the past and has issued guidance to resolve the difficulties presentedby them. (<T3>See,</T3> e.g., ``Guidance Manual for POTW Pretreatment Program Development'',pp. 3-9 to 3-10 (1983); ``Procedures Manual for Reviewing a POTW PretreatmentProgram Submission'', pp. 2-13 to 2-14 (1983).) Due to the unique circumstancesof each multi-jurisdictional situation, problems on this type ultimatelymust be resolved on a case by case basis. For purposes of today's regulation,it is sufficient to emphasize that a POTW must have penalty authority whichwill enable it to directly enforce compliance with the terms of its pretreatmentprogram with all of its users. In addition to its proposal to require that POTWs have penalty authorityin order to operate approved pretreatment programs, EPA proposed to seta minimum penalty authority for POTWs of $300 per day of violation. EPAalso solicited comments on alternative amounts of $1,000 per day and theamounts required for state NPDES programs in 40 CFR 123.27(a)(3)(i), (ii).While most of the commenters supported some minimum amount, there was againsome confusion as to what was proposed. Some commenters mistakenly thoughthat the proposed rule called for a minimum penalty amount to be imposedby POTWs for all violations. Thus, some commenters stated that it was inconsistentwith other penalty provisions for EPA to set a minimum penalty amount forPOTW pretreatment programs. One commenter noted, for instance, that section309(d) of the CWA sets maximum penalties but not minimum penalties. Anothercommenter thought it was inappropriate for EPA to set minimum penaltiesregardless of the nature or extent of the violation. The Agency would like to clarify that this provision is intended to requirethat each POTW have the authority to seek or assess penalties up to a certainminimum amount. Such minimum penalty authority will allow a POTW to seekor assess penalties less than the stated figure, but will ensure that thePOTW has adequate authority to penalize serious violations. The minimumpenalty authority proposed was for at least $300 per violation per day.Today's rule requires that each POTW have a minimum penalty authority ofat least $1,000 per violation per day. One trade association commented that a minimum penalty was not within EPA'sauthority because the Agency lacks explicit authorization similar to thatof section 402(b)(7) of the Act, which requires state NPDES programs toinclude adequate penalty authority to enforce compliance. Another commenteropposed to minimum penalty amounts took the position that any minimum penaltiesshould be set by states or municipalities. Another commenter opposed theimposition of a minimum penalty amount because the minimum was not necessarydue to the fact that EPA already uses a minimum figure as a criterion inreviewing and approving POTW pretreatment program submissions. It was notclear from these comments whether these commenters opposed a requirementof a minimum penalty amount or a minimum penalty authority. In either event,the Agency was not persuaded by these comments that EPA does not have theauthority to require that POTWs have a minimum penalty authority. It isthe Agency's position that it is within the scope of EPA's authority torequire such authority for POTWs and that this requirement comports withsections 307 and 402 of the CWA. A principal issue of concern to most commenters was the amount of penaltyauthority to be required by today's rule. Some POTWs indicated that theyhad lower penalties already in place and asked that EPA lower the minimumamount. Other POTWs indicated that they had maximum penalties of $300 andasked that EPA not exceed this figure as a minimum amount. Some commentersexpressed the opinion that $300 was a reasonable minimum and a sufficientdeterrent. One POTW indicated that it intended to raise its maximum penaltyto $1,000 per day, but that to raise the penalty any higher might createa conflict with the State's criminal law concerning misdemeanors and felonies.This commenter took the position that $1,000 per day is quite sufficientin light of stiff federal fines under section 309 of the CWA. In determining what amount to set as a minimum amount for civil or criminalpenalties, the Agency has considered the comments of POTWs with such limitationson their penalty authority. It is precisely because there may be such limitationson a POTWs penalty authority under state law that the Agency has allowedtwo years for POTW's without sufficient authority under their enablinglegislation to obtain the necessary statutory authority and to amend theirregulations accordingly. Most of the commenters who opposed increases intheir penalty authorities appeared to be more concerned about the impactthat this revised rule would have on their present penalty authority thanwhether such increases would have a greater deterrent effect on potentialviolators of their pretreatment program. A POTW's legal authority shouldbe an effective deterrent to violations by a POTW's industrial users. Onecommenter, a waste treatment facility, stated that a maximum penalty ofat least $300 per day is inadequate because it does not approach the enforcementliability for a direct discharger and, therefore, provides a dischargerwith ``enforcement insulation.'' In proposing a $300 minimum, EPA did notintend to limit the penalty authority of POTWs to that figure, but ratherintended to achieve a minimally acceptable deterrent effect and to reduceconfusion and inconsistency in setting penalties. Commenters who saw no need for POTW minimum penalty authority because ofthe stiff state and federal penalties set forth in section 309 of the CWAshould understand that POTWs need to have such enforcement authority becausethey serve as the first line of enforcement. This is what the CWA and thenational pretreatment program requires. In promulgating its final rule, EPA has decided to establish a minimumPOTW penalty authority of $1,000. In so doing, the Agency relies on commentswhich indicated that the proposed $300 amount was inadequate to achievethe objectives sought to be achieved by the Agency. A number of commenterssupported a minimum penalty authority of $1,000 or greater and some commenterssupported implementation of the NPDES amounts. The Agency was persuadedby comments such as that of one POTW that the proposed $300 amount wasinsufficient to deter violations and ensure compliance. This commenterrecommended that the penalty be increased to a minimum of ``$1,000 andpreferably higher.'' The POTW cited above recommended implementation ofthe NPDES amounts. An environmental group stated that, since the CWA andthe NPDES program allow the collection of up to $5,000 per day of violation,for civil fines, $300 falls far short. This commenter recommended a minimumpenalty authority of at least $1,000 per day. Another commenter cited section402(b)(8) of the CWA to the effect that $300 was far too small to ``assurecompliance with * * * pretreatment standards by each source.'' One commenter stated that the Agency had an explicit directive from Congressto make pretreatment standards as stringent as BAT standards for directdischarges and expressed its concern about the inequity which might becreated because of differences between the penalties assessed for violationsby direct dischargers and those assessed for violations by POTW users.This commenter added that a penalty authority of $300 per day is unreasonableon its face because it is too low to enforce compliance with categoricalstandards. EPA recognizes this problem and agrees that the CWA requiresequity between pretreatment standards and standards for direct discharges.The CWA does not require equivalent penalties, however, and thus today'saction addresses the problem raised by this commenter by setting the minimumpenalty authority for POTWs at $1,000 per day for violations by industrialusers. d. <T3>Today's rule.</T3> The final rule incorporates one change from therule as proposed. It requires all POTWs with approved pretreatment programsto have the authority to seek or assess civil or criminal penalties forviolations of pretreatment standards and other requirements by POTW users.It also sets a minimum penalty authority for all approved POTW programsof $1,000 per day for each day that an industrial user is in violationof the POTW's pretreatment program. <ITAG tagnum="81">B.3. Modification of Approved POTW Pretreatment Programs [40 CFR 403.18]</ITAG>a. <T3>Existing rule. </T3>A POTW seeking approval of a POTW pretreatmentprogram must submit a program containing the information specified in andSection;403.9(b).This submission must include a statement by the POTW's legal representativeidentifying the legal authorities and procedures under which the POTW plansto operate the program. It must also contain a copy of all relevant legalauthorities, a description of the POTW's organization with respect to programadministration and a description of available resources. When EPA or the State approves the program, conditions requiring implementationof the program are incorporated into the POTW's permit (<T3>see, </T3>andSection;403.8(c)). The POTW is then required to operatethe program in compliance with applicable regulations, the approved programsubmission and any other conditions incorporated into the permit. However,changing conditions at the POTW may warrant changes in the operation ofthe program. These changes in program operation may result in a programthat differs from that described in the approved program submission andrequired to be followed by the permit conditions. Changes that may requireprogram modification include the addition of new industrial users, newconnections with outlying jurisdictions, the establishment of new waterquality standards, the use or new treatment techniques or sludge use ordisposal methods, changing resource conditions, a desire by the POTW tomodify its control mechanism or its inspection and monitoring program,detection of new pollutants in the POTW's influent, and a finding of deficientlegal authority. The current regulations, however, contain no specificprovisions on when or how POTW pretreatment programs should be modifiedto reflect such changes. b. <T3>Proposed change. </T3>EPA proposed to add a new andSection;403.18 establishingprocedures and criteria for modification of approved programs. This sectionwas intended to track the program approval process. Under the proposal,either a POTW or the Approval Authority could initiate the program modificationprocess to reflect changing conditions at the POTW. This was to ensurethat these changing conditions are fully considered by the Approval Authorityjust as existing conditions are fully considered prior to initial programapproval. Moreover, the amendment was to ensure that the program remainsenforceable and that changes do not undermine the effectiveness of theapproved program. To modify its pretreatment program under the proposed rule, a POTW wasrequired to submit to the Approval Authority: (1) A statement explainingwhy the program modification is being sought; (2) a modified program submissionindicating those aspects of the program submitted by the POTW pursuantto andSection;403.9(b) at the time the POTW initially requested POTW pretreatmentprogram approval that would be affected by the requested program modification(including the legal authorities, program description, or resource commitments);and (3) any other relevant documents the Approval Authority determinedto be necessary under the circumstances, including, for example, any supportingtechnical documents. Where the Approval Authority initiates the modification,it might request the POTW to submit any necessary information, includingthe items listed above. Under proposed andSection;403.18, all program modifications were to be approvedby the Approval Authority. After the POTW submitted modification request,the Approval Authority was to review the submission to determine whetherthe program modification was consistent with the local program requirementsof andSection;403.8(f). Upon determination by the Approval Authority thatthe program modification was substantial, the review and approval was tobe in accordance with the procedures in andSection;403.11(b)-(f), includingadequate public notice. It would be administratively impossible to usethese full procedures for all program modifications. Therefore, the proposalprovided that for all modifications other than those determined by theApproval Authority to be substantial, the Approval Authority was not requiredto follow these procedures, but could act on the request without notice.Under the proposed rule, substantial modifications were those affectingthe fundamental operation of the program. The proposed rule listed fourexamples of substantial modifications: (1) Changes to the POTW's enforcementauthorities (e.g., remedies available for violations of pretreatment standardsand requirements by industrial users); (2) changes to local limits containedin municipal ordinances; (3) changes to the POTW's control mechanism, asdescribed in andSection;403.8(f)(1)(iii); and (4) changes to the POTW's methodfor implementing categorical pretreatment standards (e.g., incorporationby reference, separate promulgation, etc.). The Approval Authority woulddetermine whether other modifications were substantial on a case by casebasis. Criteria to be considered included: (1) Whether the changes wouldhave a significant impact on the operation of the program, (2) whetherthe change would result in an increase in pollutant loadings at the POTW,and (3) whether the change would impose less stringent requirements onindustrial users of the POTW. Where the change met one or more of thesecriteria, the modification would be considered substantial. EPA solicitedcomments on these criteria and on what other substantial modifications,if any, should be identified in andSection;403.18, as well as any other commentson the proposed approach. The procedures for review by Approval Authorities of substantial modificationsunder the proposed rule (andSection;403.11(b)-(f)) were identical to theprocedures for approving local programs and provide for public notice andcomment on the proposed modification (and an opportunity for a hearing).Significant changes to an approved program, like program approvals, arelikely to be of interest to the public and regulated community and shouldonly be acted on after the public has been notified and had an opportunityto comment on the changes. Moreover, public notice and comment enhancesthe enforceability of any modified or new provisions that are subsequentlyapproved. The program modification provision is consistent with EPA regulationsgoverning State NPDES program revisions (40 CFR 123.62). The public noticerequirement for substantial modifications is also consistent with the encouragementof public participation, which is a fundamental policy of the Act (section101(e)). The proposed rule provided that modifications to POTW pretreatment programsbecome effective upon approval by the Approval Authority. Notice of approvalof substantial modifications must be published in the largest daily newspaperwithin the jurisdiction(s) served by the POTW. Notice of approval of non-substantialprogram modifications might also be given by such publication, or by aletter from the Approval Authority to the POTW, a copy of which the POTWwould send to its industrial users. This procedure is identical to theequivalent process in the NPDES regulations for State program revisions.As with State program modifications, POTWs were to continue to operatetheir original approved program until a modification is approved by theState or EPA.Under the proposed rule, program modifications were to be incorporatedinto the POTW's NPDES permit, because the permit contains conditions basedupon the original program. For substantial modifications, the permit wasto be modified as soon as possible after approval of the modification.Since these modifications would already have been subject to the publicnotice requirements of andSection;403.11, a second round of public noticeand comment would not be required when the POTW's permit was modified toincorporate the program changes. Therefore, EPA also proposed to allowthe incorporation of substantial POTW pretreatment program modificationsinto a POTW's NPDES permit to be carried out as a minor modification under40 CFR 122.63 of the NPDES regulations. Alternatively, the Approval Authoritymight conduct concurrent program and permit modification, thus combiningthe public notice and comment process. (Many Approval Authorities haveadopted this approach for local program approvals.) For non-substantialprogram modifications, the proposed rule provided that these were to beincorporated into the POTW's permit when it is next reissued or modifiedfor any other reason. The procedures proposed by EPA would have required all POTW pretreatmentprogram modifications to be approved prior to adoption and implementationby the POTW. However, the Agency recognized that some modifications (e.g.,minor changes to the POTW's data management system) are so minor that theeffort required to review and approve them might outweigh their significancewith respect to the operation of the POTW's program as a whole. In lightof this, EPA sought to consider alternatives to the approach being proposedthat would allow the POTW to make certain changes in the operation of itspretreatment program without receiving prior approval from the ApprovalAuthority. First, the Agency could specify in andSection;403.18 all modificationsfor which the POTW would not be required to obtain prior approval. Thisapproach would require an exhaustive listing of non-substantial modifications.Another approach would be to specify substantial modifications (as in theproposal) and provide additional criteria (such as those outlined above)for determining when a modification is substantial, and require prior approvalonly for changes specified as substantial or meeting these criteria. Thisapproach would leave to the POTW the determination of whether a given change(other than one specified as substantial) met the criteria for being asubstantial modification. EPA solicited comments on these alternative approaches.In particular, the Agency requested detailed comments regarding which specificmodifications should be identified as not requiring prior approval underthe first approach. c. <T3>Response to comments. </T3>This issue generated a relatively largenumber of comments, the majority from POTWs. A number of States also commentedon the proposal. In addition, comments were received from two industries,a trade association, and an environmental group. Two commenters supportedthe provision as proposed. Of the other commenters, only two expressedopposition to the idea of establishing regulatory procedures and criteriafor modifications of POTW pretreatment programs. Most of the commenters opposed the requirement that all program modificationsreceive prior approval from the Approval Authority on the ground that thiswould present a significant obstacle to continuous program improvementand would impose an unnecessary time burden on the POTW and Approval Authority.Numerous suggestions were offered as to which modifications should requireprior approval. Several POTWs preferred the alternative, mentioned in thepreamble to the proposal, of requiring prior approval only for ``substantial''modifications, and defining ``substantial'' to include certain identifiedmodifications and others meeting specified criteria, with this later determinationto be made by the POTW. A number of POTWs suggested requiring prior approvalonly for modifications that make applicable limits and other requirementsless stringent or otherwise relax or weaken the approved program. A Statecommented that deletion of significant industrial users identified in aPOTW's original program submission should be considered a substantial modificationrequiring Approval Authority approval. Commenters also identified severalmodifications for which, they argued, prior approval should not be required,including: (1) Changes in administrative procedures that comply with thefederal pretreatment regulations, (2) increases in budgets, equipment andpersonnel, (3) changes to local limits, and (4) changes in response tochanges to the federal regulations. An industry trade association recommendedthat the criteria for substantial modifications requiring prior approvalbe expanded to include changes that would result in more stringent requirementsbeing imposed on industrial users. EPA agrees with these commenters that prior approval of all program modificationsis impracticable and unnecessary, and is modifying the final rule to requireprior approval only for ``substantial'' modifications. The Agency furtheragrees with those commenters who supported the alternative of identifyingcertain specific modifications as ``substantial'' and providing additionalcriteria for determining, on a case by case basis, whether other modificationsare ``substantial.'' The final rule has been modified accordingly. Underthe rule, prior approval is required for the specific modifications identifiedas ``substantial'' and for other modifications meeting the enumerated criteria.The list of identified ``substantial'' modifications has been expandedfrom the four in the proposal to include the following additional modifications:(1) Changes to all local limits (not only those contained in ordinances),which result in less stringent local limits, (2) changes to the POTW'slegal authorities (in addition to changes to the POTW's enforcement authorities),(3) a decrease in the frequency of self-monitoring or reporting requiredof industrial users, (4) a decrease in the frequency of industrial userinspections or sampling by the POTW, (5) changes to the POTW's confidentialityprocedures, (6) significant reductions in the POTW's program resources(including personnel commitments, equipment, and funding levels), and (7)changes in the POTW's sludge disposal and management practices. EPA does not agree with the commenter who recommended classifying deletionsof significant industrial users identified in a POTW's original programsubmission as a substantial modification. Such deletions are presumablybased upon the fact that the industrial user no longer discharges to thePOTW, and would therefore generally not be expected to have a significantimpact on the operation of the POTW's program. However, where there wouldbe such an impact, the deletion would meet one of the criteria for substantialmodifications and the POTW would be required to treat it as such. Moreover,if in response to the deletion the POTW wishes to make the remaining industrialusers' local limits less stringent, this would meet another of the criteriaand the change would be considered substantial.    EPA also does not agree with the commenter who recommended that the criteriafor substantial modifications requiring prior approval be expanded to includechanges that would result in more stringent requirements being imposedon industrial users. The commenter's concern appears to be that unlessthese changes are included in the criteria, industrial users will not havean adequate opportunity to participate in changes having a major impacton their operation. However, federal law does not prohibit POTWs from makingtheir programs more stringent than when they were approved, and adequateprotection of industrial users' due process rights can be addressed atthe local level. Users should already have ample opportunity to be heardin the context of individual permit actions, ordinance amendments, andother local proceedings affecting them.    Under today's final rule, the determination of whether a particular modificationnot included on the list of ``substantial'' modifications nonetheless meetsthe specified criteria for being classified as such would be made in thefirst instance by the POTW, subject to subsequent review by the ApprovalAuthority. One commenter asserted that EPA cannot legally delegate to aPOTW the authority to determine whether a modification is ``substantial.''The commenter misconstrues the Agency's action. EPA has provided a comprehensivelist of POTW program modification which the Agency has identified as ``substantial''modifications. In addition, the Agency has set general standards whichany other program modification may be determined to be substantial, andthus subject to prior approval by the Approval Authority. These standardsare merely to be applied by the POTW to situations not included on thelist of substantial modifications. EPA acknowledges that this process couldconceivably result in some modifications that are actually substantialnot being subjected to prior Approval Authority approval. The likelihoodof this has been reduced, however, by the expansion of the proposed listof identified ``substantial'' modifications in the final rule, so thatsubstantial modifications which are not listed and which do not clearlymeet the general standards of the rule are likely to be of less significanceand thus properly the subject of subsequent review by the Approval Authority.Therefore, it is the Agency's position that this does not constitute a``delegation'' of authority to POTWs. In the event that a POTW should designateas ``non-substantial'' a program modification that is in fact ``substantial,''the POTW would face a ``penalty'' in that the POTW will then have to resubmitthe program modification for approval as a ``substantial'' program modification.   Commenters offered a number of approaches for dealing with modificationsnot requiring prior approval (i.e., ``non-substantial'' modifications),including evaluation during program audits, and notification in the POTW'sannual report. Audits are not an appropriate mechanism for dealing with``non-substantial'' program modifications. A particular program might notbe audited more than once in every five years. Although ``non-substantial''modifications are presumed to be relatively insignificant, the ApprovalAuthority should nonetheless be informed of them in a timely fashion. Thesemodifications should be reported to the Approval Authority at least 30days in advance of when they are to be implemented by the POTW. The finalrule has been modified to provide for this. Consequently, ``non-substantial''program modifications will be thus deemed to have been ``approved'' bythe Approval Authority, unless the Approval Authority determines that amodification reported as a ``non-substantial'' modification is in facta substantial modification, within 90 days of the submission of a statementto the Approval Authority.    One POTW suggested that instead of being required to obtain prior approvalfor ``substantial'' program modifications, POTWs should only be requiredto give notice of program modifications to the Approval Authority, whowould then have only retroactive veto authority for all program modifications.However, for unauthorized program modifications, disapproval prior to implementationby the POTW is preferable to disapproval ``after the fact.'' The Agencyunderstands the concern expressed by several POTWs that prior review bythe Approval Authority may delay changes and hinder effective program implementation.However, where an approved program is being substantially modified, priorreview by the Approval Authority is necessary to ensure that the modifiedprogram will continue to comply with all applicable requirements. Moreover,as discussed below, the POTW's NPDES permit will also need to be modifiedto correctly reflect the program as modified. By requiring prior reviewand public notice of ``substantial'' program modifications, it becomespossible to allow even significant program modifications to be processedas minor permit modifications under 40 CFR 122.63, as amended today (seediscussion below) thereby simplifying the entire process.    A State commenter suggested that where a program modification involvesa change to the POTW's ordinance (which, according to the commenter, wouldbe the case for all four of the substantial modifications specified inthe proposal), additional public notice is unnecessary because public inputis already solicited in the ordinance revision process. EPA agrees thatwhere public participation in the process of amending the ordinance isequivalent to that required under andSection; 403.11, additional public noticeand comment for the program modification would be duplicative. However,because not all municipalities may have equivalent public participationprocedures for amending their ordinances, the Agency has concluded thatit would be inappropriate to allow a blanket exemption from the andSection;403.11 procedures for program modifications that involve amendment to alocal ordinance.Several commenters addressed the issue of incorporation of program modificationsin the POTW's NPDES permit. Two commenters, a POTW and a State, assertedthat a permit modification is not necessary every time a POTW's programis modified, since the permit language incorporating the original programmay be general enough to also encompass the modified program. Another POTWcommented that only major program modifications with substantial operationalimpact should be incorporated in the POTW's permit. In response, EPA notesthat the program initially incorporated into the POTW's permit is the program<T3>as originally approved. </T3>Changes in the operation of the programthat differ from the original program submission are thus beyond the scopeof what has been incorporated in the permit, and the permit must be modifiedaccordingly in order for the POTW to be in compliance.One commenter apparently misunderstood the proposal to require incorporationof program modifications in the POTW's permit only on permit reissuance.Under the proposal, substantial program modifications would be incorporatedinto the POTW's permit through a minor permit modification under 40 CFR122.63 of the NPDES regulations (as amended on June 4, 1986, 51 FR 20426).Other program modifications would have been incorporated into the permitthe next time the permit was reissued or modified for another reason. Thus,it appears the commenter was referring to the proposed permit modificationprocedure for non-substantial program modifications.Under today's final rule, andSection; 122.63 is being amended, as proposed,to add a new paragraph (g) which will allow ``substantial'' program modificationsto be incorporated into the POTW's permit through the minor permit modificationprovision of 40 CFR 122.63. As discussed, this is a reasonable approachbecause, even though these are not minor changes in the POTW's program,they are subject to the full notice and comment procedures of andSection;403.11(b)-(f).Under the final rule, ``non-substantial'' program modifications, althoughnot subject to prior review and public notice, are deemed to be ``approved''by the Approval Authority and thus will also fall within the ambit of 40CFR 122.63. In this way, the Agency has adopted, at least in part, therequest of the environmental group that commented that, since the permitforms the basis for enforcement, the permit should be kept up to date forall modifications to the POTW's program. Since ``non-substantial'' programmodifications do not raise the concerns presented by ``substantial'' programmodifications, it is not necessary to require full notice and comment proceduresand thus the Agency has determined that ``non-substantial'' program modificationscan be treated as minor permit modifications without such procedures. Inthe event that the Approval Authority should determine, upon subsequentreview, to reject ``non-substantial'' program modifications as ``substantial''program modifications, then such program modifications would, of course,then be subject to full notice and comment procedures.Several POTWs recommended setting a time limit for Approval Authority reviewof program modifications. The recommended times ranged from 30 to 90 days.EPA agrees that a time limit for these reviews is desirable to avoid unduedelay in acting on proposed program modifications. Approval Authoritieshave 90 days from the date of public notice to review original programsubmissions (<T3>see, </T3>andSection; 403.11(a)). Since review of modifications to theseprograms after approval can generally be expected to be considerably lesscomplicated than review for original program approval, 60 days is a reasonableperiod for reviewing such modifications, especially in view of the importanceof avoiding delay in implementing necessary modifications. Therefore, theAgency is also modifying andSection; 403.11(a) to impose a 60-day time limiton Approval Authority reveiw of substantial program modifications.Since non-substantial program modifications may be submitted only for reviewby the Approval Authority because they may be numerous and because theyare presumed to result only in incidental changes to a POTW's program,the Approval Authority should have 90 days to review such modificationsto determine whether they need to be resubmitted as substantial programmodifications. The final rule has thus been modified to provide for this.In the event that such program modifications are then resubmitted for approvalas substantial program modifications, the Agency will then have 60 daysto review such modifications, as with other substantial program modifications.Finally, in response to a request from one commenter, EPA emphasizes thatonly those portions of a POTW's program that are being substantially modifiedare subject to public notice. This is consistent with the procedures formodifying NPDES permits (<T3>see, </T3>40 CFR 122.62, 40 CFR Part 124).d. <T3>Today's rule. </T3>The final rule has been modified from the proposedrule in the following respects: (1) Prior approval is required only for``substantial'' modifications; (2) the list of identified ``substantial''modifications has been expanded to include changes to <T3>all </T3>local limits (not only those contained in a local ordinance)resulting in less stringent local limits, changes to the POTW's legal authorities(in addition to changes in the POTW's enforcement authorities), a decreasein the frequency of industrial user inspections or sampling by the POTW,a decrease in the frequency of self-monitoring or reporting required ofindustrial users, changes to the POTW's confidentiality procedures, significantreductions in the POTW's program resources (including personnel commitments,equipment, and funding levels), and changes in the POTW's sludge disposaland management practices; (3) the determination of whether a particularmodification not included on the list of ``substantial'' modificationsnonetheless meets the specified criteria for being classified as such wouldbe made in the first instance by the POTW, subject to later review by theApproval Authority; (4) non-substantial modifications are required to bereported to the Approval Authority at least 30 days prior to implementationsubject to subsequent review by the Approval Authority within 90 days;and (5) the Approval Authority has 60 days to review substantial programmodifications. The final rule also provides that the Approval Authoritymay designate as ``substantial'' other specific modifications in additionto those listed in the rule. The Agency is also finalizing the change toandSection; 122.63, by adding new paragraph (g), as proposed.C. POTW and State Pretreatment Program Approval<ITAG tagnum="81">1. POTW Pretreatment Program and Removal Credit Application Submission_ApprovalAuthority Action [40 CFR 403.9(e)]</ITAG>a. <T3>Existing rule. </T3>A POTW seeking pretreatment program approval mustsubmit to the Approval Authority certain information described in andSection;403.9(b), including a statement certifying that the POTW has adequate authorityto carry out the program, copies of all relevant legal authorities, a descriptionof the POTW's organization for administering the program, and a discussionof resources available for program implementation. POTWs applying for removalcredit authority must submit an application containing the informationrequired in andSection; 403.7(e) including a list of pollutants for whichremoval credits are proposed, data on the POTW's consistent removal ofthese pollutants, proposed revised limits, a certification that the POTWhas an approved pretreatment program, a description of the POTW's sludgeuse and disposal methods, and a certification that granting removal creditswill not cause a violation of the POTW's NPDES permit. The procedures forApproval Authority review of and action on these requests are the same.After receiving the applicable submission(s), the Approval Authority isrequired to make a preliminary determination of whether the submissioncontains all the items required under andSection; 403.9(b) or, if appropriate,andSection; 403.7(e). If the submission is determined to be complete, theApproval Authority must notify the POTW and initiate the public noticeand review procedures set forth in andSection; 403.11. Following public comment,the Approval Authority completes its review of the program submission andissues its final determination. The regulations require the Approval Authorityto issue its final decision within 90 days, unless the comment period isextended beyond 30 days, in which case the Approval Authority shall havean additional 90 days to complete its review. However, the existing regulationsdo not specify how much time the Approval Authority has in which to makeits initial completeness determination.b. <T3>Proposed change</T3>. PIRT's final report stated that the lack of adeadline for the Approval Authority's completeness determination for POTWPretreatment Program and removal credit submissions has led to unnecessarydelays. To address this perceived problem, PIRT recommended that the ApprovalAuthority shall have 60 days from the date of a POTW pretreatment programor removal credit application to determine whether this submission meetsthe applicable requirements of paragraphs (b) and (d) of andSection; 403.9.The Agency agreed with this finding, and proposed to add such a 60-daytime limit. The proposed time limit, in conjunction with current time periodsfor final Approval Authority action, should help ensure that local programand removal credit requests are acted on within a maximum of 240 days,assuming the request is complete.c. <T3>Response to comments. </T3>Nine commenters submitted comments on thisproposed change. Six of the nine fully supported this change to help ensuretimely completion of Approval Authority action on pretreatment programor removal credits authority requests. These six commenters included POTWs,industries, an industry association, and an environmental group.One Approval Authority was opposed to this change, citing its current workload,and stating that ``it is unlikely that adequate review of pretreatmentprogram submittals can consistently be accomplished in 60 days * * * .''As noted above, the Agency agreed with the PIRT finding and proposed the60-day deadline for completeness determinations. The Agency does not believethat this will be a significant burden on Approval Authorities. This changewill only require that an Approval Authority review a submission for completeness,not adequacy. The Agency does not expect that the Approval Authority willbe able to state at the end of the 60 days whether the program submittedis approved, only that the submission is complete.One POTW and one industry group submitted comments on this proposed regulatorychange that questioned the legal status of removal credits. This issueis discussed below in the response to comments for Approval Proceduresfor POTW Pretreatment Programs and POTW Revisions of Categorical Standards.This change only pertains to the timing of completeness determinationson removal credits applications, not whether such applications are allowed.d. <T3>Today's rule.</T3> EPA is promulgating this change as proposed.<ITAG tagnum="81">C. 2. Approval of State Pretreatment Programs_State Regulations [40CFR 403.10(g)(1)(iii)]  </ITAG>a. <T3>Existing rule. </T3>The CWA amendments of 1977 required that all StateNPDES programs include pretreatment programs. For new State programs, apretreatment program must be included as part of the NPDES submission.Approved NPDES States were required to request modification to includepretreatment by March 27, 1980 (andSection;403.10(b)). The Water QualityAct (WQA) of 1987 amends this requirement to allow partial program approvalsprovided certain requirements are met. The requirements would allow approvalof NPDES authority without pretreatment program submission. However, theWQA also requires that where a partial program is approved, the programbe part of a phased effort resulting in complete assumption of all aspectsof the program within five years.  In general, States seeking approval of pretreatment programs must havedetailed regulations in place before program approval. However, under andSection;403.10(g)(1)(iii),EPA may authorize an NPDES State to operate a pretreatment program withoutimplementing regulations in effect if the State has sufficiently detailedstatutory authority and has submitted a detailed description of the proceduresby which it proposes to implement the program. There is no comparable provisionin the NPDES regulations, which require all implementing regulations tobe in effect prior to NPDES program approval. (<T3>See,</T3> 40 CFR 123.21(a).)  EPA adopted andSection;403.10(g)(1)(iii) in 1980 for several reasons. First,several States suggested that having pretreatment regulations in effectwas not essential to ensure implementation of the pretreatment programin NPDES States that had already demonstrated their ability to carry outa complex NPDES permit program on a statewide level. Second, the delayresulting in some cases from the promulgation of regulations was seen asan impediment to substantial environmental benefits that would follow fromearly approval of State Pretreatment Programs. Third, some of the authoritiesnecessary for successful implementation of the pretreatment program arepart of the NPDES program as well and are encompassed by the State's existingNPDES regulations. For those matters unique to the pretreatment program,EPA believed that a comprehensive statement describing how the State intendedto carry out this portion of the program and indicating the State's readinessto promulgate regulations in the future, in concert with detailed statutoryauthority, would provide sufficient public notice and assurance of theState's authority and intention to carry out the program.  The 1980 revision was intended to facilitate State program approval wherethe State had adequate authorities. Even where States were approved withoutregulations, it was expected that the State would promulgate pretreatmentregulations at a later date. Moreover, EPA recognized that all States wouldneed to revise their NPDES regulations to conform to the May 19, 1980 FinalConsolidated Permits Regulations. The addition of andSection;403.10(g)(1)(iii)allowed States to coordinate those rule changes with promulgation of pretreatmentregulations.  b. <T3>Proposed change.</T3> EPA proposed to delete andSection;403.10(g)(1)(iii),thus requiring all States to have adequate regulations at the time of programapproval. As noted above, under existing regulations, the option of notdeveloping regulations prior to program approval is available only if theState program description fully describes the procedures it intends touse and how it intends to implement each of the required legal authoritiesin the absence of regulations. This also necessitates a detailed discussionof how each of these required legal authorities can be directly appliedand enforced. In addition, the Attorney General's Statement must fullyexplain the State's legal authority, with special emphasis on the directapplicability and enforceability of the State statute without implementingregulations. Obviously, a State can only meet this burden if the statuteis so detailed as to be ``self-implementing.''  EPA's experience has shown that it is highly unlikely that a State willhave sufficiently detailed statutory authority to operate a pretreatmentprogram without implementing regulations. In those States whose programswere approved without regulations in effect, problems have arisen, particularlywith regard to enforcement of categorical pretreatment standards againstindustrial users. One State that has since developed regulations informedEPA that it found it could not enforce its pretreatment program, notwithstandingthe commitments in its program description. In its Final Report to theAdministrator, PIRT noted these problems and recommended that andSection;403.10(g)(1)(iii)be deleted. EPA agreed with the Task Force's recommendation and proposedto delete this provision. In deleting andSection;403.10(g)(1)(iii), the Agencyintended that pretreatment regulations would be made consistent with theNPDES regulations and that, in the future, States reguesting approval oftheir State pretreatment programs would have to have all necessary implementingregulations in place before their programs can be approved. In addition,those approved States lacking pretreatment regulations would have to promulgateregulations were the absence makes their program deficient under the revisedandSection;403.10.  c. <T3>Response to comments.</T3> EPA received several comments regardingthis proposed regulation. One Control Authority and two national environmentalinterest groups supported this change. The Control Authority merely statedthat the change seemed reasonable, although it had no effect on that Authority.One environmental interest group cited its litigation against a State pretreatmentprogram that did not have effective regulations as the obvious reason whythis change was needed. Another environmental group supported the proposedrevisions based on the recommendations at pages 66 and 67 of the PIRT report. The one environmental group also stated that the Agency should allow nomore than 30 days for States with approved pretreatment programs that donot have sufficient regulations to submit regulations to rectify the situtation.This group believes the 30-day time period is justified for three reasons:(1) It is the deadline recommended by PIRT; (2) it is the deadline mandatedby Congress in the CWA; and (3) States have had almost seven years to adoptthe necessary regulations and should not be rewarded for recalcitrance.One State Approval Authority also suggested that the Agency establish atime frame for deficient State pretreatment programs to promulgate regulations.The commenter suggested that the Agency keep in mind that regulation developmentat the State level is a lengthy process. EPA agrees with the commentersthat a time frame for adopting State regulations is necessary, but doesnot agree with the commenter that 30 days is a sufficient time period forpromulgating new State regulations. EPA's State NPDES program regulationsalready require State programs to establish regulations or amend statuteswithin certain time periods after federal regulations or statutes are amended.(<T3>See,</T3> 40 CFR 123.62(e).) Adoption of State pretreatment regulationsshould be consistent with the NPDES regulations. Thus, the Agency is todaypromulgating a requirement in andSection;403.10(g) that a State establishpretreatment regulations within one year from the effective date of today'srule, unless a statutory change is required in which case regulations mustbe in place within two years after the effective date of today's rule. One State Approval Authority recommended that EPA not go forward with thisproposed change. That Authority stated that the current requirements areadequate to determine if a State program can be approved, and that therequirement to have State regulations in place could unnecessarily delayimplementation of the program. EPA does not agree with this commenter.As noted above in section (b), the Agency has received information andis convinced that State pretreatment programs cannot be run effectivelywithout implementing regulations in place.  d. <T3>Today's rule.</T3> The Agency is amending andSection;403.10(g) as proposed,and adding the requirement that States promulgate necessary regulationswithin one year after the effective date of today's rule, unless a statutorychange is necessary in which case regulation must be adopted within twoyears after the effective date of today's rule.<ITAG tagnum="81">C.3. Approval Procedures for POTW Pretreatment Programs and POTW Revisionsof Categorical Standards [40 CFR 403.11(b)]</ITAG>a. <T3>Existing rule. </T3>Section 403.11 sets out the procedures for approvingPOTW pretreatment programs and applications for removal credit authority.Upon receipt of a local program submission or removal credit application,the Approval Authority must first determine whether the submission is complete.The elements of a complete submission are set out in andSection; 403.9(b)for POTW program approvals and andSection;andSection; 403.7(e) and 403.9(d)for removal credits. After determining that a submission is complete, theApproval Authority must provide notice and an opportunity to request apublic hearing. Section 403.11(b) requires issuance of the public noticewithin 5 days after the completeness determination.b. <T3>Proposed change. </T3>PIRT recommended changing the 5-day time limitfor issuing public notice following a completeness determination to 20work days. PIRT concluded that 5 days was too short because Approval Authorityprocedures are often not sufficiently expeditious to meet that limit. EPAagreed with PIRT's recommendation and the 20-day limit recommended by PIRT.c. <T3>Response to comments. </T3>Commenters included a POTW, an industry,a trade association, a State and an environmental group. Most supportedthe proposal. The State commenter, however, felt that the time period forissuing public notice following a completeness determination should beextended to 45 instead of 20 days. The commenter maintained that more timeis needed to accommodate all necessary interactions with the public andinternal communications.EPA maintains that PIRT's original recommendation of 20 days is adequatefor issuing public notice of POTW pretreatment program submission and applicationsfor removal credit authority after a completeness determination. As statedin the preamble to the proposed rule, the 20-day time limit is more realisticthan a 5-day limit while still conforming to the basic intent of providingprompt public notice of submissions that are under Agency review. The Statecommenter did not provide any details as to why 45 days was required. Inthe absence of such information, it is appropriate to follow PIRT's recommendation.One commenter noted that the proposed language referring to andSection; 403.7(c),which covers provisional removal credits, requires clarification. The proposedlanguage requires public notice within 20 days after ``the approval authorityelects to review the removal allowance submission.'' The commenter requestedclarification of when the approval authority election is triggered. Thereference to andSection; 403.7(c) in the proposal was an error. The intendedsection is andSection; 403.7(d), which allows POTWs required to develop pretreatmentprograms to conditionally grant removal credits subject to certain termsand conditions. Section 403.7(d)(6) allows the Approval Authority to delayreview of conditional removal credit applications, with the conditionallyrevised limits remaining in effect until such review is conducted. Thelanguage in the proposed rule was intended to provide for such delayedreview. However, because the vast majority of required POTW pretreatmentprograms have already been approved, and in light of the recent decisionby the United States Court of Appeals for the Third Circuit striking downthe existing removal credit provision (andSection; 403.7), <T3>Natural Resources Defense Council, Inc. v. EPA, </T3>780 F.2d 289 (3dCir. 1986), the Agency has decided to delete this reference from the finalrule.d. <T3>Today's rule. </T3>EPA is promulgating the rule as proposed, exceptthat the language referencing andSection; 403.7(c) has been deleted.D. Reporting and Compliance Monitoring<ITAG tagnum="81">1. Baseline Monitoring Report_Deadline for New Sources [40 CFR 403.12(b)]</ITAG>a. <T3>Existing rule. </T3>To establish an effective local pretreatment program,it is essential that the POTW have complete information on the nature andquantity of pollutants contributed by each of its industrial users. Section403.12(b) requires that all industrial users, including new sources, thatare subject to categorical pretreatment standards submit baseline monitoringreports (``BMRs'') to the Control Authority. These reports supply basicinformation to identify each contributing industrial user, the characteristicsof the user's discharge and the user's compliance status. Information requiredto be reported in BMRs includes: a list of environmental control permitsheld by the industrial user, a description of the user's operations, informationon flow and amounts of regulated pollutants discharged to the POTW, anda certification of whether the user is currently in compliance with theapplicable categorical standard(s). If the industrial user is not in compliancewhen the BMR is prepared, the report must also include a compliance scheduleshowing the shortest time by which compliance will be achieved. The baselinemonitoring report does not apply to discharges not covered by categoricalstandards. Elsewhere in today's rulemaking, EPA is clarifying that POTWsshould require such reports where the POTW determines that informationon these discharges is necessary.Section 403.12(b) requires industrial users to submit BMRs to the ControlAuthority within 180 days after the effective date of the applicable categoricalstandard, or within 180 days after a final decision on a category determinationrequest, whichever is later. However, there is no deadline specified fornew sources. Nor does andSection; 403.12(b) contain a deadline for submissionof BMRs by directly discharging existing sources that become indirect dischargerssubsequent to the promulgation of an applicable categorical pretreatmentstandard.b. <T3>Proposed change. </T3>EPA proposed to revise andSection; 403.12(b) torequire new sources, and existing sources that become industrial userssubsequent to the promulgation of an applicable categorical standard, tosubmit a baseline monitoring report at least 90 days prior to commencementof the facility's discharge to a POTW. EPA also proposed to clarify thatfor new sources, the industrial user may provide estimates for the informationon production, flow and the presence and quantity of regulated pollutantsin its wastestream requested in andSection; 403.12(b) (3)-(5).EPA recognized that BMRs submitted by new sources under the proposed deadlinecannot be complete; for instance, new sources cannot certify whether theywill be in compliance with applicable categorical standards because theyhave not yet commenced discharge. For this reason, the regulations didnot require new sources to include a compliance certification or complianceschedule in their BMRs. Similarly, new sources cannot monitor the flowor pollutant constituents and concentrations of their wastestreams, norcan they provide actual production data. However, an industrial user thatis a new source can, and under the proposal would be required to, provideestimated data on these items. This information would allow the ControlAuthority to assess the potential impact of the new source on the POTW,the receiving waters into which the POTW discharges and current and alternativesludge use or disposal options. The Control Authority could also use thisinformation to make a preliminary determination of whether additional limitsbeyond those in the applicable categorical pretreatment standard (i.e.,local limits) will be necessary to prevent pass-through and interferenceat the POTW. In some cases, the POTW may need to set more stringent locallimits on other contributors to the system to avoid permit violations.Early submission of this information provides the POTW adequate time todetermine whether such steps are needed. Without such estimates, the POTWwould only learn too late that local limits were needed to avoid a permitviolation.c. <T3>Response to comments. </T3>EPA received comments from numerous POTWs,several industries, two States, an environmental group and a Federal agency.Most of the commenters supported the proposal. However, several commentersexpressed opposition to various aspects of the proposal.Two commenters found the 90-day time period to be inadequate. One of thesecommenters gave no support for its position, but the other, an environmentalgroup, argued that there would be substantial political pressure on thePOTW to allow start-up of a new facility 90 days prior to the planned commencementof operations, even if a violation of the POTW's permit would result. Thecommenter suggested that instead of 90 days, EPA require 6 to 12 months'notice to the POTW by new dischargers to the system. EPA realizes thatin some cases political pressure might be present, particularly where newconstruction is involved. However, the Agency feels this factor is adequatelyaddressed by making 90 days the minimum amount of time required betweensubmittal of a BMR and commencement of discharge. Based on the other commentsreceived on this issue, it is the Agency's belief that in most cases 90days will allow sufficient time for the POTW to ensure that the proposeddischarge is acceptable and will not cause permit violations or other problemsat the POTW. Of course, where 90 days is not adequate, the POTW shouldrequire earlier submittal of the BMR. In all cases, EPA encourages theearliest possible contact between the POTW and new dischargers to its systemprior to the commencement of discharge. This is especially important incases of new construction, where various pressures are more likely becauseof the relatively large investment involved.Three POTWs commented that 90 days is not always necessary, and that ashorter time period may be appropriate in some cases. One POTW expressedconcern that the industrial user would be unnecessarily burdened wherea shorter time is sufficient. Another POTW contended it would be illogicalto require submittal of the BMR earlier than a permit application (e.g.,where the POTW requires that permit applications be submitted less than90 days prior to discharge). Two of the commenters felt the time periodshould be left to the POTW's discretion. One commenter recommended thatthe BMR deadline should be either: (1) At least 90 days prior to discharge,or (2) at the time an application for a sewer connection permit, buildingpermit, or plumbing permit is made.Although in some cases a shorter period may be adequate, based on all thecomments received, 90 days is a reasonable minimum. To avoid having differentdeadlines for BMRs and permit applications, POTWs with permit applicationdeadlines of less than 90 days may want to lengthen these deadlines tomatch the BMR deadline. (Making these deadlines coincide in all cases maynot be possible, however, because the appropriate BMR submittal deadlinemay vary from case to case, depending, for instance, on whether new constructionis involved.)Two commenters suggested that BMRs for new sources should include informationon the proposed pretreatment, if any, a new source plans to install. EPAagrees with this suggestion and is modifying the final rule to includethis requirement. This will assist the POTW to more thoroughly assess thepotential impact on the POTW and the facility's ability to achieve compliancewith applicable standards.A State commented that it seems unnecessary to require new sources to estimatethe concentration of pollutants for purposes of the BMR, which would probablybe very difficult and provide only a rough estimate, since actual datais required in the compliance report submitted 90 days after commencementof discharge. This comment overlooks the fact that the POTW needs somepreliminary information on the nature of the industrial user's discharge,whether actual or estimated, in order to be able to make an initial determinationof appropriate discharge limits prior to the industrial user's commencingdischarge. With new sources, this will necessarily be estimated information.When actual data is received in the 90-day compliance report, it will beused to adjust the industrial user's limits as necessary.Finally, an industrial commenter noted that andSection; 403.12(b) does notrequire resubmittal of information in a BMR if the information has previouslybeen submitted to the State Director or the Regional Administrator in compliancewith 40 CFR 128.140(b) (1977), an earlier reporting requirement predatingthe Part 403 pretreatment regulations. The commenter stated that existingindustrial users that become part of an industrial category (e.g., throughpromulgation of an applicable categorical standard) may already have reportedsome of the required BMR information to the POTW, and should not be requiredto resubmit such data in a BMR.The old regulatory provision cited by the commenter contained certain reportingrequirements for industrial users. These required reports were to be submittedto either the State Director or the Regional Administrator. When the currentPart 403 pretreatment regulations were initially promulgated, a provisionwas included so that industrial users that had submitted information underthe old Part 128 provision would not be required to resubmit this dataas part of their BMR under andSection; 403.12(b) of the new regulations.However, there was no provision in the old regulations regarding submittalof reports to the POTW. The commenter, however, wants to extend the allowancefor previously submitted information in andSection; 403.12(b) to includeany data previously submitted to the POTW. EPA declines to follow thissuggestion. The old regulatory provision contained specific reporting requirementsfor industrial users. To compile current BMR data on an industrial userwho had submitted reports under this provision, the POTW need only compileat most a relatively small number of documents. However, under the commenter'ssuggested approach, the POTW may need to retrieve numerous documents submittedover time by the industrial user, each of which may contain only a smallfragment of the required BMR data. The considerable burden this may representfor the POTW outweighs any inconvenience to the industrial user of resubmittingsome previously submitted data.d. <T3>Today's rule.</T3> EPA is promulgating the rule as proposed, exceptthat BMRs for new sources will now be required to include information onthe pretreatment equipment the new source proposes to install to meet inapplicabledischarge limits. Again, it should be emphasized that the 90-day BMR deadlinefor new sources (and sources that become industrial users after promulgationof an applicable categorical pretreatment standard) is a minimum. The POTWmay (and should) require earlier submission where appropriate. The Agencyalso wishes to reemphasize the importance of early contact between thePOTW and new dischargers to its system, particularly in cases involvingnew construction.<ITAG tagnum="81">D.2. Measurement of Pollutants [40 CFR 403.12(b)(5)(iv)]</ITAG>a. <T3>Existing rule.</T3> Section 403.12(b)(5)(iv) establishes the frequencywith which an industrial user must sample and analyze its wastestream tocompile data for its baseline monitoring report (BMR). Under the presentscheme, an industrial user must take multiple samples of each regulatedwastestream, with the frequencies determined by the flow of those streamsbeing sampled. Where the flow of the stream being sampled is less thanor equal to 250,000 gallons per day, the industrial user must take threesamples within a one-week period. Where the flow of the stream being sampledis greater than 250,000 gallons per day, the industrial user must takesix samples wtihin a two-week period. Each of these samples must be analyzedseparately and the data submitted on the baseline monitoring report. Thepurpose of this sampling is to provide information to determine whetherthe industrial user is in compliance with the applicable categorical pretreatmentstandard(s).b. <T3>Proposed change.</T3> EPA proposed to reduce the baseline samplingrequirements for industrial users and set a uniform, minimum sampling requirementapplicable to all industrial users. The proposal required that at a minimum,for purposes of compiling data for the baseline report, only one samplinganalysis of pollutants would be needed. The proposal would not alter therequired sampling techniques (e.g., 24-hour composite sampling), as providedin andSection; 403.12(b)(5)(iii).A pretreatment baseline report is comparable to the industry NPDES permitapplication form direct dischargers (e.g., form 2C). Both are means ofcollecting preliminary information about the particular facility and itsdischarge, and are used as a basis for determining whether additional stepsneed to be taken to achieve compliance with applicable discharge limits.Only one sampling and analysis of the specific pollutants is required forthe NPDES permit application [40 CFR 122.21(g)(7)]. The proposed changeto the BMR sampling requirement would, therefore, bring it in line withthat required by its counterpart in the NPDES program.As noted in the preamble, the proposed amendment could significantly reducethe paperwork burden associated with baseline monitoring reports withoutimpairing EPA's ability to identify and control pollutants. A single samplinganalysis is generally adequate to provide Control Authorities with a preliminarypicture of an industrial user's processes and wastestream characteristics.However, in more variable industries, more sampling may be necessary toensure that the Control Authority obtains representative data. The singlesampling proposed was intended to be a minimum. If the Control Authoritydetermines that additional data and sampling are needed to evaluate theimpact of the user's discharge or to set local limits, it can, and should,require such analysis. To determine compliance with categorical standards,the Control Authority will use an industrial user's self-monitoring programconducted by the Control Authority. The reduced sampling for the baselinereport will not affect other sampling and analysis requirements.c. <T3>Response to comments.</T3> Twenty-six responses were received on theproposal to reduce the minimum number of samples needed for a BMR.One commenter suggested that the former regulatory minimum of three samplesbe retained unless the industrial user can demonstrate that fewer samplesare sufficient. This suggestion would not be feasible. An industrial userwould be adequate prior to starting any sampling effort. However, the industrialuser might not be able to determine the adequacy of only one or two samplesuntil after the sampling is complete. The current regulation requires thatthe BMR is to be written from data that is collected over a one or twoweek period. This time period might prove to be too short to allow adequateanalysis of the data received from one or two samples. Therefore, in orderto ensure the adequacy of the information, industrial users would performthree (or six) samples anyway. It is better for an industrial user to berequired to perform only one sample unless the Control Authority determinesmore are needed after reviewing the BMR.Several other commenters stated that one sample was not sufficient to providean accurate description of an IU's discharge. The commenters noted thatan industrial user's wastestream can be highly variable, and requestedthat the Agency not change the regulatory requirement of performing three(or six) samples. The Agency is not convinced that a one sample minimumis not adequate. The BMR is meant to serve as a ``snapshot'' of an industrialuser's discharge for purposes of ascertaining the compliance potentialof the facility with the categorical pretreatment standards applicableto that facility. BMRs may also be used by an industrial user to requesta compliance schedule to meet the mandatory pretreatment standards. TheControl Authority has many other sources of information about the industrialuser's discharge including EPA-issued guidance and development documentsfor the categorical industries, and information from BMRs submitted forsimilar facilities discharging to the Control Authority's POTW(s). Theinformation in these documents can be compared to the information in theBMR from an industrial user so that the Control Authority can determinewhether the BMR data accurately reflects discharges from the facility orwhether further sampling is required. Where the data submitted with a BMRindicates the discharge is similar to that expected from that type of industry(as delineated in the development document, guidance document, or anotherBMR), then no further sampling should be needed. However, where the datacontained in a BMR is vastly different from that contained in the references,then further sampling would be indicated. Furthermore, this system would be more likely to obtain better informationon the nature of an industrial user's discharge. As these commenters noted,an industrial user's discharge can be highly variable. Three samples ina one week period (or six samples in two weeks) may not detect this variability.However, a POTW could specify a sampling protocol that would more effectivelydetect the variability in this discharge. Two commenters stated that because most BMRs have already been submitted,this change will either reward recalcitrant industrial users, or is moot.Although it would appear that this change rewards recalcitrant industrialusers, those that have missed deadlines for submission of BMRs are subjectto enforcement actions for failure to comply with the pretreatment requirements.Several commenters made some suggestions as to points needing further clarification.One Control Authority stated that it does the BMR sampling and that itwill do more sampling as appropriate. Another commenter suggested thatthe industrial user should be given the option of doing more sampling withoutbeing asked by the Control Authority. Nothing in the proposed regulationwould prevent a POTW from sampling an industrial user in lieu of the industrysampling its wastestream. Nor would it limit the amount of samples an industrialuser may perform. The requirement of andSection;403.12(b)(5) is a minimumrequirement. However, where an industrial user decides to sample more thanonce for the BMR, this fact and the total number of samples taken shouldbe noted on the BMR so that the Control Authority can better analyze thedata. Two commenters requested that EPA clarify that further sampling could berequired by the Control Authority; another commenter suggested that theregulatory language be changed so that further sampling would be requiredif one sample was found to be inadequate. The language in the proposalclearly establishes that the single sample is a minimum requirement. Thepreamble to the June 1986 proposal, today's preamble and these responsesto comments should be read together to indicate that further sampling isnot prohibited if one sample proves to be inadequate. Nothing in any ofthis language indicates a prohibition on a Control Authority requiringfurther sampling. In fact, the Agency encourages Control Authorities torequire more sampling if they find that the one sample is inadequate. However,the Agency does not agree that further testing by an industrial user shouldbe made mandatory because this could constrain several options that a ControlAuthority might want to pursue after determining that a single sample isinadequate. For instance, after making the inadequacy determination, aControl Authority might want to perform further sampling itself, or havean outside contract laboratory do the work. Therefore, the Agency has chosennot to include the suggested language. d. <T3>Today's rule. </T3>EPA is promulgating this rule as proposed.<ITAG tagnum="81">D.3. Sampling Techniques [40 CFR 403.12(b)(5)(iii)] </ITAG>a. <T3>Existing rule. </T3>Section 403.12(b)(5)(iii) provides that, wherefeasible, the samples required in preparing an industrial user's baselinemonitoring report must be obtained using ``the flow-proportional compositesampling techniques specified in the applicable categorical PretreatmentStandard.'' Where composite sampling is not feasible, industrial usersmay take a single grab sample instead of each required composite sample.b. <T3>Proposed change. </T3>In its Final Report to the Administrator, PIRTpointed out that the categorical pretreatment standards do not specifyrequired sampling techniques. Accordingly, EPA proposed to revise andSection;403.12(b)(5)(iii)to correct this error. The proposal required that, except for five namedpollutants, the industrial user must obtain 24-hour composite samples throughflow-proportioned techniques where feasible. For five pollutants_pH, cyanide, total phenols, oil and grease, and sulfide_theproposal required the use of grab samples. These pollutants are subjectto rapid degradation and therefore cannot be accurately sampled through24-hour composite methods. The proposal made the sampling requirementsof the General Pretreatment Regulations consistent with the NPDES regulations.The NPDES rules require the use of 24-hour composite samples in permitapplications, except for seven pollutants for which grab sampling mustbe used (pH, temperature, cyanide, total phenols, residual chlorine, oiland grease, and fecal coliform). (40 CFR 122.21(g)(7).) Unlike the NPDESrules, temperature, residual chlorine and fecal coliform were not includedon the list of pollutants for which grab samples are required because theyare not regulated under categorical pretreatment standards and thus neednot be reported on the BMR. EPA did propose to add sulfide, which is notincluded in the NPDES provision, since it is regulated under categoricalstandards and tends to rapidly oxidize and/or volatilize. PIRT also recommended that time-proportional sampling be allowed whereflow-proportional automatic sampling is not feasible. In support of itsrecommendation, the Task Force stated that time-proportioned samples, whilenot as accurate as flow-proportioned samples, are more representative ofan industrial user's daily discharge than the single grab sample currentlyallowed in the regulation. In response to PIRT's recommendation, EPA proposed to change the type ofsampling that will be allowed by industrial users where flow-proportionedcomposite sampling is not feasible to allow time-proportioned or grab sampling.Under today's proposal, the industrial user must demonstrate to the ControlAuthority that the use of an automatic sampler is infeasible and that time-proportionalsampling or grab sampling will provide a representative sample of the effluentbeing discharged. The proposal also would require the Control Authorityto make the determination of whether flow-proportional sampling is feasible.Where the Control Authority determines that flow-proportional samplingis infeasible, it would waive the requirements and allow grab or time-proportionalsampling. Consistent with recent revisions to the NPDES regulations (49FR 38046, September 26, 1984) EPA also proposed to amend andSection;403.12(b)(5)(iii)to provide that where grab sampling is used, a minimum of four grab samplesmust be taken. c. <T3>Response to comments. </T3>EPA received comments from 24 entities onthese proposed regulation revisions. Eight of the commenters stated thatthey were in favor of the proposal and three commenters stated that theywere not in favor of the proposal. The remaining thirteen commenters seemedto favor the intent of the proposal, but suggested major changes be madeto the proposed regulation. It appears that several of the commenters inthis last group were confused about the application of this provision.These commenters thought that the provision applied to samples taken forcompliance monitoring by an industrial user. However, this provision appliesto sampling performed by an industrial user in developing the baselinemonitoring report for the facility. The Agency has decided to promulgate the regulation as proposed with onlyminor revisions as suggested by some of these commenters. The intent ofthe proposed regulation revision was to remove the requirement in the existingregulation that an industrial user must use ``the flow-proportional compositesampling techniques specified in the applicable categorical PretreatmentStandard.'' This change was being made in response to a PIRT notation thatPretreatment Standards do not specify any required sampling techniques.Although the proposal dropped the reference to the pretreatment standards,it incorporated the requirement that an industrial user use flow-proportionaltechniques except when sampling for five specific pollutants: pH, cyanide,total phenols, oil and grease, and sulfide, where grab samples would beallowed. Almost all of the commenters on this provision noted that certainpollutants should or should not be sampled by a particular technique (e.g.,total toxic organics should be sampled by a grab sample, pH can be sampledby other than a grab sample, and volatile organics should be a grab sample).The Agency agrees that volatile organics are more properly sampled by grabsampling. Therefore, today's final rule adds volatile organics to the listof pollutants to be sampled by a grab sample. The Agency has taken thisstep to alleviate the confusion over whether volatile organics are moreappropriately sampled as a grab sample or composite sample. If a POTW orIndustrial User needs further information on what type of sample shouldbe obtained, the methods described on pages 3-21 and 3-22 in the ``PretreatmentCompliance Monitoring and Enforcement Guidance'' (1986) discuss when time-proportionalor grab samples may be used for sampling wastewater pollutants at an industrialuser's facility. One clarification that the Agency would make regarding the proposal isin defining the term ``infeasible.'' The PIRT recommendation centered onthe infeasibility of flow-proportional sampling. The problem identifiedwas not with the ability to get a sample, but rather in the inability tomeasure flow through the industrial user's sewer connection. The Agency'sexperience, as verified by the PIRT recommendation, is that the infeasibleaspect of flow-proportional sampling is the measurement of the flow. Inmany instances, time-proportioned sampling will use the same automaticsampler as used in flow-proportional sampling. However, because a flowmeteris not required, time-proportional sampling can be performed. Today's final rule allows the use of time-proportional automatic or individualgrab sampling where it is infeasible to monitor flow or perform flow-proportionalsampling. The only requirement is that the sampling be representative ofthe facility's discharge. The only time grab sampling is required is forthe six pollutants listed. d. <T3>Today's rule. </T3>EPA has altered the proposed provision to reflectthe commenters' concerns regarding specific pollutants. The final ruleclarifies that four (4) grab samples are required for the listed pollutants,and the list has been expanded to include volatile organics. Time-proportionalor grab sampling is allowed if flow-proportioned sampling is not feasible,including where flow metering is not feasible. Otherwise, flow-proportionalmonitoring is required. <ITAG tagnum="81">D.4. Annual POTW Reports [40 CFR 403.12(i)]</ITAG>a. <T3>Existing rule.</T3> As a means to oversee the implementation of POTWpretreatment programs, EPA and many approved States usually include inthe POTW's NPDES permit a condition requiring that the POTW periodicallysubmit a report describing its program implementation activities duringthe period covered by the report. These permit conditions, which are insertedat the time the conditions of the approved program are added, generallyrequire the submission of an annual report. These reports are typicallyrequired to include an update of the POTW's industrial user population,information on the compliance status of the industrial users, informationon the POTW's compliance monitoring and enforcement activities, and informationon modifications to the POTW's approved pretreatment program. The majorityof POTWs with approved programs have conditions requiring such reportsin their NPDES permits. Although these permit conditions are authorizedby law (<T3>see</T3>, sections 402(b)(8) and 308 of the CWA) the General PretreatmentRegulations do not contain a specific provision describing the contentsof the reports POTWs should submit on the status of their pretreatmentprogram implementation.b. <T3>Proposed change.</T3> PIRT recommended that EPA set forth in the GeneralPretreatment Regulations the requirement of an annual POTW report for allPOTWs with pretreatment programs. This report would be submitted to theApproval Authority and would describe program implementation activitiesconducted by the POTW during the preceding year. The Task Force statedthat such a report is essential to the adequate oversight by the ApprovalAuthority, whether EPA or approved States, of POTW pretreatment programs.By describing the annual report in the regulations, a greater degree ofuniformity will be ensured among the reports submitted to Approval Authorities.In response to PIRT's recommendation, EPA proposed to add a new paragraph(i) to andSection; 403.12 requiring each POTW with an approved pretreatmentprogram to submit a report to the Approval Authority at least annuallydescribing program implementation activities. (The submission date willbe set in the POTW's NPDES permit.) Under the proposed rule, the reportwould contain, among other things, an updated list of the POTW's industrialusers (or a list of additions and deletions keyed to a previous list) showingthe categorical pretreatment standards and/or local limits applicable toeach, a summary of the compliance status of each industrial user over theperiod covered by the report, a summary of compliance monitoring and enforcementactivities (including inspections) conducted by the POTW during the reportingperiod, and any other information requested by the Approval Authority,as appropriate for adequate oversight of the POTW's pretreatment program.This information would provide the Approval Authority with the means toeffectively perform its oversight responsibilities with respect to thePOTW pretreatment programs within its jurisdiction. By adding the provisionto the regulations, all such reports would be required to contain at leastthe same minimum information, thus providing some consistency. Of course,the Approval Authority could impose such other requirements as may be necessaryor appropriate.The proposed rule also referenced additional information on these reportsmade available in EPA's ``Pretreatment Compliance Monitoring and EnforcementGuidance'' (1986). By expressly providing for adequate oversight in thisway, the obligations of EPA, the State, and POTWs with respect to the implementationof the national pretreatment program could be met more effectively.c. <T3>Response to comments.</T3> The majority of commenters on this issuewere POTWs. Comments were also received from several States, two environmentalgroups and one industry. All of the commenters supported the annual reportconcept. Many of them supported the provision as proposed. Several othersoffered comments on various aspects of the proposal, including the scopeof the report, the relationship of annual reports to audits, terms requiringdefinition or clarification, the degree of Approval Authority discretionallowed, resource implications, and the usefulness of a standardized formfor annual reports.Three commenters suggested that the coverage of the report be limited toa certain group of industrial users. One of the commenters recommendedlimiting the report to ``significant'' industrial users, and leaving thedefinition of ``significant'' to the Control Authority. Another commenterpreferred that the report be limited to categorical industrial users. Thethird commenter recommended limiting the required compliance monitoringand enforcement information to ``significant violators,'' but did not definethis term. The new regulatory requirement provides sufficient flexibilityfor making appropriate judgments concerning which industrial users shouldbe included in the summary of compliance status and enforcement activitiessections of POTWs' annual reports (andSection; 403.12(i) (2) and (3)). The``Pretreatment Compliance Monitoring and Enforcement Guidance'' (1986)provides a recommended definition of ``significant industrial user'' toassist in making these judgments.This does not, however, affect the requirement of andSection; 403.12(i)(1)that the annual report must contain an updated list of all industrial usersor (optional for a POTW that has previously submitted a list of its industrialusers to its approval authority) a list of additions and deletions keyedto a previously submitted list. Section 403.12(i)(1) also requires thePOTW to provide a brief explanation of each deletion. This does not requirea detailed explanation. A brief, one-line answer in the section of theAnnual Report on delisting will suffice. This rule does not require approvalor disapproval of such deletions by the Approval Authority.Another commenter recommended that POTW pretreatment program audits conductedby the Approval Authority should be used instead of annual reports to evaluateprogram implementation because the reports do not always represent a truepicture of the POTW program's effectiveness or inefficiencies. This commenterapparently misunderstands the relationship between audits and annual reports.These two activities play related but distinct roles in the national pretreatmentprogram. The annual report supplies basic information on industrial usercompliance and POTW compliance monitoring and enforcement activities duringthe year. The audit is a more detailed evaluation of the POTW's program,including the adequacy of the underlying legal authorities and procedures.The purpose of the annual report is to provide a relatively brief self-assessmentof the POTW's performance in implementing its program. The audit is a muchcloser look by the Approval Authority at the POTW's program implementation,and also is geared more toward identifying deficiencies in the POTW's programthat need to be corrected. Moreover, the annual report is required to besubmitted at least annually, while the minimum audit frequency is onceevery five years. Because of these differences, EPA does not agree withthe commenter that audits should be used in lieu of annual reports anddeclines to follow this recommendation in the final rule promulgated today.Two commenters requested more specificity with respect to the informationrequired to be included in annual reports, and in particular the type ofinformation required on industrial user compliance and POTW compliancemonitoring and enforcement activities. The final rule differs in this respectfrom the rule as proposed. Today's regulation does not require a detailedcase-by-case report of IU compliance or of POTW compliance monitoring andenforcement activities. Rather, a composite summary of IU compliance andof POTW compliance monitoring and enforcement activity will suffice. Sucha summary can be reported on a form simply by filling in appropriate boxes.EPA's ``Pretreatment Compliance Monitoring and Enforcement Guidance'' (1986),mentioned above, explains in considerable detail the kind of informationthat should be included in annual reports, including information on industrialuser compliance and POTW monitoring and enforcement activities. ApprovalAuthorities and POTWs should consult this document for guidance on complementingthe regulatory annual report requirement. The guidance includes a modelpretreatment performance summary report form as a suggested format forreporting the information required by andSection; 403.12(i) (2) and (3).Another two commenters objected to the provision in proposed andSection;403.12(i)(4) allowing Approval Authorities to require additional informationin annual reports as being too broad and potentially creating unreasonablepaperwork burdens. EPA does not agree that the provision would result inunreasonable burdens. Any additional information required by the ApprovalAuthority must, under the proposed provision, be ``relevant'' and, as explainedin the preamble to the proposal, ``appropriate for adequate oversight ofthe POTW's pretreatment program.'' (<T3>See</T3>, 51 FR 21469.) Moreover, as is also noted in the preambleto the proposal, the Approval Authority may always impose such other reportingrequirements on its POTWs as it deems necessary or appropriate.One State contended that the proposed amendment would force it to changeits existing requirements for POTW reporting because of a State statutethat does not allow State requirements to be more stringent than federalrequirements. However, the proposed annual report provision states thatthe reports are to be submitted ``at least annually'' and the listed contentsare characterized as the ``minimum'' required. Therefore, States with lawssimilar to the commenter's will not be adversely affected by the rule asproposed in this respect, since it allows for more stringent requirementsto be imposed.The industrial commenter asserted that annual reports should be limitedto information necessary to evaluate progress of program implementationsince the previous report and should concentrate on POTW actions ratherthan those of industrial users. EPA disagrees. The ultimate goal of thepretreatment program is to prevent adverse impacts on POTWs and receivingwaters from industrial discharges to sewer systems. Existing standardsand requirements have been developed to achieve this goal. The extent ofcompliance with these standards and requirements is thus an important measureof the success of the pretreatment program. Moreover, a POTW's compliancemonitoring and enforcement activities cannot be evaluated in a vacuum,but must be related to the nature and compliance status of the POTW's industrialuser population.Two commenters were concerned about the increased resource demand thatwould result from the proposal. As stated in the preamble to the proposedrule, however, most Approval Authorities already require annual (or morefrequent) reports from their POTWs. Therefore, the new provision shouldnot significantly increase the overall resource demand for POTWs. Environmentalgroups noted that PIRT recommended that EPA develop a standardized formfor annual reports in order to enhance uniformity. The above mentioned``Pretreatment Compliance Monitoring and Enforcement Guidance'' (1986)contains a suggested format that includes most of the information requiredin the new regulatory provision. EPA may develop a required form in thefuture but will rely on this suggested format in the near term.d. <T3>Today's rule</T3>. EPA is promulgating the final rule as proposed,with one minor change. Instead of requiring that annual reports containinformation on the compliance status of <T3>each </T3>industrial user, the final rule requires inclusion in thereports of ``a summary of the status of Industrial User compliance.'' Thiswill provide sufficient flexibility for tailoring the annual report requirementto specific industrial user populations.<ITAG tagnum="81">D.5. Signatory Requirements for Industrial User Reports [40 CFR 403.12(1)]</ITAG>a. <T3>Existing rule</T3>. The signatory requirements for industrial userreports in the general pretreatment regulations were patterned after asimilar provision in the NPDES regulations. Section 403.12(i)(1) currentlystates that reports submitted on behalf of a corporation must be signedby a ``principal executive officer of at least the level of vice president''or an authorized representative of that person who is responsible for theoverall operation of the facility from which the discharge originates.The signatory requirement is intended to ensure that the corporation islegally accountable for the information submitted. The signature on reportsor authorization by a principal executive officer provides this accountability.b. <T3>Proposed change</T3>. In the past four years, EPA has revised the NPDESsignatory requirements governing permit application (48 FR 39611, September1, 1983) and reports from permittees (49 FR 37998, September 26, 1984).These changes were made to reduce the burden of investigating and signingapplications and reports for officers of large corporations while continuingto maintain a sufficiently high level of corporate responsibility. Thisrationale applies equally to industrial user reports in the pretreatmentprogram. Therefore, EPA proposed to amend the pretreatment signatory provision(andSection; 403.12(i)) to make it consistent with its NPDES counterpart.(EPA also proposed to redesignate this paragraph as andSection; 403.12(l)to account for the insertion of new paragraphs (h) and (i) in andSection;403.12, also proposed).The proposal changed the existing regulations to allow reports to be signedby ``a responsible corporate officer,'' or an authorized representativeof that individual. ``Responsible corporate officer'' includes the president,secretary, treasurer, or a vice-president of the corporation in chargeof a principal business function. It also incorporated into the regulationEPA's interpretation of ``executive officer of the level of vice president''adopted in a previously published policy statement regarding the NPDESpermit process (45 FR 52149, August 6, 1980). That statement clarifiedthat an officer performing ``policymaking functions'' similar to thoseperformed by a corporate vice-president could sign NPDES permit applicationssubmitted by direct dischargers. In addition, the manager of one or moremanufacturing, production, or operating facilities of a corporation cannow qualify as a ``responsible corporate officer'' if the facility (orfacilities) employs more than 250 persons or has gross national sales orexpenditures exceeding $25 million, as long as the manager has been authorizedto sign reports in accordance with proper corporate procedures. Formalassignments or delegations of authority are not necessary for corporateofficers identified in the proposed provision; it is presumed that theseresponsible corporate officers have the requisite authority unless theControl Authority has been notified otherwise.Consistent with the NPDES regulations, the proposal also allowed a ``dulyauthorized representative'' of a ``responsible corporate officer'', tosign reports required under the pretreatment program. This reduced theburden on the regulated community while at the same time providing an equaldegree of legal accountability on the part of the ``responsible corporateofficer.'' By authorizing a representative to sign reports, the responsibleofficial does not lose legal accountability for the accuracy of the informationthat is submitted. A ``duly authorized representative'' might be an individualor position responsible for the overall operation of an industrial user'sfacility (e.g., a plant manager). It might also be the individual in chargeof all environmental matters for the industrial user. The person will,in many cases, have the best knowledge of the company's facility. Becausehe or she must have overall environmental responsibility within the company,and since their authorization to sign the report must come from a responsiblecorporate officer, the proposal would also ensure corporate responsibility.This provision also was proposed to be revised by including the requirementthat all reports submitted pursuant to that subsection shall include theoath set forth in andSection; 403.6(a)(2)(ii). This is consistent with theNPDES regulations, which require a similar certification from signatoriesto NPDES permit applications and reports (<T3>see</T3>, 40 CFR 122.22(d)).c. <T3>Response to comments</T3>. All twelve commenters on this issue supportedthe basic concept of making the pretreatment signatory requirements consistentwith the NPDES requirements. Several commenters, however, provided additionalcomments and suggestions.Several commenters noted differences between the proposed provision andthe corresponding NPDES provision, and requested either clarification orthat the pretreatment provision be made consistent with the NPDES provision.For example, one commenter requested clarification of the phrase ``havingoverall responsibility for environmental matters for the Industrial User''as used in proposed andSection; 403.12(l)(3)(ii). The commenter noted thata strict interpretation of this language might suggest that the plant environmentalengineer could have signatory power, even though he would not have responsibilityfor the overall operation of the facility. EPA does not intend such aninterpretation. The Agency's intent in revising the pretreatment signatoryrequirements is to make them consistent with the NPDES signatory requirements,which allow reports to be signed by the ``individual or position havingoverall responsibility for environmental matters for the <T3>company</T3>'' (emphasis added). (<T3>See</T3>, 40 CFR 122.22(b)(2) (1986).) The Agency agrees with the commenterthat the proposed language needs clarification, and is therefore changingthe final rule to refer to ``company'' instead of ``Industrial User,''consistent with the parallel NPDES language.Two commenters objected to the fact that the proposed provision differedfrom the NPDES provision in not including ``superintendent'' among thosepositions to whom signatory authority may be delegated. One of these commentersasserted that this deletion imposes an additional burden where a superintendenthas been entrusted by the plant manager with responsibility for overallenvironmental operation at the plant. It appears that this commenter misunderstandsthe meaning of the term ``superintendent'' as used in the NPDES regulations.The term is intended to refer to a position having responsibility equivalentto that of a ``plant manager'' (i.e., having responsibility for the overalloperation of the plant). It is not intended to include positions havingresponsibility for environmental matters at the plant. Although the commenterthus appears to have misunderstood the existing NPDES provision, it istrue that the term ``superintendent'' appears in the NPDES provision butnot in the proposed pretreatment provision. EPA agrees that the two provisionsshould be consistent, and is thus modifying the final rule to add thisterm. One commenter noted that the list of potential ``duly authorized representatives''in the proposed provision also did not include ``operator of a well orwell field,'' and that this should be included to be consistent with theNPDES provision. EPA agrees and has modified the final rule to includethis term. Two commenters had reservations about the certification language in andSection;403.6(a)(2)(ii),which, under the proposed provision, must be included in each industrialuser report. This certification language, which originally appeared inthe amended pretreatment regulations published on January 28, 1981 (51FR 9404), was reinserted into the regulations in a final rule publishedon June 4, 1986 (51 FR 20426). (<T3>See, </T3>preamble at 51 FR 20427 for a more detailed discussion ofthe history of the pretreatment certification language.) As pointed outby the commenters, however, this certification language differs from thatin the current NPDES regulations. To make the certifications in the pretreatmentand NPDES regulations consistent, EPA is modifying the pretreatment provisionto mirror the NPDES language. Another commenter requested clarification of the proposal as it appliesto complex, milti-plant industrial sites. The commenter recommended addinga provision to the proposal that would permit multiple signatories on industrialuser reports from multi-plant sites with shared wastewater treatment facilities.This commenter stated that each individual (i.e., plant manager who hasresponsibility for the overall operation of a single plant within a multi-plantsite) should be allowed to sign the industrial user reports. EPA recognizesthat complex industrial sites certainly exist (e.g., automobile manufacturingsites), but disagrees with commenter. An individual who has responsibilityfor shared treatment facility should be the ``authorized representative''signing the industrial user report. Because individual plant managers withina multi-plant site may not have this responsibility, the Agency disagreeswith the proposal of having multiple signatories on the reports. One person(not several) should sign the required reports on behalf of the corporationand be ultimately responsible for ensuring the accuracy and truthfulnessof the reports. Although the individual most knowledgeable about the treatmentplant operations is likely to be the treatment plant operator, this individualdoes not qualify as a ``duly authorized representative'' of the companyand therefore cannot have the authority to sign the reports. Two commenters recommended adding a provision dealing with changes in authorizationsconsistent with 40 CFR 122.22(c) in the NPDES regulations. One of the commentersalso suggested expanding this provision (for both the NPDES and pretreatmentregulations) to cover changes to authorization concerning the individualor position having overall responsibility for environmental matters withinthe company. The commenter argued that the same rationale applies as forthe individual or position responsible for operating the facility, whois already covered by the rule. EPA agrees with both commenters, and ismodifying the final rule accordingly. The Agency will make the necessarychanges to the NPDES signatory provision in a future rulemaking. The State commenter contended that documenting gross annual sales or expendituresin order to demonstrate that they exceed $25 million will be difficult,and requested guidance on methods to obtain annual sales figures. In responseto this comment, EPA wishes to clarify that if a company wishes to havea manager of one or more manufacturing, production, or operating facilitiessign industrial user reports, the company will be responsible for demonstratingthat the facility (or facilities) for which the manager is responsiblemeet the $25 million criterion. If the company is unable or unwilling tomake this demonstration, the manager in question will not be considereda ``responsible corporate officer'' under andSection;403.12(l)(1) (although,of course, he or she may still qualify as a ``duly authorized representative''under andSection;403.12(l)(3)). d. <T3>Today's rule. </T3>The final rule being promulgated today differs fromthe proposed rule in the following ways: (1) andSection;403.12(l)(3)(ii)now refers to the ``company'' instead of the ``Industrial User;'' (2) ``superintendent''and ``operator of a well or well field'' have been added to andSection;403.12(l)(3)(ii);(3) the certification language in andSection;403.6(a)(2)(ii) now mirrorsthe NPDES language in 40 CFR 122.22(d); and (4) a provision consistentwith 40 CFR 122.22(c), dealing with changes to authorizations, has beenadded. This final rule will ensure that indirect dischargers are subjectto signatory requirements for reports that are consistent with those fordirect dischargers.<ITAG tagnum="81">D. 6. Reporting Requirements_Extension to Non-Categorical Discharges[40 CFR 403.12(h)]    </ITAG>a. <T3>Existing rule. </T3>Section 403.12 describes the reports industrialusers subject to categorical pretreatment standards must submit. Thesereports, individually discussed in more detail elsewhere in this preamble,include baseline monitoring reports (BMRs) required under andSection; 403.12(b),90-day compliance reports required under andSection; 403.12(d), and periodiccompliance reports required under andSection; 403.12(e). The purpose of thesereports is to provide the Control Authority with information, togetherwith additional data obtained through the Control Authority's own monitoringprogram, on the quantity and nature of discharges to the POTW and on theindustrial user's compliance with applicable pretreatment standards andrequirements.    b. <T3>Proposed change. </T3>The industrial categories for which categoricalpretreatment standards have been and are being developed by EPA includethose from which significant toxic pollutant discharges occur across theindustry nationally. However, individual industrial users that are notcovered by categorical standards (``non-categorical'' industrial users)have the potential to discharge significant amounts of toxic pollutantsto POTWs, resulting in water quality, sludge disposal or other problems.In addition, non-categorical industrial users may discharge other pollutantsin quantities sufficient to cause serious interference or pass throughproblems at the POTW. Although the regulations generally require that suchdischarges be regulated by the POTW, they do not specifically require non-categoricalindustrial users to submit reports to the Control Authority regarding theircompliance with applicable pretreatment requirements.    The lack of any specific reporting requirements for non-categorical industrialusers in the regulations has caused some confusion as to whether ControlAuthorities are expected to require reporting from these industrial users.Most POTWs currently require some reporting from their non-categoricalindustrial users as as means to have an effective compliance program; somePOTWs require reports from all of their industrial users.    Although specific reporting requirements are listed only for categoricalindustrial users, it has never been EPA's intent to exempt non-categoricalindustrial users from all reporting requirements. One of the regulatoryrequirements for an approvable POTW pretreatment program is legal authorityto require, from all industrial users, such reports as are necessary toassess and assure compliance with applicable pretreatment standards andrequirements [andSection; 403.8(f)(1)(iv)]. This requirement is explicitlynot limited to the specific reports required of categorical industrialusers. Complete and accurate information on the quantity and nature ofpollutant discharges to the sewer system by industrial users is essentialif the POTW is to effectively regulate its users and prevent violationof pretreatment standards.    Because of the confusion on the reporting required of non-categorical users,EPA proposed to add a new paragraph (h) to andSection; 403.12 (and redesignatingthe existing paragraph (h) accordingly) to clarify that the Control Authoritymust impose appropriate reporting requirements on its industrial userswith non-categorical discharges. Control Authorities should use this authorityto require sampling for pollutants not regulated by categorical standardswhere those pollutants may cause pass-through or interference. Of course,the appropriate monitoring and reporting to be required of non-categoricalindustrial users will vary depending on the circumstances. Factors to beconsidered include the size of the industrial user, the percentage of thePOTW's total flow attributable to the industrial user, the nature of theindustrial user's discharge (e.g., whether the industrial user is dischargingpollutants of concern to the POTW), and the industrial user's compliancehistory. These and other relevant factors should be considered by the ControlAuthority in establishing appropriate reporting requirements for its non-categoricalindustrial users. Under the proposal, if the Control Authority determinesthat reporting by these users is appropriate, the Control Authority wouldbe required to impose monitoring and reporting requirements.Industrial users subject to categorical pretreatment standards may alsodischarge significant amounts of pollutants that are not addressed in thosestandards. The proposal also applied to these industrial users. Under theproposed provision, the Control Authority must require appropriate reportingconcerning all non-categorical discharges to the POTW, including thosefrom industrial users that are otherwise subject to categorical standards.  c. <T3>Response to comments. </T3>Several commenters supported the requirementsas proposed. Most of the commenters, however, had additional comments onthe proposal.   Three commenters asserted that adequate authority already exists to requirereporting from non-categorical industrial users and that therefore theproposed requirement is unnecessary. As stated in the preamble to the proposal,it is true that under the current regulations POTWs with approved pretreatmentprograms are required to have authority to require reports from non-categorical,as well as categorical, industrial users. Furthermore, State Control Authoritiesare required to have authorities at least as broad as those granted toEPA under section 308 of the Clean Water Act, which would include sufficientauthority to require such reporting. Notwithstanding these existing authorities,however, there has been some confusion concerning whether Control Authoritieswere expected to require reporting from non-categorical industrial users,as was noted in the preamble to the proposal (and restated in today's preamble).The change being finalized today is warranted to dispel this confusion.  Several commenters emphasized that the Control Authority should have discretionin determining appropriate reporting requirements for non-categorical industrialusers. EPA agrees. Under the new provision, it is the Control Authoritywho determines what is appropriate in a given case (i.e., what pollutantsare to be covered, the level and frequency of reporting, etc.). This determinationis, of course, subject to oversight by the Approval Authority, who mayrequire additional monitoring and reporting where it feels this is warranted.  One POTW felt that unannounced POTW sampling of non-categorical industrialusers is better than self-reporting for assessing compliance with locallimits. It is perfectly acceptable to rely on POTW sampling instead ofrequiring self-monitoring and reporting by industrial users. (See discussionof POTW versus self-monitoring for categorical industrial users below.)POTWs must receive an appropriate level of information on non-categoricaldischarges to their systems to ensure that interference and pass throughdo not occur. If a Control Authority chooses to rely primarily on self-monitoringby the industrial user, then some reporting by the user will be necessary.If, however, the POTW performs all monitoring activities itself, thereis no need to require additional reporting from the industrial user. Therule being promulgated today allows for this. Where the POTW performs allmonitoring, it might be ``appropriate'' not to require any reporting bythe industrial user, since the POTW would already have all the necessaryinformation.   A State commenter suggested that non-categorical industrial users be requiredto submit semi-annual reports similar to those required in andSection;403.12(e)for categorical industrial users, thereby establishing a minimum monitoringfrequency of twice per year. Because of the diversity of the non-categoricalindustrial user population, however, EPA prefers to leave the determinationof what is appropriate reporting for a given industrial user to the ControlAuthority's discretion. Semi-annual monitoring and reporting may not benecessary for some users whose contributions to the POTW are truly insignificant.The commenter also mentioned that its suggested approach would be consistentwith EPA guidance stating a recommended industrial user monitoring frequencyof twice per year. However, this recommended frequency applies to ``significant''industrial users (as defined in the ``Pretreatment Compliance Monitoringand Enforcement Guidance'' (1986)), and was not intended to cover all users.  Two commenters appeared to be under the mistaken impression that the newrequirement would automatically require reporting on all pollutants inan industrial user's discharge. This is not the case. The new provisionsimply requires the Control Authority to require <T3>appropriate </T3>reporting. This does not mean that all industrialusers will be required to report on all pollutants in their effluents.It does mean, however, that where the Control Authority determines thatit is appropriate to require reporting on a particular non-categoricalpollutant (i.e., because it has a reasonable potential for causing problemsat the POTW), the Control Authority will be expected to require such reporting.  d. <T3>Today's rule. </T3>EPA is promulgating the final rule as proposed.Under the rule, Control Authorities must require appropriate reportingfrom their industrial users on discharges to the POTW of pollutants thatare not covered under categorical pretreatment standards. The determinationof what is appropriate is to be made on a case-by-case basis by the ControlAuthority (subject to normal Approval Authority oversight) based on suchfactors as the size of the industrial user, the volume of the industrialuser's flow relative to the POTW's total flow, and whether the industrialuser is discharging pollutants of concern to the POTW.<ITAG tagnum="81">D.7. Notification of Slug Loadings [40 CFR 403.12(f)]  </ITAG>a. <T3>Existing rule.</T3> Section 403.12(f) requires industrial users toimmediately notify the POTW to which they are discharging of any slug loading.A slug loading is defined in andSection;403.5(b)(4) as the discharge of anypollutant at a flow rate and/or pollutant concentration that will cause``interference'' (as defined in andSection;403.3(i)) with the POTW. SectionandSection;403.5(b)(4) specifically prohibits slug loadings. The notificationrequirement is intended to ensure that POTWs are promptly alerted to anyloadings to their systems that would cause problems at the treatment plant.The language of andSection;403.12(f) and its location in a section that dealsprimarily with reporting requirements for industrial users subject to categoricalpretreatment standards has raised questions about whether the slug loadnotification requirement applies only to categorical industrial users.Despite its location, EPA intended that this requirement apply to any suchdischarge by industrial users.  b. <T3>Proposed change.</T3> To clarify its intent, EPA proposed to changethe language of andSection;403.12(f) to state that the slug load notificationrequirement applies to non-categorical, as well as categorical, industrialusers.  The Agency also proposed to expand andSection;403.12(f) to reference allfive of the specific prohibited discharge standards listed in andSection;403.5(b)(the ``specific prohibitions'') instead of only andSection;403.5(b)(4). EPAproposed this change because some slug loadings (e.g., sulfides) may notcause ``interference'' at the POTW (and thus are not within andSection;403.5(b)(4)),but are corrosive and hazardous to workers safety. The proposed changewould ensure that the POTW will be promptly notified of all dischargesthat might cause problems, including interference, at the POTW.  c. <T3>Response to comments.</T3> EPA received 14 comments on its proposedchanges to the slug notification requirements. None of the commenters objectedto EPA's proposal to clarify that andSection;403.12(f) applies to all industrialusers, not just those which are subject to categorical standards. Severalsupported this aspect of the proposal based on the reasons given in thepreamble to the proposed rule. POTW commenters who further explained theirsupport stated that the clarification would reinforce their existing practicesand/or ordinances. Finally, one commenter supported it on the general premisethat the more information the POTW has about discharges to its system thebetter it can reduce the potential for such problems as dilution, passthrough, interference, or undesirable contamination. EPA agrees with allthese commenters and accordingly, is promulgating the clarification thatthe slug notification requirement applies to all industrial users as proposed. Response to EPA's proposal to expand the notification requirement to includedischarges which would violate any of the specific prohibitions in andSection;403.5(b)was divided. POTWs and the environmental group commenter generally supportedthe proposed expansion of this part of the notification requirements. However,some POTWs and all industry commenters objected to the lack of specificityin the proposed rule about when the notification requirement is triggered.Each of the commenters' various concerns about this issue are discussedbelow.  Initially, it would be useful to address some concerns which seems to bebased on a misunderstanding about the purpose and effect of the proposal.One commenter read the proposal to require notification of any dischargewhich was significantly more than normal flow or concentration and statedthat notification should be limited to discharges that interfere with thePOTW's operation. Because of site-specific variables, the commenter suggestedthat it would be better for the industrial user and POTW together to determinewhich discharges were slug loads and therefore should be reported. Alongthe same lines, one POTW objected to the proposal as requiring notificationof slug loadings that have no measurable impact, ``e.g., a pH of 4.9 witha duration of 60 seconds.''  These concerns are largely unfounded given the purpose and effect of thenotification requirement and the specific prohibitions. The proposed rulewould require notification of slug loadings which could violate any ofthe specific prohibitions in andSection;403.5(b). The commonly understoodmeaning of ``slug loading,'' which is reflected in the above comments,is a discharge which significantly exceeds the usual flow and/or pollutantloading (volume or concentration). Typical ``slugs'' involve batch dischargesor accidental spills. Under the existing requirement, industrial usersmust notify the POTW only of slug loads that would violate andSection;403.5(b)(4)(i.e., those which would cause ``interference''). ``Interference'' meansa discharge which inhibits or disrupts the POTW's operation or processesand results in the POTW violating its NPDES permit or requirements applicableto the POTW's chosen sludge use or disposal methods. 40 CFR 403.3(i). (<T3>See,</T3> 52 FR 1586, January 14, 1987.) The proposed rule would requirenotification for slug loads which could violate any of the specific prohibitionslisted in andSection;403.5(b). In addition to andSection;403.5(b)(4) coveredby the existing regulation, two other specific prohibitions reference ``interference''andSection;andSection; 403.5(b)(3) and (5)). The specific prohibitions whichdo not require ``interference'' (andSection; andSection;403.5(b)(1) and (2))nonetheless address types of discharges which could significantly disrupta POTW's system or threaten human health and safety, and potentially couldresult in violations of the POTW's NPDES permit or sludge requirements(e.g., corrosives, flammables). The commenter mistakenly suggests, however,that EPA is limited to requiring notification of discharges leading onlyto interference. In referencing all of the specific prohibitions of andSection;403.5(b),the Agency is ensuring the implementation of each of them, including thosewhich do not specifically reference interference. The purpose of this notificationrequirement is to ensure that all industrial users will notify the POTWof any discharges that might cause problems, including interference atthe POTW.Immediate notification to the POTW of slug loadings that could violateany of the specific prohibitions allows the POTW, where possible, to takeaction to eliminate or discharge the likely adverse impact of slug loadings.Although it is conceivable that the rule could result in notification ofslugs that ultimately have no measurable impact on the POTW, for examplebecause of their extremely short duration, such instances will be the exceptionrather than the rule. Moreover, since the notification requirements serveto supply the POTW with the information it would need to determine whetherand how to institute preventive measures in response to the slug loading,this notification fulfills its purpose even where the effect of the slugis mitigated before it can actually cause harm at the POTW.A major concern raised about the proposal was its apparent application(and consequently a user's potential liability for failure to notify) evenwhere the user did not know that a slug loading either had occurred orwould result in a violation of a specific prohibition. Some commentersrequested that the notification requirements apply to slug loadings thatare known to the industrial user (e.g., the notification requirements applicableto oil spills under the CWA or releases of hazardous wastes under CERCLA).Others stated it would be an undue burden on an industrial user to evaluatethe impact of its discharge given the presence of other discharges or lackof information about the POTW's operation. For similar reasons, anothercommenter requested that the user be excused from liability for failureto notify if it were in compliance with existing Federal, State, and localdischarge standards (a ``safe harbor''). Finally, several commenters requestedthat the industrial user be required to notify the POTW only when theirdischarges exceeded predetermined limits set by the POTW or EPA (e.g.,site-specific limits or a list of ``reportable quantities'' similar tothat in 40 CFR Part 117).In general, the industrial user is in the best position to know what itsnormal discharge is and when its discharge will be significantly greaterin volume or strength (e.g., due to an upset, bypass, or accidental spill).In some cases, the likely effect of a particular discharge and thereforeduty to notify is easy to ascertain (e.g., discharge of flammables, dischargethat exceeds daily maximum discharge limits). In addition, an industrialuser has an implicit, if not explicit, duty to assess the potential impactof its discharge to a POTW (as discussed in the preamble to the final rulepromulgating the definitions of interference and pass through, 40 CFR 403.3(i)and (n) (52 FR 1590, 1595; 1598)). Therefore, it is appropriate, as wellas consistent with the regulatory scheme, to hold the industrial user accountablefor knowing its discharge activity and the likely effect of its dischargein the event of a slug loading.The purpose of the notification requirement is not to accumulate evidenceof non-compliance, but to give the POTW the opportunity to mitigate anypotential damage due to a slug loading. Therefore, it is not necessaryto know with certainty whether a slug would indeed violate a specific prohibition.EPA agrees that the regulation could be clearer on this point. Thus, ithas been redrafted to require notice of slug loads which could violatea specific prohibition.EPA opposes a ``safe harbor'' for notification of a slug loading for essentiallythe same reasons set forth in the rule-making establishing the definitionsof pass through and interference (52 FR 1590, January 14, 1987). Existingnational categorical standards and local limits do not address all localenvironmental problems. Therefore, compliance with existing standards willnot prevent pass through or interference due to, for example, spills, processchanges, raw material changes, or other sources not identified by industrialusers or anticipated by the POTW. While EPA agrees that site-specific limitsare desirable and often necessary, many POTWs have not yet acquired theexpertise necessary to set comprehensive local limits based upon a thoroughanalysis of the POTW's influent and capacity to treat it. Since it is unlikelythat even site-specific limits will address all possible contingenciesand pollutants, and since the purpose of notification is not to determinecompliance but to facilitate POTW response to a slug load, a ``safe harbor''provision would thus be inappropriate.It is EPA's position that failure to properly assess the impact or likelyeffect of a slug load or to give notification for any other reason is nodefense to an enforcement action for failure to notify. EPA does recognize,however, that there may be instances where a slug loading may occur withoutthe knowledge of the industrial user. In such instances, lack of knowledgewould be a factor in determining the appropriate enforcement response.d. <T3>Today's rule.</T3> EPA is promulgating essentially the same rule asthat which was proposed. Thus, it will require notification of any slugloading by categorical and non-categorical industrial users and will encompassall of the prohibitions of andSection; 403.5(b). The only difference is thatthe final rule clarifies that industrial users are required to notify thePOTW of any slug loading which could violate any of the prohibited dischargestandards, whether or not such violation actually results.<ITAG tagnum="81">D. 8. 90-Day Compliance Report [40 CFR 403.12(d)]</ITAG>a. <T3>Existing rule.</T3> Within 90 days after the compliance date of a categoricalpretreatment standard, each existing industrial user subject to the categoricalstandard must submit to the Control Authority a report indicating whetherthe user is in compliance with the standard (andSection; 403.12(d)). Newsources must submit this report within 90 days following commencement ofdischarge into the POTW. The report required by andSection; 403.12(d) mustcontain information on the nature and concentration of regulated processpollutants in the industrial user's discharge, the average and maximumdaily flow of these regulated process wastestreams and a signed statementindicating whether the user is in compliance with the applicable standard(s).If the user is not in compliance, the report must indicate the additionalsteps that are necessary to achieve compliance. The purpose of this reportis to provide information that will allow the Control Authority to determinewhether those industrial users subject to categorical pretreatment standardshave met the applicable deadlines for compliance with these standards.b. <T3>Proposed change.</T3> The information required in 90-day compliancereports is basically the same as that required for baseline monitoringreports (BMRs) (andSection; 403.12(b)), although the latter report must containcertain additional information. Under both reporting requirements, theindustrial user must indicate the nature and concentration of regulatedpollutants in the user's discharge, the flow of the user's regulated processwastestreams, whether the user is in compliance with applicable categoricalpretreatment standards, and, if not, what steps are necessary to bringthe user into compliance. (BMRs must also contain information identifyingthe industrial users, a list of any environmental permits held by the user,and a brief description of the user's operations.) Although this same basicinformation is required in both reports, the regulatory requirements forBMRs (andSection; 403.12(b)(4)-(6)) are much more detailed than those forthe 90-day compliance reports in andSection; 403.12(d). To better specifythe information to be submitted in 90-day compliance reports, therefore,the Agency proposed to revise andSection; 403.12(d) to specify the informationrequired in these reports in the same detail as the equivalent BMR provision.The proposed revision did not change the existing requirements, but wasmerely intended to clarify the contents of the 90-day compliance report.EPA also proposed to revise the BMR sampling requirements in andSection;403.12(b)(5) to require a minimum of one sampling analysis. This same minimumwould apply to 90-day compliance reports. As with BMRs, the Control Authoritymay require additional sampling and analysis where necessary to obtainrepresentative data sufficient to determine compliance.EPA further proposed another amendment to andSection; 403.12(d). For thoseindustrial users subject to categorical pretreatment standards expressedonly in terms of mass per unit of production, it is imperative that theControl Authority have current production data in order to determine whethercompliance with the standard has been attained. Although all industrialusers are required to include production data as part of the baseline monitoringreport (andSection; 403.12(b)(3)), this data may be outdated by the timethe compliance report required under andSection; 403.12(d) is submitted (usuallyseveral years later). Therefore, the Agency proposed to amend andSection;403.12(d) to require that these reports also contain the industrial user'scurrent actual average production rate. This will ensure that the ControlAuthority has up-to-date production data for determining whether the deadlinesfor compliance with applicable production-based standards have been met.c. <T3>Response to comments.</T3> None of the commenters were opposed to referencingthe more detailed language of andSection; 403.12(b)(4)-(6) in andSection; 403.12(d).However, one industry commenter suggested extending the proposal to includeandSection; 403.12(b)(7), which requires that industrial users that are notin compliance with the categorical standard at the time the BMR is submittedmust include in the report the shortest schedule by which additional pretreatmentand/or operation and maintenance (O andamp; M) required to achieve compliancewill be provided. Section 403.12(b)(7) states that the completion dategiven in a BMR for installing additional necessary pretreatment equipmentor providing additional O andamp; M may not be later than the compliancedate for a particular categorical standard. This provision is not applicableto the 90-day compliance report under andSection; 403.12(d), since thesereports are submitted after the compliance date. Section 307(d) of theCWA makes it unlawful to violate a categorical standard after its compliancedate; thus, EPA cannot provide in its regulations for industrial usersto establish schedules for coming into compliance after the compliancedate.One industry and one POTW were opposed to the proposed requirement forthe industrial user to include a current average production rate in the90-day report. The industrial commenter pointed out that requiring currentproduction data in 90-day reports would be inconsistent with the NPDESregulations, and would result in limitations changing every day that theproduction rate changes. One commenter felt that the required productiondata should be changed to ``representative average daily production,''consistent with the language proposed for andSection; 403.6(c)(3) (see II.A.1.above), to facilitate direct comparison to the production rate on whichequivalent limits calculated under andSection; 403.6(c)(3) are based.For industrial users for whom the Control Authority has established equivalentmass-per-day or concentration limits under the procedures in revised andSection;403.6(c), EPA agrees that the production rate included in the 90-day reportshould be based on the same measure (i.e., long-term average) as the productionrate used by the Control Authority in establishing the equivalent limits.This is the production data necessary to determine whether the user isin compliance with the applicable categorical standard, since the equivalentlimits are enforceable in lieu of the standard itself. For other industrialusers, however, the production data necessary for determining compliance,and therefore the data that must be reported in the 90-day report, is theproduction corresponding to the period during which the sampling for thereport was performed. EPA recognizes that the proposal was not clear onthis point, and is modifying the language of the final rule accordingly.A POTW commented that production rates for new sources within 90 days ofcommencement of discharge are rarely indicative of future peak rates, andare therefore not useful. With respect to new sources, the Agency agreesthat a production rate based on 90 days of production may not accuratelyreflect future peak rates, but disagrees with the commenter's assertionthat this renders such data useless. Although it may not be indictive offuture long-term production rates, the 90-day data does give the ControlAuthority some actual data on the industrial user's production level datanecessary to assess compliance. Additionally, for Control Authorities thathave established equivalent limits under the revised andSection; 403.6(c)being promulgated today (see II.A.1. above), this data will be importantfor verifying projected produciton rates provided by the industrial user.A State, industry and trade association commented that production datashould be required only for industrial users subject to production-basedstandards. EPA agrees with this comment and the final rule contains thisqualification.One POTW commented that the POTW should have discretion to require theBMR information in industrial user reports. However, it appears that thiscommenter was confusing the 90-day report with the periodic report underandSection; 403.12(e), since the commenter referred to a semi-annual determinationof what should be contained in the report.An industry commenter suggested allowing for a different reporting schedule(i.e., over 90 days) if expressly agreed to by the Control Authority. Theissue addressed by this comment was not part of the proposed rule and isthus beyond the scope of this rulemaking.d. <T3>Today's rule.</T3> EPA is promulgating the final rule as proposed withrespect to referencing the requirements in andSection;andSection; 403.12(b)(4)-(6)and 403.12(d). The final rule differs from the proposal in that it specifiesthat for industrial users subject to equivalent mass or concentration limitsestablished by the Control Authority under the procedures in revised andSection;403.6(c), the 90-day compliance report must include a reasonable measureof the user's long-term production rate. For users not subject to suchequivalent limits, the production rate included in the 90-day report isto be the actual production during the sampling period.<ITAG tagnum="81">D.9. Industrial User Compliance Reports_Monitoring Requirements [40CFR 403.12(g)] </ITAG>a. <T3>Existing rule. </T3>Under the current General Pretreatment Regulations,industrial users subject to categorical pretreatment standards must submitcompliance reports in June and December (or more frequently as requiredby the Control Authority) (andSection;403.12(e)). These reports must containinformation on the nature and amount of pollutants that are subject tothe categorical standard(s) in the industrial user's effluent. The industrialuser must also include measured or estimated average and maximum dailyflows for the reporting period, or more detailed flow information as requiredby the Control Authority. Section 403.12(g) provides that these compliancereports must contain the results of sampling and analysis of the industrialuser's discharge, but does not specify the amount of sampling and analysisthat must be performed for each report. Nor do the categorical standardscontain such monitoring frequency requirements. b. <T3>Proposed change. </T3>Although the pretreatment regulations do notspecify the amount of monitoring required in these reports, POTWs may,of course, specify monitoring frequencies in their own sewer use ordinancesand individual industrial user permits. Many POTWs have in fact done this.However, the lack of any monitoring frequency requirements, either in theGeneral Pretreatment Regulations or the categorical pretreatment standards,has resulted in some confusion as to the amount of monitoring requiredfor periodic compliance reports under andSection;403.12(e). Therefore, to establish a minimum acceptable level of monitoring for theperiodic compliance report, the Agency proposed to revise andSection;403.12(g)to clarify that the reports required under andSection;403.12(e) must be basedon an appropriate amount of sampling and analysis performed during theperiod covered by the report. Implicit in andSection;403.12(e) is that eachbiannual report contain at least some data for the period covered by thereport. The appropriate monitoring frequency for indirect dischargers will varyfrom facility to facility, and must be determined by the Control Authorityon a case-by-case basis. In making this determination for a particularindustrial user, the Control Authority should consider the monitoring frequencyconsidered by EPA in developing, and determining the costs associated with,the applicable categorical standard. This information can be found in thepreamble and/or development document accompanying each categorical standard.The Control Authority should also consider such factors as the size ofthe industrial user's flow and the user's compliance history. Control Authoritiesmay also choose to consider the monitoring frequency that would be imposedon a similar direct discharger in its NPDES permit. Ultimately, the choiceis the Control Authority's. EPA would like to clarify that this is nota substantive change to existing requirements. By its lack of specificity,the Agency intended to require that each report be based on an appropriateamount of sampling for the particular industrial user. However, todays'rule should eliminate any confusion. EPA proposed two additional changes to andSection;403.12(g). The first wasa provision requiring that all monitoring performed by the industrial userbe reported in the compliance reports under andSection;403.12(e). Industrialusers, like other dischargers, may monitor more frequently than requiredby the regulations or the Control Authority. The proposed revision wouldprevent an industrial user that performs extra sampling from selectingthe most favorable monitoring results to report to the Control Authority.Otherwise, dischargers whose sample indicates a violation could performadditional monitoring once compliance is attained and report only the latterresults. Clearly, the intent of self-monitoring is that all monitoringbe reported. This provision is consistent with andSection;122.44(i) of theNPDES regulations, which requires that permittees report all monitoringresults. The Agency also proposed to add a provision stating that if sampling andanalysis performed by the industrial user indicates a violation, the usermust repeat the sampling and analysis and submit the results of both analysesto the Control Authority within 21 days. This provision would allow theControl Authority to detect patterns of continuing noncompliance by itsindustrial users, and thus assist in distinguishing single events fromchronic noncompliance. c. <T3>Response to comments. </T3>The proposed changes generated a significantamount of comment from POTWs, industry, States, an environmental group,and others. Most of the commenters were generally supportive of the changes,although many offered suggestions for improving the proposal. 1. <T3>Monitoring frequency. </T3>Most of the commenters on this issue supportedthe change as proposed. Those who did not were generally concerned withthe lack of any minimum monitoring frequency requirement in the regulations,and recommended specific frequencies ranging from once per compliance report(i.e., once ever six months) to the frequency used in the economic analysisfor the applicable categorical standard (which can be as high as severaltimes per week). However, none of these commenters provided specific supportfor its recommended frequency, other than to say that it would ensure an``adequate amount of sampling,'' that any longer frequency would ``allowviolations to continue undetected (and unabated) for too long,'' or thatControl Authorities need frequent self-monitoring because they do not havesufficient resources to detect violations independently. One commenterasserted that it is inappropriate to give Control Authorities discretionin determining industrial user monitoring frequencies because they didnot participate in the development of the categorical pretreatment standardsand do not have sufficient expertise to determine all of the variablesthat could influence a discharge at a particular facility. The commenter,a member of PIRT, noted it was this concern that led the task force torecommend that EPA provide Control Authorities with guidance on appropriatemonitoring frequencies. (<T3>See, </T3>``PIRT Report'', pp. 18-19.) EPA appreciates the concernsof those commenters recommending specific monitoring frequencies for industrialusers. However, the Agency is also mindful of the fact that the appropriatemonitoring frequency may vary considerably from industrial user to industrialuser, and is thus hesitant to add a specific minimum frequency to the regulations.Instead, in response to PIRT's recommendation EPA has included guidanceon this issue in the ``Pretreatment Compliance Monitoring and EnforcementGuidance'' (1986) (<T3>see, </T3>pp. 2-11 to 2-15). This guidance document lists a numberof factors for Control Authorities to consider in determining an appropriatemonitoring frequency, including the industrial user's compliance history,impact on the operation of the POTW, water quality impacts on the receivingstream, the industrial user's discharge flow rate, and cost. The guidancealso provides recommended self-monitoring frequencies to be used as a startingpoint in developing longer-term requirements. These recommended frequenciesrange from once per month to three times per week for conventional pollutants,inorganic pollutants, cyanide, and phenol, and twice per year to four timesper month for organics, depending on the industrial user's flow. As isemphasized in the guidance, these are suggested frequencies to be adjusteddepending on the circumstances of a particular industrial user. This approachof providing guidance on monitoring frequencies is preferable to establishingspecific regulatory requirements. The combination of this guidance anda regulatory provision requiring an appropriate amount of monitoring byindustrial users assures that Control Authorities have sufficient informationfor determining and incentive for establishing proper monitoring frequenciesfor their industrial users. 2. <T3>Requirement to report all monitoring data. </T3>Several POTWs supportedthe change as proposed. Most of the commenters, however, expressed concernabout the scope of the requirement. Specifically, several commenters objectedto the requirement to submit all monitoring data collected during the reportingperiod, arguing that without some qualification this could require submittalof data not relevant to an industrial user's effluent quality. Anothercommenter pointed out that the additional monitoring data should be allowedto be submitted in summary form to avoid having to submit large volumesof data from, for example, automatic pH control systems with continuousreadout, where a compilation would be adequate. With this same concernin mind, one commenter recommended that the proposal be modified to parallelmore closely the comparable provision in the NPDES regulations (40 CFR122.41(1)(4)(ii)), which requires permittees monitoring more frequentlythan required by the permit, using test procedures approved under 40 CFRPart 136 (or as otherwise specified in the permit), to include the resultsof this additional monitoring in their discharge monitoring reports. EPAagrees that the pretreatment provision should be consistent with the NPDESprovision, and has modified the final rule accordingly. This modificationshould adequately address the concerns of those commenters who found thescope of the proposal to be too broad with respect to the data requiredto be submitted.Commenters raised two additional concerns with the proposed requirementto report the result of all monitoring. The first is that such a requirementwould be difficult to enforce. EPA is aware of the inherent difficultiesof enforcing this requirement. However, in the Agency's judgment this isnot by itself a sufficient reason not to include such a requirement inthe regulations, particularly in light of the fact that without such arequirement, industrial users may legally select for submission to theControl Authority that monitoring data most favorable to them, deprivingthe Control Authority of a representative picture of the industrial user'scompliance status. In extreme cases, this could allow an industrial userto submit only that data showing compliance, even though additional monitoringdata shows noncompliance.The other additional concern, which was raised by a number of commenters,is that industrial users performing additional monitoring would be penalizedby having to report the results of this monitoring, and that the requirementwould therefore act as a disincentive to additional monitoring. Althoughthis argument may be facially appealing, EPA is not aware of any such disincentiveeffect resulting from the parallel NPDES provision, and is thus not persuadedthat this would occur in the pretreatment context. Moreover, industrialusers whose required amount of monitoring indicates noncompliance willstill have an incentive to perform additional monitoring in order to demonstratethat the noncompliance has been corrected or is not as serious as it mayappear based solely on the required amount of monitoring.Finally, one POTW suggested that instead of having to submit all monitoringdata, industrial users should only be required to make the additional dataavailable to the Control Authority upon request. Industrial users subjectto the reporting requirements of andSection; 403.12 are already requiredto retain all monitoring data for three years (or longer if required bythe State Director or the Regional Administrator of EPA). However, thepurpose of the proposed revision is to make these data available in theperiodic reports submitted by industrial users so that the Control Authoritycan consider them in evaluating industrial user compliance without havingto make a special request for them. EPA feels the proposed revision iswarranted to accomplish this purpose.3. <T3>Resampling requirement. </T3>This issue generated the most commentof any issue concerning the proposed revisions to andSection; 403.12(g).Several commenters supported the provision as proposed. Most, however,while supporting the basic concept, disagreed to some extent with its proposedimplementation. A small number of commenters opposed the resampling ideafor a variety of reasons.Several commenters addressed the 21-day period for resampling and submittingthe results of the original and repeat samplings to the Control Authority.Two of these commenters asked for a clarification that the time periodstarts to run upon the industrial user's receipt of the results of theoriginal sampling showing a violation. This was the intended meaning ofthe proposal, and EPA has modified the final rule to clearly state this.Most of the commenters addressing the 21-day period asserted that 21 daysis too short because it does not adequately account for lab turnaroundand time in transit. Based on EPA's experience, the 21-day period is notunachievable. Several commenters noted that this period would require acceleratedanalysis at certain labs, which could add substantial premiums to the regularcost of analysis, thus placing an unreasonable financial burden on theregulated industry. EPA wishes to remind these commenters that under theproposal, resampling is required only where there is a document <T3>violation </T3>of an applicable pretreatment standard, and thus shouldnot be treated as routine monitoring. In the Agency's view, it is not unreasonableto require industrial users that have violated applicable standards togo to special lengths to resample their effluent to facilitate evaluationby the Control Authority of the seriousness of the violation. At the sametime, however, the Agency does not want to impose on industrial users requirementswith which it is impossible or unreasonably difficult to comply. Althoughit is possible to comply with the 21-day period, this may be unreasonablyshort in some instances. The Agency has therefore extended the time periodin the final rule to 30 days. Little, if any, expedited handling shouldbe necessary to meet the modified deadline, and any that might be requiredis deemed by the Agency to be warranted by the fact that a violation hasalready occurred.Several commenters objected to the resampling requirement, arguing thata determination of what, if any, resampling is necessary is properly leftto the Control Authority's discretion. While Control Authorities shouldgenerally be given a large measure of discretion in determining samplingrequirements for their industrial users, the sampling requirement is neverthelesswarranted in order to ensure that a minimum amount of data will be availableregarding all violations of pretreatment standards. Moreover, the resamplingrequirement does not, contrary to a suggestion by one of these commenters,undermine the Control Authority's determination of an appropriate monitoringfrequency. The requirement deals not with routine monitoring and its frequency,but rather with gathering a minimal amount of additional data where violationsare revealed by such monitoring. It should not have any adverse effecton the Control Authority's determination of monitoring frequencies.On a related issue, one POTW commented that for POTWs that monitor theirindustrial users monthly the resampling requirement within 30 days wouldbe duplicative. EPA agrees that where the Control Authority monitors anindustrial user at a frequency of at least once per month, resampling bythe industrial user is not necessary, since the Control Authority willalways have data from consecutive sampling that are not more than 30 daysapart (the same period allowed under the proposed requirement). Indeed,even if the Control Authority monitors the industrial user at a lower frequencythan once per month, if a Control Authority monitoring event occurs betweenthe industrial user's original sampling and the user's receipt of resultsfrom this sampling, the industrial user should not have to resample becausethe Control Authority will already have its own ``resampling'' data tocompare to the user's data. Accordingly, EPA is modifying the requirementto allow for this. Of course, if the Control Authority does not performits own monitoring until after the industrial user has received resultsof its own sampling indicating a violation, and the Control Authority isnot monitoring on at least a monthly basis, the industrial user will haveto resample and submit both results within the 30-day time period.Only two commenters, one State and one municipality, responded to EPA'ssolicitation of comments regarding the scope of the resampling requirement(i.e., whether the requirement should apply to all industrial users orto some group, such as categorical users). (Another State misunderstoodthe Agency to be soliciting comment on the scope of the biannual reportingrequirement itself.) Both commenters recommended limiting the requirementto categorical industrial users, while allowing the Control Authority toextend it to other users. The State provided no specific justificationfor its position. The city cited the ``unnecessary cost'' of an all-inclusiverequirement, but failed to offer any explanation of why the cost wouldbe unnecessary. Based on this limited response, EPA is not persuaded thatthe resampling requirement should apply only to categorical industrialusers. Applying the requirement to all users should not result in ``unnecessarycost'' or other undue burdens. EPA fails to see why resampling for violationsof local limits is any less necessary than for violations of categoricalstandards. Moreover, as noted above, the need to resample can be avoidedaltogether simply by maintaining compliance. Therefore, the Agency hasdrafted the final rule so as to apply to all industrial users whose self-monitoringdiscloses a violation of applicable pretreatment standards.Several commenters recommended requiring industrial users to notify theControl Authority of violations without waiting for the results of resampling.Suggested time periods for such notification ranged from immediately towithin 5 days of receipt of the sampling results. An industry commentersuggested modifying the proposal to parallel 40 CFR 122.41(1)(6) of theNPDES regulations, which requires oral notification of certain violationswithin 24 hours, followed by written notification within 5 days. One cityeven suggested requiring submission of <T3>all </T3>monitoring results (not just violations) within 30 days ofcollection.EPA agrees with the concept of requiring prompt notification of violationswithout waiting until the resampling results are received. As noted byone commenter, this would give the Control Authority flexibility to takewhatever other steps might be necessary, including performing its own monitoring,without imposing an unreasonable additional burden on the industrial users.For serious violations that might endanger health (e.g., of workers atthe POTW) or the environment (e.g., through impacts on receiving water),prompt notification to the Control Authority is particularly important,and is not required under any existing provision of the pretreatment regulations(see, II.D.7., above). Therefore, EPA is modifying the final rule to require,in addition to the resampling discussed above, notification of violationsto the Control Authority within 24 hours of the industrial user becomingaware of the violation. This notification may be either oral or written,and will be followed up by the resampling results within 30 days. Likethe resampling requirement, this notification requirement will apply toall industrial users.Finally, an industry commenter suggested a relatively complex scheme involvingdifferent submission deadlines depending on whether the limit violatedis a daily maximum or other (e.g., monthly or weekly) limit. Although itwas not clearly stated in the proposal, the resampling requirement is intendedto apply only to daily maximum limits in the categorical pretreatment standards.Because monthly and weekly limits are based on <T3>averaging </T3>sampling results, a single sampling event will not necessarilydemonstrate whether the industrial user is in compliance.d. <T3>Today's rule. </T3>EPA is promulgating the rule as proposed, with thefollowing modifications. First, under the final rule the only results ofadditional monitoring performed by the industrial user that must be includedin the periodic reports required under andSection; 403.12(e) are those arrivedat using test procedures approved under 40 CFR Part 136 or approved alternatives.This is consistent with the comparable requirement in andSection; 122.41(1)(4)(ii)of the NPDES regulations. Second, the time period for resampling and submittingboth sets of results has been extended to 30 days to allow sufficient timefor transmittal time and lab turnaround. Third, where the Control Authoritymonitors at least once a month, or monitors between industrial user samplingand receipt of results of the sampling, the industrial user is not requiredto resample. Fourth, the final rule clearly states that the 30-day periodstarts to run on the industrial user's receipt of the results of its originalsampling. Finally, in addition to the resampling requirement, the finalrule also requires industrial users to notify the Control Authority within24 hours of any violation of an applicable pretreatment standard. Thislast requirement ensures that prior to its receipt of the results of theindustrial user's resampling, the Control Authority will be in a positionto take whatever additional actions may be necessary or appropriate inresponse to the reported violation(s).<ITAG tagnum="81">D.10. Self Monitoring vs. </ITAG>POTW Monitoring [40 CFR 403.12(g)]  a. <T3>Existing rule. </T3>Industrial users are required to perform certainsampling and analyses for purposes of preparing the various reports describedin andSection;403.12 (the baseline monitoring report, 90-day compliance report,and periodic compliance reports). (<T3>See, </T3>andSection;403.12(g).) The Control Authority is also requiredto conduct its own independent compliance monitoring program (<T3>see,</T3> andSection;403.8(f)(2)(v)). In addition, States and EPA periodicallysample industrial users. These industrial user reports based on the resultsof self-monitoring are the primary means by which Control and ApprovalAuthorities determine compliance with pretreatment standards. However,compliance sampling by Control and Approval Authorities is used primarilyas a periodic check on the industrial user's monitoring and to generateadditional data for enforcement.   b. <T3>Proposed change. </T3>PIRT recommended that andSection;403.12 be amendedto expressly allow POTW monitoring in lieu of self-monitoring by industrialusers. According to the Task Force, some POTWs have indicated they wouldprefer to base their compliance program on sampling and analysis they performthemselves rather than on self-monitoring by industrial users because thereports submitted by some industrial users are not reliable. PIRT alsonoted that some industrial users would prefer that the POTW conduct themonitoring procedures. The General Pretreatment Regulations were not clearas to whether this is allowed.   In response to PIRT's recommendation, EPA proposed to amend andSection;403.12(g)to allow the Control Authority to perform the sampling and analyses requiredfor baseline monitoring reports, 90-day compliance reports and periodiccompliance reports in lieu of the industrial user. POTWs choosing to performtheir own sampling and analyses for purposes of the reports in andSection;403.12must perform at least the same amount of sampling and analysis as is requiredof industrial users.   Where the Control Authority chooses to perform the required sampling andanalysis itself, the industrial user would still have to submit any otherinformation required by the applicable paragraph of andSection;403.12. Forexample, where the Control Authority is performing the sampling and analysesotherwise required of the industrial user for a BMR, the user would stillbe required to submit the identifying information, list of environmentalpermits, production information and description of operations describedin andSection;403.12(b)(1)-(3). The user would also remain responsible forproviding the Control Authority with the compliance certification describedin andSection;403.12(b)(6) and, if necessary, the compliance schedule describedin andSection;403.12(b)(7).   EPA also clarified that where it chooses to monitor in lieu of the industrialusers, the Control Authority is not bound by the July and December reportingfrequency for periodic reports in andSection;403.12(e). Under andSection;403.12(e),the Control Authority has the discretion to alter the months during whichthese reports are to be submitted, and thus the months during which itmust perform the required sampling and analysis.   c. <T3>Response to comments. </T3>EPA received comments on this issue fromseveral POTWs, two industries, a State and one trade association. All ofthe commenters supported the proposal. Several commenters also had additionalsuggestions for implementing PIRT's recommendation.   One POTW recommended that the proposal be expanded to eliminate the needfor industrial users to automatically submit the 90-day and periodic compliancereports (andSection;andSection;403.12(d) and (e), respectively), because inmost cases flow data is not essential to the POTW unless production ormass limits are used. The commenter also questioned whether the industrialuser can certify its compliance status based on monitoring data generatedby the POTW. Finally, the commenter recommended that if the reports areto remain mandatory, this fact should be clearly stated in the regulationitself. EPA first wishes to point out that flow data is important evenwhere the industrial user is subject only to concentration limits. UnderandSection;403.6(d) of the pretreatment regulations, dilution is prohibitedas a partial or complete substitute for adequate treatment to achieve compliancewith pretreatment standards (see II.A4., above). Dilution may occur withouta significant increase in the concentration of a particular pollutant inan industrial user's effluent. It is thus important that the Control Authorityhave flow data to detect possible dilution; concentration data alone maynot reveal dilution, because the concentration may stay substantially thesame while the flow increases. However, in some cases the POTW may performthe necessary flow measurement as well as all other sampling and analysisrequired for the report. In such cases, EPA agrees with the commenter thatit is not necessary for the industrial user to submit a separate report,because the POTW already has all relevant information. EPA also agreeswith the commenter that industrial users should not be expected to certifyto their compliance status based on data collected by the POTW. The Agencyis modifying the final rule to provide that this certification will notbe required where the POTW performs all of the required monitoring. Inresponse to the commenter's final concern that the regulations should clearlystate whether the industrial user will be required to submit a report whenthe POTW is performing the required monitoring, the Agency is also modifyingthe final rule to provide that where the POTW collects all the data requiredunder andSection;403.12 for a 90-day or periodic report, including flow data,the industrial user will not be required to submit the report. In suchcases, submittal by the industrial user would be unnecessarily duplicative.An industry commenter recommended providing the industrial user with theright to obtain split samples and results of any analyses conducted bythe Control Authority. While EPA understands the commenter's concern forverification of analyses performed by the Control Authority, a specificregulatory provision to this effect is not necessary. If the industrialuser wishes to receive split samples or other data on its discharge collectedby the Control Authority, it should make this request directly to the ControlAuthority. Some POTWs already provide their industrial users with suchinformation. For purposes of the federal regulations, however, EPA feelsit is sufficient to require that adequate sampling, analysis and reportingbe performed, and to allow this monitoring and reporting to be performedby either the industrial user or the POTW.    Another industry commenter conditioned its support of the proposal on EPA'sclarifying that the amount of monitoring performed by the POTW in lieuof the industrial user should be based on the same criteria that wouldbe used by the POTW to determine the appropriate monitoring amount forthe industrial user if self-monitoring were relied on. POTWs have widelatitude in devising appropriate monitoring requirements for their industrialusers. The revisions to andSection; 403.12(g) being promulgated today (seeII.D.9., above) require that for periodic compliance reports under andSection;403.12(e), the frequency of monitoring required is that which is necessaryto assess and assure compliance by the industrial users. This criterionapplies whether the monitoring is performed by the industrial user or thePOTW. For more detailed guidance on monitoring frequencies and other aspectsof compliance monitoring and enforcement, see EPA's ``Pretreatment ComplianceMonitoring and Enforcement Guidance'' (1986).    The industry trade association commented that POTWs electing to performmonitoring in lieu of their industrial users should be required to followappropriate procedures, including chain-of-custody and QA/QC requirements.Section 403.8(f)(2)(vi) of the regulations already requires that samplingand analysis be performed with sufficient care to produce evidence admissiblein enforcement proceedings or in judicial actions. Satisfying this requirementnecessarily entails the use of proper monitoring procedures. Therefore,no additional requirement is necessary.    Finally, a POTW commented that to be compatible with cost recovery requirementsin the federal construction grants regulations, POTWs monitoring in lieuof their industrial users should be required to recover those costs directlyfrom the monitored industrial user. EPA disagrees with the commenter. POTWswith approved pretreatment programs are already required to perform monitoringof their industrial users to independently determine whether the usersare in compliance with applicable pretreatment standards and requirements.(<T3>See</T3>, andSection; 403.8(f)(2)(v).) Moreover, there is nothing inthe federal regulations, including the grants regulations, that requiressuch cost recovery for such monitoring, and EPA declines to add such arequirement to the pretreatment regulations. Of course, the regulationsdo not prohibit a POTW from charging its industrial users for monitoringit performs.    d. <T3>Today's rule. </T3>EPA is promulgating the final rule as proposed,with the following modifications. The final rule provides that where thePOTW performs all of the required sampling and analysis, the industrialuser will not be required to submit a compliance certification. In addition,the final rule provides that where the POTW collects all of the data requiredfor the report, the industrial user is not required to submit the report.(Of course, the POTW may impose additional or more stringent reportingrequirements than those in the federal regulations.)<ITAG tagnum="81">D.11. Notification by Industrial Users of Changed Discharge [40 CFR403.12(j)]    </ITAG>a. <T3>Existing rule. </T3>Under 40 CFR 122.42(b)(2) of the NPDES regulations,POTWs are required to notify their permitting authority of any substantialchange in the volume or character of pollutants being introduced into thePOTW by its industrial users. This notification allows the NPDES permittingauthority to determine whether additional limits are needed in the POTW'spermit because of industrial user discharges to the POTW. Of course, inorder to fulfill this requirement, the POTW must obtain the necessary informationfrom its industrial users. Although industrial users must submit semi-annualcompliance reports describing the nature and concentration of pollutantsregulated by categorical standards (andSection; 403.12(e)), the current pretreatmentregulations do not require all industrial users to notify the POTW of anysubstantial change in their discharges to the POTW. Accordingly, therecurrently is no mechanism in the general pretreatment regulations for POTWsto obtain the information necessary to comply with andSection; 122.42(b).   b. <T3>Proposed change. </T3>EPA proposed to add a new paragraph (j) to andSection;403.12 requiring all industrial users to promptly notify the POTW of anysubstantial change in the volume or character of pollutants in the user'sdischarge to the POTW. This would ensure that the POTW has the necessaryinformation to meet its obligation under andSection; 122.42(b)(2).C. <T3>Response to comments</T3>. Nearly all commenters, including POTWs,affected industries, and one environmental group, supported the proposedrule. Several POTW commenters noted that they already required such notificationfrom their industrial users. About half of the commenters, however, expressedconcern about the subjectivity of the term ``substantial'' in the proposedrule and/or offered suggestions on quantifying the term. One industry commenterflatly opposed the proposed rule as an unnecessary burden on POTWs andindustrial users, unless the reporting requirement was limited to changesin the industrial user's discharge which exceed permit limits.The proposed rule is necessary regardless of whether the change in theindustrial user's discharge would cause it to violate limits in its permitor other control mechanism. The purpose of this reporting requirement isnot to collect information on users' noncompliance, but to establish aprocedure for POTWs to receive timely information on changes to industrialcontributions to its system (including changes in pollutant loadings thatmay not be specifically regulated by a current control mechanism) so thatthe POTW can comply with the notification requirements of its NPDES permit.EPA does not understand how this can be a burden to POTWs and none objectedto receiving this information. In fact, the comments from POTWs indicatethat the kind of reporting envisioned by the proposed rule is already commonlyrequired by POTWs. This suggests that for many industrial users, the rulewill not impose additional burdens.Just as importantly, the information on changed discharges will allow aPOTW responsible for implementing a local pretreatment program to determinewhether it needs to consider adjustments to its local limits based on changedcharacteristics or volume of wastewater in its system. As discussed above(see II.A.2.), POTWs with approved programs are required to have locallimits which implement the general and specific prohibitions in andSection;403.5(c) and to update them as necessary. EPA does not anticipate thatthe industrial user's report of changed discharge alone will be a sufficientbasis to adjust limits, but will provide the POTW with relevant informationto determine if the adequacy of local limits should be reevaluated.An industrial user is required to promptly notify its POTW of any substantialchange in the volume or character or pollutants discharged to the POTW.This notification requirement is in addition to other reporting requirementsin the General Pretreatment Regulations, such as regular compliance reportingin andSection; 403.12(e). Users are required to notify the POTW of a substantialchange in any characteristic of the User's wastewater discharge includingvolume of flow, the amount or concentration of regulated (under categoricalstandards or local limits) or unregulated pollutants, and the dischargeof new pollutants not previously reported to the POTW.As explained in the preamble to the proposed rule, the purpose of the ``changeddischarge'' notification is to ensure that the POTW has the necessary informationto comply with the notification requirements in its NPDES permit requiredby 40 CFR 122.42(b)(2). After the POTW receives the relevant informationfrom an industrial user, the POTW is responsible for passing this informationalong to the NPDES permitting authority together with information aboutthe anticipated impact of the change on the quantity or quality of theeffluent to be discharged from the POTW (andSection; 122.42(b)(3)). Basedupon this and other relevant information (e.g., notice of newly-connectedusers to the POTW's system), the NPDES permitting authority can determinewhether the POTW's NPDES permit limits should be changed to adequatelycontrol pollutant discharges from the POTW. In addition, the POTW can usethe same information to determine whether it needs to change controls onthe wastewater entering the treatment works (or take other appropriatemeasures) to adequately protect its system and receiving water quality.The comments received by EPA suggested a wide range of possibilities fordefining ``substantial change.'' In addition to requiring notice only whenpermit limits are violated, these suggestions include: Changes of morethan 50 percent, deviations of 25 percent or more, a flow increase of morethan 1500 gallons per day resulting from process modifications or increasedsize or number of facilities, and a change of 20 percent or more from previouslyreported values (consistent with EPA's ``Guidance Manual for the Use ofProduction-Based Pretreatment Standards and the Combined Wastestream Formula''(1985)). One commenter, suggesting a possible quantification, also notedthat ``substantial change'' may have to be defined by the POTW on a case-by-casebasis depending on the particular pollutant and the amount of flow contributedby a particular user.Neither the POTW's requirement to notify its NPDES permitting authorityabout substantial changes in its industrial users' contributions (40 CFR122.42) nor existing Agency guidance define ``substantial change'' forthis provision. While EPA agrees that there is a legitimate need for guidanceon the meaning of this term, it has determined that a regulatory definitionof ``significant change'' is inadvisable because, as noted by one commenter,what is substantial in a given situation will depend on several variables,particularly the type of pollutant being discharged and the percentageof flow contributed by the discharger. To preserve necessary flexibility,EPA declines to adopt one specific measure as suggested by several commenters.Instead, for purposes of this regulation, ``substantial change'' shouldbe determined by the comparable notice requirements for direct dischargersunder the NPDES regulations and supplemental, or more stringent, noticerequirements adopted by the POTW or required by the permitting authorityin the POTW's NPDES permit.As suggested by the purpose of the changed discharge notification, onlychanges which the industrial user expects to occur on a regular or routinebasis over an extended period of time (three months or more) need to bereported. Sporadic or episodic changes in the volume of character of adischarge are not covered by the changed discharge notification. (However,depending on the circumstances, the industrial user may have to reportthese discharges in accordance with other pretreatment requirements, e.g.,the ``slug load'' notification requirements (andSection;403.12), the upsetprovision (andSection;403.16), or bypass provision (andSection;403.17) discussedat Parts II.D.7., II.E.4., and II.E.5., of this preamble, respectively.)In most cases, a substantial change in the volume or characteristic ofa user's discharge will result from a deliberate or planned change to theuser's facility or operations. Accordingly, the industrial user shouldnotify the POTW as soon as it knows of plans to change its facilities oroperations which will affect its discharge. In no case should the POTWbe notified later than when the changed discharge occurs. Industrial usersneed only notify the POTW of ``substantial changes'' in the volume or characterof pollutant discharges to the POTW. Industrial users should know the volumeand characteristics of their pollutant discharges to a POTW and if theirdischarges have or will change in the future on a regular basis. However,as discussed above, determining whether a change is ``substantial'' maydepend on several other factors. For purposes of the change discharge notificationrequirement promulgated today, ``substantial'' should be based on the magnitudeof change to the industrial user's existing discharge and not on the anticipatedeffect of the changed discharge on the POTW. Therefore, absolute numberssuch as an increase or decrease of X gallons of flow discharged would notbe appropriate. Although this approach may result in notifications aboutchanged discharges which will not have a demonstrable effect on the POTW'sinfluent, effluent or sludge quality, EPA has determined that any incidental``over notification'' is justified by the need of the POTW (and NPDES permittingauthority) to have information on a timely basis to determine whether,considering other changes to the POTW's system or pollutant control requirements,new limits on pollutant discharges are necessary or should be further evaluated.Note, however, a POTW may have other legitimate reasons for requiring industrialusers to notify the POTW of changes in the volume or characteristic oftheir wastewater flow. Today's rule does not negate such local notice requirements.Because comparable NPDES notification requirements use the ``discharger'sperspective'' approach, they should be considered general guidance fordetermining when an industrial user should notify the POTW of changed discharges.For example, andSection;122.41(l)(1) requires a discharger to give noticeas soon as possible of ``any planned physical alterations or additionsto the permitted facility * * * when (i) the alteration or addition toa permitted facility may meet one of the criteria for determining whethera facility is a new source * * * [see andSection;403.3(k), as amended bytoday's final rule]; or (ii) the alteration or addition could significantlychange the nature or increase the quantity of pollutants [or flow for pretreatmentprogram purposes] discharged'' for pollutants which are not specificallylimited in the permit or subject to specific notification requirements.For toxic pollutants which are not specifically limited, the dischargermust give notice of any activity which has occurred or will occur thatwould result in a changed discharge which will exceed the notificationlevels specified in andSection;122.42(a)(1). Discharges which are specifically regulated are subject to different rules.Dischargers who are subject to production-based standards should use thenotification levels established in andSection;403.6(c) (as amended today)for determining when a change in the user's flow or production compelsnotice to the POTW of the changed discharge. The comparable NPDES notificationrequirements should serve as general guidance of the minimum requirementsfor notifying the POTW of a changed discharge under today's final rule.Of course, a POTW may further refine the notification requirements to takeinto account site specific factors such as the percentage of total flowor pollutant loading contributed by a particular discharger. Most POTWsalso limit or closely monitor flow, which is not as uniformly importantin the NPDES program. As a practical matter, industrial users which anticipatechanges to their facilities or production processes can benefit from keepingthe POTW well informed about the nature of their discharges. Whether ornot a user complies with the changed discharge notification requirement,it remains subject to liability for violating the general or specific prohibitionsin andSection;403.5. However, it may be able to establish an affirmativedefense based on compliance with an applicable local limit establishedin accordance with andSection;403.5(c)(1). (<T3>See, </T3>52 FR 1586, January 14, 1987, for a thorough discussion ofthis affirmative defense and one based on ``unchanged discharge.'') Becauseonly POTWs can establish local limits which serve as the basis for theaffirmative defense, the industrial user must work with the POTW to obtainthese limits and supply adequate information, including changes in dischargeactivities, for the POTW to develop and maintain technically sound limits.d. <T3>Today's rule. </T3>EPA is promulgating the final rule as proposed,except to clarify that prompt notification shall be made ``in advance''of a changed discharge. <T3>E. Miscellaneous   </T3><ITAG tagnum="81">1. New Source Criteria [40 CFR 403.3(k)]   </ITAG>a. <T3>Existing rule. </T3>``New source'' is defined for the purpose of thepretreatment program at andSection;403.3(k) of the General Pretreatment Regulations.The regulations, however, do not address the basis for determining whetherconstruction creates a new source at a site_thus making the industrialuser subject to pretreatment standards for new sources_or merely modifiesan existing source. The NPDES regulations (andSection;122.29(b)) containspecific criteria for new source determinations for direct dischargers.This provision was revised on September 26, 1984 (49 FR 37998). As stipulatedin andSection;122.29(b), construction, activities could result in a ``newsource'' if (1) it is construction of a source at a new or ``greenfield''site; (2) it is construction at a site of an existing source which totallyreplaces the process or production equipment causing the discharge at anexisting source; or (3) it creates not only a new ``building, structure,facility, or installation,'' but it is ``substantially independent'' ofan existing source at the same site. The new source determination criteriaat 40 CFR 122.29(b) also include factors to be considered in applying the``substantial independence'' test, and provide a clarification of whenconstruction is deemed to commence.   b. <T3>Proposed change. </T3>It is equally important that Approval and ControlAuthorities, indirect discharges, and the public be able to determine whetherconstruction at the site of an indirect discharger's existing facilitywould result in a new source or simply a modification of an existing source.Like direct dischargers, indirect dischargers that are new sources oftenmust meet more stringent standards than existing sources. Therefore, EPAproposed to add new source determination criteria identical to those foundin the NPDES regulations to the pretreatment definition of ``new source.''  As in the NPDES regulations, the proposed changes set out three criteria.Construction by an industrial user would be classified as a new sourceif: (1) The construction is carried out at a site at which no other sourceis located, (2) the construction totally replaces the process or productionequipment that causes the discharge of pollutants at an existing source,or (3) the production or wastewater generating processes of the constructedfacility are substantially independent of an existing source at the samesite. Any construction at the site of an existing facility that does notmeet the above criteria will not result in a new source.   The first two criteria deal with situations where it is obviously appropriateto impose the generally more stringent new source standards. The thirdcriterion, the ``substantial independence'' test is based on the notionthat in those situations where there is new construction but less thantotal replacement at an existing facility, the classification decisionshould be based on the degree to which the constructed facility functionsindependently of the esisting source. The proposed substantial independencetest also set forth two factors that should be considered in making thedetermination of whether construction at an existing facility results inprocesses that are substantially independent and therefore quality as anew source: (1) The extent to which the new facility is integrated withthe existing plant; and (2) the extent to which the new facility is engagedin the same general type of activity as the existing source.   The proposal, like the parallel NPDES provision, also stated that constructionis deemed to commence when the following are begun as part of a continuouson-site construction program: (1) Installation or assembly of facilitiesor equipment, or (2) significant site preparation work necessary for suchinstallation or assembly. Construction is also deemed to commence whenthe owner or operator of the facility has entered into a binding contractualobligation for the purchase of facilities or equipment which are intendedto be used in its operation within a reasonable time. The proposal alsoclarifies that options to purchase or contracts that can be terminatedor modified without substantial loss, and contracts for feasibility, engineeringand design studies do not constitute such a contractual obligation.c. <T3>Response to comments. </T3>Fifteen commenters responding to this proposedchange agreed with the Agency's intent in making the change. These commentersagreed with the Agency that the change was necessary to clarify the criteriaused in determining whether an indirect discharger is a new source. Nineof the fifteen commenters fully agreed with the proposed change. The remainderagreed with the intent of the change, but suggested some clarificationor examples were needed. Several commenters suggested that the term ``totally replaces'' in proposedandSection;403.3(k)(1)(ii) be changed to ``substantial change not independentof an existing source.'' Furthermore, these three commenters suggesteddefining ``substantial change not independent of an existing source'' as``a change in the process operation that results in a significant changein the volume or nature of the wastewater so that existing methods of controland pretreatment applied needs to be modified or upgraded.'' These commenterssuggested these changes so that an indirect discharger could not changeover all the equipment in a building, except for one piece, thereby remainingan existing source. The Agency does not agree with these commenters' suggested changes. Asnoted in the preamble to the September 26, 1984, NPDES regulations package,``EPA proposed that, in the situations where there was new constructionbut less than total replacement at existing facilities, the (new source)classification decision should be based on the degree to which the constructedfacility functions independently of the existing source.'' (49 FR 38043)This same substantial independence test should be used for indirect dischargesthat do not totally replace an existing facility. This situation is coveredby proposed andSection;403.3(k)(1)(iii). As noted in the September 26, 1984preamble, ``(T)he substantial independence test was aimed as ascertainingwhether an existing source which undertakes major construction that legitimatelyprovides it with the opportunity to install the best and most efficientproduction process and wastewater treatment technologies should be requiredto meet new source performance standards at that facility.'' (49 FR 38403)Therefore, the change to andSection;403.3(k)(1)(ii) suggested by these commenterswould be redundant, since the situation is already covered by andSection;403.3(k)(1)(iii).One Control Authority suggested that ``totally replaces'' should be changedto ``substantially replaces''. This commenter also suggested that the term``substantially independent process'' be clarified. As noted above, changing``totally replaces'' to ``substantially replaces'' would cause redundantprovisions in the regulations. However, clarification of the term ``substantiallyindependent process'' is appropriate. The proposed change to the GeneralPretreatment Regulations contained the language describing the two factorsused in determining whether new construction is substantially independentof an existing facility, andSection;403.3(k)(1)(iii) (51 FR 21444, 21473).However, since these factors were previously described in greater detailin response to the same issue, the Agency reproduces that discussion, asset forth in the September 26, 1984, NPDES regulations (49 FR 37998, 38043-38044):<ITAG tagnum="21">The first factor is the degree of integration of a new process withexisting processes. Under the first factor, if the new facility is fullyintegrated into the overall existing plan, the facility will not be a newsource. For example, a plant may decide to improve the quality of a productby installing a new purification step into its process, such as a new filteror distillation column. Such a minor change would be integral to existingoperations and would not require the facility to be as a new source. However,on the other extreme, if the only connection between the new and old facilityis that they are supplied utilities such as steam, electricity, or coolingwater from the same source or that their wastewater effluents are treatedin the same [onsite] treatment plant, then the new facility will be a newsource. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Four commenters [on the NPDES proposed regulations] argued that ifa new process or plan used existing treatment equipment, for that reasonalone it should not be considered a new source. EPA disagrees with thesecomments [on the NPDES regulations]. The legislative history of the CWAindicates that new source requirements were intended to apply where newconstruction allows flexibility to incorporate new pollution control technology.The fact that a facility can be constructed to utilize an existing wastetreatment plant does not address the issue of whether new technology couldhave been installed. To allow the use of an existing treatment system,by itself, to preclude the application of new source requirements wouldfrustrate clear statutory intent. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The second clarifying factor that EPA has added is the extent to whichthe construction results in facilities or processes that are engaged inthe same general type of activity as the existing source. Under this secondfactor, if the proposed facility is engaged in a sufficiently similar typeof activity as the existing source, it will not be treated as a new source.For example, if a plant begins to produce a new product, e.g., nylon syntheticfiber, which is very similar to the product currently being produced bythe plant, e.g., polyester synthetic fiber, using equipment that is essentiallythe same as the existing production equipment, this would likely be consideredan existing source. However, if a plant producing a final product, e.g.,polyester synthetic fiber, adds new equipment to produce the raw materialsfor that product, e.g., terephthalic acid or ethylene glycol, the proposedstructure would likely constitute a new source. Of course to the extentthe construction results in facilities engaged in the same type of activitybecause it essentially replicates, without replacing, the existing source,the new construction would result in a new source.</ITAG>Two other commenters suggested that EPA should further clarify the term``substantially independent'' by including several examples. The firstcommenter questioned whether ``substantial independence'' was determinedby the physical location of a new facility or product line within a facility,the function of a new process, or the route the wastewater takes to getto the sewer. This commenter provided the example of a job shop electroplaterthat adds a new anodizing line to its facility. The commenter questionedwhether the new line would be a new source if no anodizing line existedthere previously, and also questioned the status of the new line if previouslyan anodizing line was in operation. In determining whether a new facilityis a new source, the three factors (physical location, function, and wastewaterflow route) should be considered. Furthermore, the examples given in theSeptember 26, 1984, NPDES rulemaking should also be considered in makingthis determination. The Agency cannot respond to the two specific situationsabove without further information regarding the facility. In determiningwhether a facility is a new source, the totality of the situation needsto be addressed. Finally, one local Control Authority requested a clarification of the status(new source or existing source) of a facility that moves existing equipmentinto a new building or into an existing building that did not previouslyhave an industrial discharge to the sewer. Under today's rule, dischargesfrom such facilities would be new sources if the other requirements regardingconstruction of the source after proposal of new source standards weremet. d. <T3>Today's rule. </T3>EPA is promulgating this change as proposed. <ITAG tagnum="81">E.2. New Source Compliance Deadline [40 CFR 403.6(b)]</ITAG>a. <T3>Existing rule. </T3>The current regulations state that compliance withcategorical pretreatment standards for new sources will be required ``uponpromulgation.'' (40 CFR 403.6(b).) However, new sources generally willcommence discharge after promulgation of a categorical standard applicableto them. For these industrial users, compliance ``upon promulgation'' ismeaningless. Furthermore, requiring immediate compliance by new sourcesis inconsistent with the NPDES regulations, which require compliance bydirect dischargers that are new sources ``within the shortest feasibletime (not to exceed 90 days).'' (40 CFR 122.29(d)(4).) The NPDES regulationsalso require directly discharging new sources to ``install and have inoperating condition, and [to] start-up all pollution control equipment* * * before beginning to discharge.'' <T3>Id.</T3>b. <T3>Proposed change. </T3>EPA proposed to insert in andSection; 403.6(b)language identical to that in 40 CFR 122.29(d)(4) with respect to the deadlinefor compliance by new sources. Under that proposal, new source indirectdischargers, like new source direct dischargers, would be required to installand start-up any necessary pollution control equipment before beginningto discharge. These sources would then be required to achieve compliancewith applicable categorical standards within the shortest feasible time,not to exceed 90 days, after commencement of discharge. The proposed regulatorychanges would ensure that indirect dischargers that are new sources havea meaningful compliance deadline consistent with that for direct dischargers.c. <T3>Response to comments. </T3>All eleven commenters agreed with this proposedchange. Commenters stated that the 90-day period was feasible, logical,realistic, and desirable as being consistent with the requirements fordirect dischargers. However, one commenter agreed with the intent of thechange, but commented that, from the standpoint of POTWs and environmentalhealth, 90 days appeared to be far too long. This commenter suggested that10 days would be more reasonable, but only if no significant interferenceor pass through problems were likely to occur from the noncompliant dischargeduring that time period. Today's regulation would not deter a Control Authorityfrom requiring a shorter ``grace-period'' for a new source to be in compliancewith the standards. A POTW that may experience pass through or interferencedue to the start-up of a new source could certainly require complianceupon start-up.A Control Authority agreed with the need to allow a certain start-up periodbefore a new source must be in compliance with the categorical limit. Butthis commenter stated that the local pretreatment program administrator,who is most familiar with the facts of the situation, should be allowedto determine the consequences of the non-compliance and decide on the appropriateenforcement action to be taken. This commenter suggested that such decisionscould include lengthening or shortening the time period for compliance.The Agency does not agree with this commenter's suggestions. National consistencyis needed on this issue to avoid ``forum shopping'' by new sources lookingfor a lenient Control Authority that will allow a longer start-up period.As noted above, this change was proposed to provide consistency betweendirect and indirect discharger regulations.d. <T3>Today' rule. </T3>EPA is promulgating this regulation as proposed.<ITAG tagnum="81">E.3. Net/Gross [40 CFR 403.15]</ITAG>a. <T3>Existing rule. </T3>Section 403.15 allows industrial users to requestthat EPA adjust an applicable categorical pretreatment standard to reflectcredit for pollutants in the intake water. This section was patterned aftera similar provision in the NPDES regulations (40 CFR 122.45(f)). It differsfrom the NPDES provision by providing that only EPA may grant net credits,where the NPDES provision allows approved States to grant credits.An industrial user may obtain a credit under andSection; 403.15 if it demonstratesthat: (1) Its intake water is drawn from the same body of water into whichthe discharge from its publicly owned treatment works is made, (2) thepollutants present in the intake water will not be entirely removed bythe treatment system operated by the industrial user, (3) the pollutantsin the intake water do not vary chemically or biologically from the pollutantlimited by the applicable standards, and (4) the industrial user does notsignificantly increase concentrations of pollutants in the intake water,even if the total mass of pollutants remains the same. Net/gross creditsare available only to the extent that pollutants are not removed by intakeand effluent treatment systems used by the industrial user.b. <T3>Proposed change. </T3>EPA promulgated a revised net/gross provisionfor the NPDES program (andSection; 122.45(g)), on September 26, 1984 (49FR 37998). The revised rule was designed to be a less complicated and moreworkable approach to the process of granting requests by direct dischargersfor a limitation on a net basis. A full discussion of the considerationsunderlying EPA's amendment of the NPDES provision can be found at 49 FR38025-38028 (September 26, 1984). These same considerations are equallyapplicable to the pretreatment program. EPA therefore proposed to amendthe net/gross provision in the General Pretreatment Regulations to makeit consistent with the revised NPDES provision.The proposal provided that upon the request of an industrial user, an applicablecategorical pretreatment standard would be adjusted to reflect credit forpollutants in the intake water. The user must demonstrate that the controlsystem it proposes to use or is using to meet the categorical standardwould, if properly installed and operated, meet the standard in the absenceof pollutants in the intake water. The basic principle is that such a controlsystem must be applied to the discharger's effluent, but that credit isavailable as necessary to meet applicable limitations after control systemis applied. In addition, under the proposal, credit for generic pollutants(e.g., BOD, COD, TSS, oil and grease) would not be allowed unless the industrialuser demonstrates that the constituents of the generic measure in its effluentare substantially similar to the constituents of the generic measure inthe intake water, or unless appropriate additional limits are placed onprocess water pollutants either at the outfall or elsewhere. The purposeof this restriction is to prevent the discharge of wastes that are moretoxic than intake water pollutants, but are controlled by a limitationthat does not measure this difference in toxicity, such as an oil and greaselimit (i.e., indicator pollutants).Under the proposal, credit for intake pollutants would only be allowedto the extent necessary to meet the applicable categorical standard, upto a maximum value equal to the influent value. Also, the user must generallydemonstrate that the intake water is drawn from the same body of wateras that into which the POTW discharges. While an industrial user shouldnot be held responsible for pollutants already existing in its water supplyif the POTW discharges into the same body of water from which the usertakes its water, the same reasoning cannot support allowance of a creditwhere the POTW's discharge is into another body of water. The grant ofa credit in the latter case would allow a discharger to transfer pollutantsfrom one body of water to another, thus resulting in the addition of pollutantsto particular receiving waters for the first time. However, the proposalallowed the Control Authority to waive this ``same body of water'' requirementif it finds that no environmental degradation will result. An example mightbe where intake waters are taken from a relatively clean tributary of arelatively dirty body of water and discharged by the POTW to the latterbody, possibly adjacent to where the tributary itself flows into the largebody.The proposal also incorporated a PIRT recommendation that control Authoritiesbe allowed to make net/gross determinations. The Task Force based its recommendationon several factors. First, PIRT pointed out that net/gross determinationsfor direct dischargers are routinely made by the NPDES permit issuing authority,which is the functional equivalent of the pretreatment Control Authority.Second, PIRT stated that net/gross determinations for indirect dischargersare an activity that can be delegated to POTWs and States implementingthe pretreatment program, provided that EPA develops suitable guidanceon making such determinations. Finally, PIRT noted that andSection; 403.15currently provided that net/gross determinations can only be made by theEPA ``Enforcement Division Director,'' a position that no longer existsat the Regional level. (EPA issued a final rule in the <T4>Federal Register </T4>on June 4, 1986 (51 FR 20426) making technicalamendments to the General Pretreatment Regulations, including changingall references to the ``Enforcement Division Director'' to read ``WaterManagement Division Director'' to correctly reflect the Agency's currentorganization.) EPA agreed with PIRT's recommendation and proposed to amendandSection; 403.15 to allow net/gross determinations to be made by the ControlAuthority. The Agency proposed to provide appropriate guidance as needed.c. <T3>Response to comments. </T3>Of the seven commenters responding to theproposed revision, only one fully agreed with the proposal. Three othercommenters agreed with the intent of the proposed change, but providedsuggestions on clarifying or strengthening the provision. Three other commenters,two industrial associations and an industrial user, opposed the revision.All three commenters opposed to the revision stated that EPA has no statutoryauthority to require a discharger to remove pollutants in its intake water.The Agency is not convinced that this proposed revision is contrary tothe Clean Water Act. The clear intent of the Act was to reduce the dischargeof pollutants into the nation's waters. Requiring a direct or indirectdischarger to remove pollutants contained in the intake water is justifiedwhen the discharge occurs to a different body of water. The proposed revisionwould allow the net/gross credit if the effluent was discharged to thesame body of water from which the intake was drawn.Three commenters objected to the conditions under which a credit wouldbe granted and suggested that the various conditions be deleted. EPA hasnot deleted any of the conditions necessary for achieving a credit allowanceand, therefore, receiving a control mechanism calculated on a net basis.EPA considers these conditions as reasonable and necessary for achievingthe goals of the Act. The limitations on the net/gross provisions in thefinal regulation grow out of the technical basis on which pretreatmentstandards are established. Generally, EPA has developed pretreatment standardson a gross, not a net, basis. The standards assume that a treatment technologywill achieve a final effluent concentration that is independent of fluctuationsin effluent concentration.Several commenters objected to the requirement that restricts the availabilityof a net credit to those industrial users who discharge their effluentinto a POTW that discharges into the same body of water from which theindustrial users water supply was drawn. While a discharger should notbe held liable for pollutants already existing in its water supply if thedischarge is into the same body of water from which the supply was drawn,the same reasoning cannot support allowance of the credit where the dischargeis into another body of water. The grant of a credit in the latter casewould allow the industrial user to transfer pollutants from one water bodyto another, thus adding pollutants to a water body. An exception to thisrule is where the POTW discharges to a tributary of the stream from whichthe supply was drawn. In such a case, the credit may be granted since thetributary will be considered to be the same body of water as the downstreamlake or river for the purposes of the same body or water requirement.Three commenters objected to the requirement that generic pollutants inintake waters be identical in concentration and type with the generic pollutantsin the discharge before a net credit could be allowed. These commentersargued that an onerous burden will be placed on the industrial user inmaking this demonstration. One commenter suggested that a generic pollutantcredit should be granted <T3>unless</T3> there is some reason for the Control Authority to believethat the industrial user is generating the specific generic pollutant constituent.EPA disagrees. Generic pollutant parameters such as BOD, COD, total organiccarbon, and total suspended solids (TSS) are broad measurements of a numberof specific chemicals or materials. TSS, as measured at a supply waterintake point, may consist mostly of river silt. After being used in anindustrial process, however, the TSS as measured at the industrial user'ssewer connection may include substantial quantities of metals or othermaterials with toxic characteristics. EPA considers it essential to avoidallowance of credit when the pollutants in the discharge water vary significantlyin toxicity from the pollutants in the intake water. Dischargers shouldnot be allowed an unrestricted right to add more toxic pollutants to theirdischarge waters.Another commenter disfavoring the proposal suggested that the followinglanguage be inserted into the regulation: ``The applicable effluent limitationand standards contained in 40 CFR Subchapter N specifically provide thatthey shall be applied on a net basis;'' (40 CFR 122.45(g)(i)) so that thepretreatment and NPDES regulations would be consistent. The Agency agreeswith this comment. The intent of this provision in the NPDES regulationsis to allow a permit writer to issue an NPDES permit based on net dischargelimits where an effluent guideline is written on a net basis. Althoughfew, if any, pretreatment standards are written on a net basis, more maybe developed in the future, and it is appropriate to place a contingencyin the pretreatment regulations to cover that situation. Therefore, theAgency has included wording similar to andSection; 122.45(g)(i) in today'sregulation as andSection; 403.15(e).One commenter, although supporting the intent of the proposed change, statedthat empowering the Control Authority with making decisions about the ``samebody of water'' requirement and the ``no environmental degradation'' requirementwas misplaced. This commenter suggested that the NPDES permit issuanceauthority (i.e., EPA or the State) should be empowered to make these decisions,not the Control Authority. The commenter noted that the NPDES authority,not the Control Authority, regulates discharges to the environment fromthe POTW and should therefore be making the decision. EPA does not agreewith this commenter's suggestion.First, Control Authorities with approved pretreatment programs have primaryresponsibility for controlling discharges to their systems. Accordingly,these Control Authorities should have more input into whether industrialusers discharging into their POTWs will be granted a net credit under andSection;403.15. Control Authorities are best positioned to know whether grantingnet credits in a particular case will cause problems at the POTW. For example,one of the criteria applicable to granting the net credit adjustment isthat the adjustment shall be given only to the extent that intake waterpollutants limited by the categorical standard are not removed by the pretreatmenttechnology employed by the industrial user. (<T3>See</T3>, andSection; 403.15(c).) Control Authority are especially qualifiedto determine what limit the treatment technology at the industrial user'sfacility will be able to meet. Control Authorities are also best qualifiedto judge whether such adjustments are likely to cause interference, pass-through,sludge contamination, or a violation of local limits. In addition, ControlAuthorities are always allowed to impose more stringent limits on industrialusers than the Federal regulations would allow (unless otherwise providedunder State law). (<T3>See</T3> andSection; 403.4.) Where a Control Authority wants to imposemore stringent limits than those resulting from approval of net credits,it should be able to prevent a less stringent credit from being granted.If the NPDES issuance authority was granting the credit, then the ControlAuthority might not be able to prevent the less stringent credit from beingapproved.Furthermore, Control Authorities have the best information regarding industrialusers' discharges, characteristics of the total inflow to the POTW, andtreatment efficiencies and mechanics at the POTW, so that the Control Authoritiescan best decide when ``no environmental degradation'' will be caused byissuing net credits to industrial users. It should also be noted that ControlAuthorities have a strong interest in not violating their NPDES permits.The Agency expects that Control Authorities will be somewhat conservativein evaluating and approving requests for net credits. Finally, the ControlAuthorities will not be operating in a vacuum. Control Authorities caneasily request technical assistance from their Approval Authority.Another commenter who favored this proposed revision noted that EPA shouldclarify that it is more important for Control Authorities to assure noenvironmental degradation will result from the granting of net credits,than that the same body of water requirement is met. The Agency does notentirely agree with this comment. When determining whether to grant a creditfor pollutants in a facility's intake water, the first step is to determinewhether the same body of water from which the water supply is drawn isreceiving the discharge from the POTW. If this condition is not met, thenthe Control Authority should consider whether the use classification ofthe water body changes between the industrial user's water supply intakeand the discharge pipe of the POTW. If a water body has a higher valueat the point of discharge, then a credit may not be allowed or only a partialcredit may be granted. If the water bodies are different, then the ControlAuthority should analyze whether environmental degradation would occurif the credit is granted. This tiered approach does place an emphasis onthe no environmental degradation analysis. However, it does not apply wherethe same body of water requirement is met.A commenter in favor of this proposed revision had several additional commentson the proposal. The first comment concerned the deadline for applyingfor a credit for pollutants in the intake water. This commenter agreedwith the PIRT recommendation that ``timely application'' for a credit isdesired. However, this commenter noted that EPA had removed the 60-daynotification deadline and had not replaced this provision with any definitionof ``timely'' in the proposal.This provision was deleted from the pretreatment regulations (51 FR 20426,at 20428; June 4, 1986), just prior to the proposal of today's regulations.The June, 1986 change was a technical correction deleting the 60-day deadlinerequirement from the regulations, but the original reasoning for doingthis was contained in the January 28, 1981 (46 FR 9404) final General PretreatmentRegulations. In that regulations package the Agency deleted the 60-daydeadline based on several commenters Statements. (``In addition, severalcommenters objected to the 60-day deadline for requesting a net/gross credit,noting that the Consolidated Permit (NPDES) regulations do not impose asimilar constraint. These commenters pointed out that in many cases treatmenttechnology would need to be installed before a user could satisfy the demonstrationsneeded to receive a credit. EPA agrees with this comment and accordinglyhas deleted the time limitation on applying for a net/gross credit.'')However, the specific deletion was not written into the regulatory languageat 46 FR 9457. Therefore, the June 1986 technical corrections package deletedthe requirement.The Agency does agree with this commenter that timely applications arenecessary. However, the term ``timely'' implies that a date will be chosenfrom which the time period will run. A strict time period is not needed.Rather, a reasonable length of time between when the industrial user knowsthat pollutants in its intake water are not being treated by the pretreatmentsystem at the facility and when the user must request a net credit. ControlAuthorities will have the discretion to deny net credit requests that arefiled long after the industrial facility learned of the problem.The commenter also stated that certain provisions previously containedin 40 CFR 403.15(a) (3)-(4), and (c) should be retained. Specifically,these provisions require: no chemical or biological variation between thepollutants in the intake water and the pollutants limited by the categoricalstandard; no significant increase in the concentrations in the intake water;and notification of enforcement personnel if any significant change inthe quantity of the pollutants in the intake water or the level of treatmentoccurs. As noted in the preamble to the proposal and today's regulation,the Agency has decided to rewrite this entire provision to make it ``lesscomplicated and more workable.'' Furthermore, the NPDES and pretreatmentregulations should be more consistent, and the proposed changes achievethis intent. The provisions suggested by this commenter were containedin the NPDES regulations. The Agency proposed to delete the requirementsfrom the NPDES regulations on November 18, 1982 (47 FR 52072, at 52090).A discussion of why these requirements were to be deleted appears at 47FR 52080. These requirements were deleted from the NPDES regulations onSeptember 26, 1984 (49 FR 37998, at 38050). The decision to delete therequirements was further explained in the Response to comments for thatregulation (49 FR 38025-28). The Agency still agrees with the reasoningof that decision, and does not believe that the pretreatment regulationsshould differ from the NPDES provisions. Therefore, the suggested provisionshave not been included in today's regulation.d. <T3>Today's rule. </T3>EPA is promulgating this rule as proposed, withthe following additions as noted above: (1) Add a reference to paragraph(c) in paragraph (a) as follows ``* * * if the requirements of paragraphs(b) and (c) are met.'', and (2) a new paragraph (c) ``The applicable categoricalpretreatment standards contained in 40 CFR Subchapter N specifically providethat they shall be applied on a net basis.''<ITAG tagnum="81">E.4. Upset Provision [40 CFR 403.16]</ITAG>a. <T3>Existing rule. </T3>Existing andSection; 403.16 provides an affirmativedefense in an enforcement action if the industrial user shows that noncompliancewith a categorical pretreatment standard was due to factors beyond thereasonable control of the discharger. This provision in the General PretreatmentRegulations is patterned after that found in the NPDES regulation at 40CFR 122.41(n) (49 FR 37998, at 38049, September 26, 1984).b. <T3>Proposed change. </T3>EPA revised the upset provision for direct dischargerson September 26, 1984 (49 FR 37998). The Agency proposed to revise andSection;403.16 of the pretreatment regulations to clarify the showing necessaryto prove that an upset has occurred consistent with the 1984 revisionsto the NPDES rule. The existing rule requires a discharger to prove thatan upset occurred and that the ``Industrial User can identify the specificcause(s) of the upset * * *'' In some cases, overly literal applicationof this requirement would require a discharger to produce a level of proofthat is not scientifically possible to obtain. The proposed rule deletesthe word ``specific'' from andSection; 403.16(c)(1) to clarify that the regulationdoes not require investigation to an impossible degree of certainty.c. <T3>Response to comments.</T3> EPA received nine comments on the proposedchange to the upset defense from industry, POTWs, and an environmentalgroup. Most commenters supported the proposed rule for the reasons statedby EPA in the preamble and discussed below. One POTW commenter, however,opposed making the upset defense available because industrial users shouldbe liable for any damage they cause to the sewers or treatment systemsand because the defense would discourage users from providing dependablepretreatment systems. Some industry commenters, on the other hand, notonly supported the proposed change, but also argued that the availabilityof the upset should be broadened to include violations of local limitsif the user can demonstrate that the prohibited discharge standards (andSection;403.5) have not been violated. Finally, one commenter who supported theproposed change stated that the regulatory language did not fully conveythe intent of the change as explained in the preamble discussion aboutinvestigating upsets.EPA disagrees that the purpose or effect of the upset defense is to discourageindustrial users from providing dependable pretreatment systems. By definition,an upset is unintentional, only occurs in exceptional circumstances, andis due to factors beyond the reasonable control of the industrial user.It does not include treatment process disruptions resulting from ``operationalerror, improperly designed treatment facilities, inadequate treatment facilities,lack of preventive maintenance, or careless or improper operation.'' 40CFR 403.16(a). Rather than encourage unreliable pretreatment systems, theupset provision merely recognizes that the technology upon which the nationalcategorical pretreatment standards are based may not function as intended100 percent of the time, regardless of the actions taken by the industrialuser. Furthermore, EPA does not intend the upset defense to be availableto industrial users at the expense of POTWs. As discussed more fully below,the upset defense can only excuse violations of the categorical pretreatmentstandards. It does not provide a defense in any other actions that maybe brought against an industrial user, such as a suit for damages to thePOTW's system caused by the industrial user or an action to enforce violationsof local limits. In addition, under section 510 of the CWA, a POTW (ora State) may decide to impose more stringent requirements than requiredby federal law by disallowing the upset defense even for violations ofthe categorical pretreatment standards (assuming the Control Authorityhas authority under State or local law).Although the upset defense is justified for violations of the categoricalpretreatment standards, it does not follow that the defense should alsobe allowed for violations of local limits. The commenters who supportedbroadening the defense generally argued that industrial users should notbe held liable whenever violations are unavoidable. Specifically they assertthat: (1) Upsets which result in local limits violations are just as inevitabledue to control technology failures (and other factors such as change inweather or wastewater characteristics) as upsets which result in violationsof national categorical pretreatment standards; (2) the proof necessaryto establish an upset defense in the case of local limits violations (includingproof that the prohibited discharge standards have not been violated) isno more difficult than the proof required to establish the defense in thecase of national categorical pretreatment standards; and (3) an upset defensefor local limits violations must be codified because industrial users cannotrely on prosecutorial discretion to escape liability for unavoidable violationsin the case of citizen suits. These arguments are similar to those advancedby industry, in previous rulemakings and litigation, in support of extendingthe upset defense for NPDES permittees beyond violations of technology-basedeffluent limitations to include violations of water-quality based limits.At the outset, EPA notes that it proposed to change only one part of theupset regulation for the narrow purpose of making it consistent with achange made to the NPDES upset regulation. Neither the proposed rule northe accompanying preamble discussion contemplated any other change. Therefore,the Agency concludes that it would be inappropriate to substantively revisethe scope of the upset defense in this rulemaking. However, even assumingthat the Agency could properly consider extending the upset defense tocover violations of local limits, it would reject the commenters' argumentsfor some of the same reasons it rejected similar arguments in the contextof the NPDES upset regulation.The rationale for providing an upset defense for violations of the nationalcategorical standards does not apply to violations of local limits. Asdiscussed more thoroughly in previous rulemakings, the upset defense wasdesigned, in part, in response to court rulings which found that to addresssituations where the equipment underlying technology-based limitationsfails for reasons beyond the control of the operator, EPA must allow forupsets in applying these technology based standards. See discussions at49 FR 37998, 38038 (September 14, 1984) and 44 FR 32863 (June 7, 1979).Unlike the categorical pretreatment standards, local limits developed pursuantto andSection; 403.5(c) are not designed to reflect what certain technologiescan achieve. Instead, they are designed to prevent a specific result, i.e.,violations of the general prohibitions against pass through and interferencein andSection; 403.5(a) and the specific prohibitions in andSection; 403.5(b).Prevention of pass through and interference is the ultimate goal of theentire pretreatment program. Although the pollution control equipment installedto meet local limits may also be subject to inherent failures beyond theindustrial user's control, the legal basis for requiring the upset defense_accommodatingthe rare, but inevitable, technological failures which were assumed inestablishing technology-based requirements_is not applicable in the caseof local limits designed to prevent violations of the general and specificprohibitions. Therefore, EPA has concluded that the CWA does not requirethat an upset be provided for violations of local limits. Because compliancewith local limits is the ultimate factor in achieving the goals of thenational pretreatment program, excusing violations of local limits is unwarrantedas a matter of policy. This decision is consistent with the Agency's recentaction to establish limited affirmative defenses for violations of thegeneral and specific prohibitions only when applicable local limits havenot been violated. (<T3>See</T3>, 52 FR 1586 (January 14, 1986).)To protect the integrity of local limits and their role in achieving pretreatmentgoals, EPA also deems it inappropriate to include local limit violationsin the upset defense even where the industrial user can prove that thegeneral and specific prohibitions have not been violated. Therefore, theAgency concludes that it is unnecessary to address the commenters' argumentsconcerning the practicability of proving compliance with national prohibiteddischarge standards.EPA's decision not to extend the scope of the upset defense does not precludethe Agency from exercising its enforcement discretion when determiningwhether to bring an action pursuant to andSection; 403.5(e) for violationsof local limits or in evaluating the appropriate enforcement response whenit decides to take action. EPA also anticipates that courts will consideran industrial user's good faith efforts to follow upset defense requirements(e.g., prompt notice to the POTW and efforts to mitigate damage causedby the upset and to identify and remedy the cause), as well as other relevantfactors, when fashioning the appropriate relief in any citizen suit whichmay be brought under section 505 of the CWA to enforce violations of locallimits. Commenters who argued that industrial users should not have torely on the Agency's enforcement discretion to avoid liability assume thatthey are legally entitled to an upset defense for local limits.In response to the final comment noted above, EPA disagrees that the proposedrule fails to convey the intent of the preamble discussion about the investigationof upsets. The preamble explained that under the proposed rule an industrialuser would still be required to undertake a thorough investigation of thecause of the upset (and not just show that it has followed normal operatingprocedures), but that it would not have to pinpoint with absolute certaintythe specific cause. The preamble further clarified that proof of the causeof an upset could be through circumstantial, as well as direct, evidence.51 FR 21475, 21476 (June 12, 1986). The commenter does not indicate howthe proposed rule could be revised to more fully convey EPA's intent (e.g.,by codifying specific investigation duties the industrial user would berequired to undertake or by codifying the types of evidence that wouldbe acceptable as proof of cause).The preamble discussion about investigating upsets and establishing thedefense reflects typical rules of evidence that would apply in a proceedingto determine whether the affirmative defense should be allowed and explainshow they might apply to the upset defense in particular. Under andSection;403.16(d), the industrial user has the burden of demonstrating that eachelement of the defense exists, including the demonstration of the causeof the upset. (The other elements which the user must demonstrate are listedin andSection; 403.16(c).) This burden clearly requires that the user comeforward with evidence of cause. A user would have to undertake a thoroughinvestigation of how the upset occurred in order to discover and adducethe necessary evidence to meet this burden. However, the specific typeof investigation techniques and proof necessary to establish the causeof the upset may not be the same in all situations. Accordingly, EPA hasdetermined that it would be inappropriate to further specify in the regulationhow the user must demonstrate cause.This makes the upset provision in the general pretreatment regulationsconsistent with the upset provision in the NPDES regulations and thus eliminatesany inequity that may have existed between the treatment of direct andindirect discharges in the requirements for establishing an upset defenseto violations of national technology-based discharge limitations.As explained in the preamble to the proposed rule, the purpose of deletingthe word ``specific'' from andSection; 403.16(c)(1) is to clarify that theregulation does not require a discharger to produce a level of proof thatis not scientifically possible to obtain or to require investigation anddemonstration of the cause of an upset to an impossible degree of certainty.For example, there may be cases where biological activity is disruptedin a treatment system, where no change in raw waste characteristics couldbe identified, and where a thorough investigation by the user could notidentify the precise cause of the violation. Such evidence could be adducedto show the ``cause'' required by today's regulation, even though the precisecause eluded detection. In these cases, it is sufficient that the availableevidence vindicates the industrial user although it does not specificallyidentify the responsible party or event.The Agency reiterates that a demonstration of the cause of an upset canbe based on evidence that would be acceptable as proof of a fact in court.Thus, demonstration of cause can be based upon circumstantial, as wellas direct, evidence. In many cases, circumstantial evidence may be allthat is available. However, under the final rule, it is not enough simplyto show that normal operating procedures were followed at the time thecategorical standards were exceeded. By implication, the final rule requiresat least a thorough investigation of the causes of the upset. Further,subsequent claims of upset would require a stronger showing where previousviolations had occurred and no effort, or insufficient effort, was madeto identify and remedy the cause or causes.Finally, EPA would like to clarify that the upset defense is availableonly for factors beyond the reasonable control of the industrial user.In arguing for extension of the upset defense to cover local limit violations,one commenter listed changes in wastewater characteristics as an instancein which a violation would be unavoidable and therefore should be excused.EPA disagrees that a change in wastewater characteristic is beyond thereasonable control of the industrial user. Indeed, the industrial useris in the best, and perhaps only, position to control the characteristicsof the wastewater entering its pretreatment facilities. Therefore, EPAwould not consider an upset resulting from changes in wastewater characteristicseligible for the upset defense.d. <T3>Today's rule. </T3>Today's final rule is the same as the proposed rule.As proposed, the word ``specific'' is deleted from andSection; 403.16(c)(1)so that in establishing an upset defense, an industrial user must identifythe cause of the upset, but no longer needs to identify the specific causeof the upset as required by the previous rule. No other aspects are changedby this rulemaking.<ITAG tagnum="81">E.5. Bypass Provision [40 CFR 403.17]</ITAG>a. <T3>Existing rule. </T3>For direct discharges, the NPDES regulations prohibitbypass, which is defined as the intentional diversion of waste streamsfrom any portion of a discharger's treatment facility. This provision thusrequires NPDES permittees to operate their entire treatment facility atall times. There are, however, exceptions to the strict prohibition onbypass even where effluent limitations may be violated as a result. Bypassmay be excused if the bypass was unavoidable to prevent loss of life, personalinjury or severe property damage, and where there were no feasiblle alternativesto the bypass, such as the use of auxiliary treatment facilities, retentionof untreated wastes, or maintenance during normal periods of equipmentdowntime. The ``no feasible alternatives'' criterion is not satisfied if,in the exercise of reasonable engineering judgment, the permittee shouldhave installed adequate back-up equipment as preventative maintenance orto prevent a bypass that occurred during normal periods of equipment downtime.The prohibition of bypass in the NPDES regulations applies even where thepermittee does not violate permit limitations during the bypass. However,permittees may bypass if they do not exceed effluent limitations and ifthe bypass was for essential maintenance to ensure efficient facility operations.The NPDES bypass provision serves two basic purposes. First, it excusescertain unavoidable or justifiable violations of permit effluent limitations,provided the permittee can meet the bypass criteria. Second, it requiresthat permittees operate pollution control equipment at all times, thusobtaining maximum pollutant reductions consistent with technology-basedrequirements mandated by section 301 of the CWA and furthering the Act'sgoal of eliminating the discharge of all pollutants. Section 101(a)(1)of the Act. Without such a provision, dischargers could avoid appropriatetechnology-based control requirements.b. <T3>Proposed change. </T3>EPA proposed to add a bypass provision to theGeneral Pretreatment Regulations similar to that in the NPDES program.The purposes served by the NPDES bypass provision are equally importantin the pretreatment context, and, therefore, the prohibition against bypassshould also apply to industrial users discharging to POTWs. Like the NPDESprovision, the proposal would require industrial users to operate theirtreatment systems at all times. It would also excuse bypasses under thesame circumstances as does the NPDES bypass regulation.Consistent with the NPDES regulations, the proposed regulation would alsoimpose certain notice requirements when a bypass by an industrial userresults in the violation of applicable pretreatment standards or requirements(including local limits established in accordance with andSection; 403.5(c)).If the industrial user knows in advance of the need for a bypass, it mustgive prior notice to the Control Authority, if possible at least ten daysbefore the date on which the bypass is to occur. If the bypass is not anticipated,the industrial user must notify the Control Authority orally within 24hours of becoming aware of the bypass. This 24-hour notice must be followedwithin five days by a written description of the bypass, its cause, itsduration (or, if it has not been corrected, how long it is expected tocontinue), and what has been done to rectify the problem. The proposedrule would allow the Control Authority to waive the written report on acase-by-case basis if the oral report has been received within 24 hours.c. <T3>Response to comments. </T3>Several commenters supported EPA's proposedrule without reservation for the reasons stated in the preamble. Nearlyall commenters expressed support for some aspects of the proposal, buthad objections to various other parts. In most cases, these objectionsparalleled objections to the NPDES bypass provision stated in previousrulemakings and pending litigation. Only one commenter, a POTW, objectedentirely to adding a bypass provision to the General Pretreatment Regulations.The commenter who argued that EPA should not promulgate the proposed rulestated that industrial users should not be given any incentive to bypasstreatment systems and should be liable without exception for any damagethey cause at the POTW. Instead, the incentive should be to require themto operate dependable pretreatment systems (e.g., use of dual equipment,``slop'' tanks) to avoid the need for bypass. Another POTW stated thatthere is ``no rationale'' for allowing bypass for maintenance.Clearly, EPA's intent in proposing the bypass provision was not to discouragedependable pretreatment systems. On the contrary, the rule prohibits bypassexcept under very limited circumstances and in no case would excuse bypasswhere the user failed to properly operate and maintain its treatment system.Even when a violation of pretreatment standards would not result, the ruleprohibits bypass unless the bypass was for essential maintenance to assureefficient operation. ``Maintenance'' in this instance does not refer tomaintenance of the user's general facility, but means maintenance essentialto the efficient operation of the user's pretreatment system. Moreover,the maintenance must be essential, of an emergency nature, not routineor based on economic considerations alone. Generally, this means repairsand maintenance that cannot wait until the production process is not inoperation. For example, if the seal on a valve malfunctions or a pipe burstsduring production hours at an industrial facility, and the facility operatorbypasses that particular unit process in the pretreatment system in orderto perform corrective maintenance, such maintenance would be consideredessential. (A more complete discussion of ``essential maintenance'' appearsat 49 FR 38037, September 26, 1984.) Recognizing the need for essentialmaintenance should encourage, not discourage, dependable pretreatment systems.The rule does not excuse bypass in certain situations where pretreatmentstandards are violated. Significantly, bypass would not be excused if therewere feasible alternatives to the bypass such as the use of auxiliary equipment.The rule specifically states that the ``no feasible alternatives'' testis not met if ``adequate back-up equipment should have been installed inthe exercise of reasonable engineering judgment to prevent a bypass whichoccurred during normal periods of equipment downtime or preventive maintenance.''(andSection; 403.17(1)(ii).) Thus, to the extent reasonable engineering judgmentwould dictate use of dual equipment or ``slop'' tanks so that bypass wouldnot occur during routine maintenance, EPA agrees with the commenter thatthese back-up facilities should be required. However, EPA cannot agreethat the rule should require an industrial user to have certain back-upequipment in all cases.In contrast to these comments, another POTW suggested that back-up equipmentshould not be required where the system has already been built and addingback-up equipment is not feasible, for example where the user does nothave enough land to install the additional equipment. In lieu of back-upequipment, users should be required to keep an adequate spare parts inventoryon hand. As noted above, the regulation does not mandate back-up equipmentin all cases, but includes a flexible requirement based on ``reasonableengineering judgment.'' Thus, whether installation of back-up equipmentor keeping a spare parts inventory is sufficient for purposes of the nofeasible alternative test depends on whether, in the exercise of reasonableengineering judgment, one or the other should have been present to preventa bypass which occurred during normal periods of equipment downtime orpreventive maintenance.Because of the flexibility built into the bypass provision, EPA also doesnot agree with the commenter who suggested that EPA should allow bypassin all cases of floods. This commenter reasoned that although floods mayjeopardize or damage operation of the system, they don't often cause ``severeproperty damage.'' The commenter expressed particular concern about hurricane/monsoonrains that exceed the industrial users capacity to contain and treat stormwater runoff. In such cases, the commenter argued, bypass during floodscould reduce or prevent environmental harm by eliminating the ``flushingout'' of contaminants in the treatment system.    EPA is aware that flood situations may present users with a difficult dilemmaconcerning whether or not to bypass. The underlying premise of the CWA,however, is that undertreated or untreated wastewater should not be discharged.Only very exceptional circumstances should justify the intentional diversionof a wastestream from required treatment processes. In effect, the ``severeproperty damage'' test of the bypass provision reflects the Agency's determinationof when the harm of not bypassing (e.g., when it avoids causing the treatmentsystem from becoming inoperable or prevents substantial and permanent damageto natural resources exceeds) the benefits of requiring treatment in anyevent and thus justifies excusing a bypass. Therefore, the Agency has alreadytaken into account the factors mentioned by the commenter (damage to thetreatment system, environmental harm) in a manner consistent with the CWA.   In response to the comment that the regulation should make an industrialuser liable any time it causes damage at the POTW, EPA notes that the bypassprovision merely allows an industrial user to avoid an enforcement actionfor violations of pretreatment standards. It does not provide a defenseto other action a Control Authority may have against an industrial usersuch as an action for damages. Also, as with the upset defense, section510 of the CWA allows a POTW (or a State) to establish more stringent requirements,such as prohibiting bypass or requiring back-up equipment in all cases.   The remaining comments related to the prohibition against bypass even whenviolations of pretreatment standards would not result (the ``constant treatment''requirement). One commenter suggested that the Agency reword the regulationbecause it seemed to require the use of pretreatment equipment even ifthe quality of the discharge would not be improved as a result. Anothercommenter stated that promulgating this provision in the pretreatment regulationswould violate the NPDES settlement agreement between EPA and industry.Others asserted that the ``constant treatment'' requirement violates theCWA, listing three basic reasons: (1) It dictates how to comply, ratherthan what standard to comply with; (2) the rationale used by EPA to supportthe requirement (i.e., ensuring appropriate control of pollutants thatare not specifically regulated) constitutes de facto regulation and circumventsthe standard setting procedures contained in the Act; and (3) by failingto compare the costs of the requirement with the environmental benefitsof reducing ``unregulated'' pollutants, the Agency acted arbitrarily.   The Agency disagrees with all these comments. The settlement agreementbetween EPA and industry groups required EPA to propose certain revisionsto the NPDES bypass provision, but did not, and could not, require EPAto agree to promulgate those proposed revisions in the final rule. EPA'sdecision not to promulgate the proposed revisions resulted in a suit againstEPA challenging the NPDES bypass provision. The challenge is based on themerits of the regulation and not because of any alleged breach of the settlementagreement. The Court of Appeals for the D.C. Circuit recently upheld thecited NPDES regulations on bypass (<T3>NRDC v. EPA, et al., </T3>26 ERC 1153, June 30, 1987). Therefore, thiscommenter's suggestions regarding the ``constant treatment'' requirementhave not been incorporated into today's regulation. EPA's position continuesto be that requiring users to operate the pretreatment facilities at alltimes even though bypassing these facilities would not result in violationsof pretreatment standards does not violate the CWA and, in fact, furthersthe goals of the CWA. The preamble to the September 26, 1984, NPDES rulemakingexplained EPA's rationale for the ``constant treatment'' requirement:<ITAG tagnum="21">EPA's effluent limitations guidelines and standards-setting processare predicted [sic] upon the efficient operation and maintenance of removalsystems. A number of the effluent limitations guidelines and standardsupon which NPDES permits are based do not contain specific limitationsfor all of the pollutants of concern for the given industry.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *    </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The data available to EPA show that effective control of these [unregulated]pollutants can be obtained by controlling the discharge of the pollutantsregulated by the standard . . . to levels achievable by the model treatmenttechnology upon which the effluent guideline limits are based.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *    </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">If bypass of treatment equipment is allowed, there is no assurancethat these unlimited pollutants will be controlled, even though those specificallylimited still meet permit limitations.</ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">(49 FR 38036-38037.)Like the effluent guidelines in the NPDES program, the national categoricalpretreatment standards do not necessarily regulate all pollutants of concernin a particular industry, but instead rely on the technology required tocontrol the specifically regulated pollutants to also regulate other pollutantsof concern, assuming proper operation and maintenance of the treatmentfacilities. For example, control of oil and grease by a pretreatment systemwill also serve to control some toxic components of a discharge and someportion of the BOD loading of that discharge. The bypass prohibition thussupplements the categorical standards and furthers the Act's goals of eliminatingthe discharge of pollutants.Like the upset provision, the bypass regulation is a general requirementwhich, although it works in conjunction with the categorical pretreatmentstandards, is not itself an effluent standard. The CWA clearly authorizesthe Administrator to promulgate regulations which are necessary to carryout the purposes of the Act (Section 301). EPA has not ``circumvented''the standard setting procedures established by the Act in promulgatingthe bypass provision, because it was not limited to establishing categoricalstandards in developing regulations to implement the national pretreatmentprogram. The Agency has determined that the bypass provision, which mandatesfull use of treatment facilities and encourages proper operation and maintenanceof those facilities is a reasonable measure to ensure compliance with pretreatmentstandards.Likewise, nothing in the Act requires the Agency to justify each of itsprogram regulations with a cost benefit analysis as the commenters suggest.Of course, the Agency does not ignore these factors. In this case, however,because the bypass provision merely ``piggybacks'' existing requirements,it does not itself impose costs that have not already been taken into accountin the development of categorical standards. In addition to capital costs,these costs include the costs of operating and maintaining pretreatmentfacilities. (<T3>See</T3>, for example, ``Development Document for the ElectroplatingCategory''.) Moreover, the Agency decided to adopt the approach of controllingsome pollutants of concern through controlling ``indicator'' pollutantsin part to reduce compliance costs (e.g., sampling, monitoring, and reportingof each pollutant specifically limited by the standards) in response toindustry concerns. On the other hand, the incidental removal of pollutantsnot specifically regulated clearly conforms to the environmental benefitsenvisioned by Congress of eventually eliminating the discharge of all pollutants.The bypass provision does not dictate how users must comply because itdoes not dictate what pretreatment technology the user must install. Insteadthe bypass provision merely requires that the user operate the technologyit has chosen. Although termed the ``constant treatment'' requirement,the bypass provision does not mean that the pretreatment facilities mustoperate twenty-four hours a day regardless of the activities at the user'sfacility. Instead, the user must operate the treatment system in a mannerconsistent with appropriate engineering practice. Thus, if the facilityis designed to use scrubbers twice a day, the bypass regulation does notrequire the facility to run the scrubber 24 hours a day. Similarly, thebypass prohibition does not require operation of the treatment system ifthe facility is not operating and there are no wastewater discharges. Nordoes it require operation of treatment systems 24-hours a day if wastesare collected and retained for eventual treatment and released in batchdischarges. For users who must operate continuously, the bypass prohibitionrecognizes that bypass may be unavoidable and therefore allows bypass foressential maintenance that cannot be conducted during normal downtimes.In sum, EPA has considered all of the comments objecting to a bypass prohibitionwhen pretreatment standards would not be violated because of the bypass.These comments mirror comments the Agency considered and rejected duringconsideration of the NPDES bypass regulation. Nothing in the comments convincethe Agency that its decision should be different because of material differencesbetween NPDES permittees and industrial users. As with the NPDES bypassprovision, EPA has determined that a bypass provision in the General PretreatmentRegulations is necessary to ensure that users properly operate and maintaintheir treatment facilities and thus fulfill the purpose and assumptionsunderlying technology-based standards. This is consistent with Congressionalintent and within its authority to promulgate regulations necessary toachieve the purposes of the Act.d. <T3>Today's rule.</T3> For the reasons stated in the preamble and in theresponse to comments above, EPA is promulgating the bypass regulation asproposed.<ITAG tagnum="84">III. Judicial Review of Provisions Not Amended</ITAG>In the regulatory section of this notice, EPA has, for the sake of clarity,sometimes reprinted portions of regulatory text that have not been amendedby today's proposal. Those portions of the June 26, 1978 regulations andthe January 28, 1981 regulatory amendments that are not substantively amendedin today's <T4>Federal Register</T4> were only subject to judicial review in thosepetitions for review that were filed within 90 days of the date of issuanceof the June 26, 1978 regulations, and the January 28, 1981 amendments thereto,respectively.<ITAG tagnum="84">IV. Technical Revisions</ITAG>In addition to the substantive changes made by today's rulemaking, certainsections of the General Pretreatment Regulations must be revised in orderto conform to today's changes. Thus, the reference to ``contract(s)'' isdeleted from andSection;andSection; 403.8(f)(1)(iii) and 403.9(b). The referencein new andSection; 403.12(n) (<T3>Provisions governing fraud and false statements</T3>) to the reportsrequired by old paragraphs (b), (d), (e), and (h) of that section has beenchanged to the reports required in new paragraphs (b), (d), (e), (h), and(i), and (k) of that section. Similarly, new andSection; 403.12(o) has beenrevised to include as subject to the record-keeping requirements of thatparagraph any reports required pursuant to new paragraph (h) of that section.In addition, the references in andSection; 403.10(d) to andSection; 403.12(h)have been revised to reflect the redesignation of that paragraph as andSection;403.12(k).<ITAG tagnum="84">V. List of Subjects in 40 CFR Part 403</ITAG>Confidential business information, Reporting and recordkeeping requirements,Waste treatment and disposal, Water pollution control.<ITAG tagnum="84">VI. EPA Documents Cited in This Notice</ITAG>The following EPA documents are referenced in the preamble section of thisnotice:<ITAG tagnum="15">Guidance Manual for POTW Pretreatment Program Development (1983)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">Procedures Manual for Reviewing a POTW Pretreatment Program Submission(1983)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">Guidance Manual for the Use of Production-Based Pretreatment Standardsand the Combined Wastestream Formula (1985)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">Pretreatment Implementation Review Task Force_Final Report to theAdministrator (1985)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">Pretreatment Compliance Monitoring and Enforcement Guidance (1986)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">Guidance Manual on the Development and Implementation of Local DischargeLimitations Under the Pretreatment Program (1987)</ITAG>Copies of these documents can be obtained by contacting Chuck Prorok, PermitsDivision (EN-336), Environmental Protection Agency, 401 M Street, SW.,Washington, DC 20460, (202) 426-7053.<ITAG tagnum="84">VII. Executive Order 12291</ITAG>Under Executive Order 12291, EPA must judge whether a regulation is ``Major''and therefore subject to the requirement of a Regulatory Impact Analysis.These amendments generally clarify the meaning of pretreatment requirementsand do not impose significant new burdens on affected parties. They donot satisfy any of the criteria specified in section 1(b)_an effect onthe economy of $100M or more per year; a major increase in costs or pricesfor consumers or individual industries, agencies, or geographic regions;or significant adverse effects on competition, employment, investment,productivity, innovation, or competition with foreign producers_of theExecutive Order. These amendments will not produce a compliance cost ofmore than $100M per year, will not cause a major increase in costs or pricesfor any segment of the affected population, and will not create any ofthe enumerated significant adverse effects. Therefore, this is not a majorrulemaking. This regulation was submitted to the Office of Management andBudget for review as required by Executive Order 12291.<ITAG tagnum="84">VIII. Paperwork Reduction Act</ITAG>The Office of Management and Budget (OMB) has approved the informationcollection requirements contained in this rule under the provisions ofthe <T3>Paperwork Reduction Act,</T3> 44 U.S.C. 3501 <T3>et seq.</T3> and has assigned OMB control number 2040-0009.<ITAG tagnum="84">IX. Regulatory Flexibility Act</ITAG>Under the Regulatory Flexibility Act, 5 U.S.C. 601, et seq., EPA is requiredto prepare a Regulatory Flexibility Analysis to assess the impact of ruleson small entities. No regulatory flexibility analysis is required, however,where the head of the Agency certifies that the rule will not have a significanteconomic impact on a substantial number of small entities. Today's amendmentsto the General Pretreatment Regulations clarify the meaning of severalpretreatment requirements and do not impose any significant new burdenson affected parties. Accordingly, I hereby certify, pursuant to 5 U.S.C.605(b), that these amendments will not have a significant impact on a substantialnumber of small entities.<ITAG tagnum="21">Dated: September 29, 1988.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="6">Lee M. Thomas, </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Administrator.</ITAG>For the reasons set out in the preamble, Chapter I of Title 40 of the Codeof Federal Regulations is revised as follows:<ITAG tagnum="56">PART 403_GENERAL PRETREATMENT REGULATIONS FOR EXISTING AND NEW SOURCES</ITAG>1. The authority citation for Part 403 continues to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority:</T4> Sec. 54(c)(2) of the Clean Water Act of 1977 (Pub.L. 95-217), sections 204(b)(1)(C), 208(b)(2)(C)(iii), 301(b)(1)(A)(ii),301(b)(2)(A)(ii), 301(b)(2)(C), 301(h)(5), 301(i)(2), 304(e), 304(g), 307,308, 309, 402(b), 405, and 501(a) of the Federal Water Pollution ControlAct (Pub. L. 92-500), as amended by the Clean Water Act of 1977.</ITAG>2. Section 403.3 is amended by revising paragraph (k) to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 403.3</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Definitions.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * *</ITAG>(k)(1) The term ``New Source'' means any building, structure, facilityor installation from which there is or may be a Discharge of pollutants,the construction of which commenced after the publication of proposed PretreatmentStandards under section 307(c) of the Act which will be applicable to suchsource if such Standards are thereafter promulgated in accordance withthat section, <T3>provided that:</T3>(i) The building, structure, facility or installation is constructed ata site at which no other source is located; or(ii) The building, structure, facility or installation totally replacesthe process or production equipment that causes the discharge of pollutantsat an existing source; or(iii) The production or wastewater generating processes of the building,structure, facility or installation are substantially independent of anexisting source at the same site. In determining whether these are substantiallyindependent, factors such as the extent to which the new facility is integratedwith the existing plant, and the extent to which the new facility is engagedin the same general type of activity as the existing source should be considered.(2) Construction on a site at which an existing source is located resultsin a modification rather than a new source if the construction does notcreate a new building, structure, facility or installation meeting thecriteria of paragraphs (k)(1)(ii), or (k)(1)(iii) of this section but otherwisealters, replaces, or adds to existing process or production equipment. (3) Construction of a new source as defined under this paragraph has commencedif the owner or operator has:  (i) Begun, or caused to begin as part of a continuous onsite constructionprogram:  (A) Any placement, assembly, or installation of facilities or equipment;or  (B) Significant site preparation work including clearing, excavation, orremoval of existing buildings, structures, or facilities which is necessaryfor the placement, assembly, or installation of new source facilities orequipment; or  (ii) Entered into a binding contractual obligation for the purchase offacilities or equipment which are intended to be used in its operationwithin a reasonable time. Options to purchase or contracts which can beterminated or modified without substantial loss, and contracts for feasibility,engineering, and design studies do not constitute a contractual obligationunder this paragraph. <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *  </ITAG>3. Section 403.6 is amended by redesignating paragraph (c) as paragraph(c)(1), adding new paragraphs (c)(2), (c)(3), (c)(4), (c)(5), (c)(6), and(c)(7), revising paragraphs (a)(2)(ii), (b), (d), and (e)(3), revisingthe defintion of ``F<T2>D</T2>'' in paragraphs (e)(1) (i) and (ii), and adding a new paragraph(e)(4) to read as follows:  <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;403.6  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">National Pretreatment Standards: Categorical Standards.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *  </ITAG>(a) * * *  (2) * * *  (ii) Citing evidence and reasons why a particular subcategory is applicableand why others are not applicable. Any person signing the application statementsubmitted pursuant to this section shall make the following certification:<ITAG tagnum="21">I certify under penalty of law that this document and all attachmentswere prepared under my direction or supervision in accordance with a systemdesigned to assure that qualified personnel properly gather and evaulatethe information submitted. Based on my inquiry of the person or personswho manage the system, or those persons directly responsible for gatheringthe information, the information submitted is, to the best of my knowledgeand belief, true, accurate, and complete. I am aware that there are significantpenalties for submitting false information, including the possibility offine and imprisonment for knowing violations.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *  </ITAG>(b) <T3>Deadline for Compliance with Categorical Standards.</T3> Complianceby existing sources with categorical Pretreatment Standards shall be within3 years of the date the Standard is effective unless a shorter compliancetime is specified in the appropriate subpart of 40 CFR Chapter I, SubchapterN. Direct dischargers with NPDES permits modified or reissued to providea variance pursuant to section 301(i)(2) of the Act shall be required tomeet compliance dates set in any applicable categorical Pretreatment Standard.Existing sources which become Industrial Users subsequent to promulgationof an applicable categorical Pretreatment Standard shall be consideredexisting Industrial Users except where such sources meet the definitionof a New Source as defined in andSection;403.3(k). New Sources shall installand have in operating condition, and shall ``start-up'' all pollution controlequipment required to meet applicable Pretreatment Standards before beginningto Discharge. Within the shortest feasible time (not to exceed 90 days),New Sources must meet all applicable Pretreatment Standards.  (c) * * *  (2) When the limits in a categorical Pretreatment Standard are expressedonly in terms of mass of pollutant per unit of production, the ControlAuthority may convert the limits to equivalent limitations expressed eitheras mass of pollutant discharged per day of effluent concentration for purposesof calculating effluent limitations applicable to individual IndustrialUsers.  (3) A Control Authority calculating equivalent mass-per-day limitationsunder paragraph (c)(2) of this section shall calculate such limitationsby multiplying the limits in the Standard by the Industrial User's averagerate of production. This average rate of production shall be based notupon the designed production capacity but rather upon a reasonable measureof the Industrial User's actual long-term daily production, such as theaverage daily production during a representative year. For new sources,actual production shall be estimated using projected production. (4) A Control Authority calculating equivalent concentration limitationsunder paragraph (c)(2) of this section shall calculate such limitationsby dividing the mass limitations derived under paragraph (c)(3) of thissection by the average daily flow rate of the Industrial User's regulatedprocess wastewater. This average daily flow rate shall be based upon areasonable measure of the Industrial User's actual long-term average flowrate, such as the average daily flow rate during the representative year.(5) Equivalent limitations calculated in accordance with paragraphs (c)(3)and (c)(4) of this section shall be deemed Pretreatment Standards for thepurposes of section 307(d) of the Act and this Part. Industrial Users willbe required to comply with the equivalent limitations in lieu of the promulgatedcategorical standards from which the equivalent limitations were derived. (6) Many categorical pretreatment standards specify one limit for calculatingmaximum daily discharge limitations and a second limit for calculatingmaximum monthly average, or 4-day average, limitations. Where such Standardsare being applied, the same production of flow figure shall be used incalculating both types of equivalent limitations.(7) Any Industrial User operating under a control mechanism incorporatingequivalent mass or concentration limits calculated from a production basedstandard shall notify the Control Authority within two (2) business daysafter the User has a reasonable basis to know that the production levelwill significantly change within the next calendar month. Any User notnotifying the Control Authority of such anticipated change will be requiredto meet the mass or concentration limits in its control mechanism thatwere based on the original estimate of the long term average productionrate.(d) <T3>Dilution Prohibited as Substitute for Treatment.</T3> Except whereexpressly authorized to do so by an applicable Pretreatment Standard orRequirement, no Industrial User shall ever increase the use of processwater, or in any other way attempt to dilute a discharge as a partial orcomplete substitute for adequate treatment to achieve compliance with aPretreatment Standard or Requirement. The Control Authority (as definedin andSection; 403.12(a)) may impose mass limitations on Industrial Userswhich are using dilution to meet applicable Pretreatment Standards or Requirements,or in other cases where the imposition of mass limitations is appropriate.(e) * * *(1) * * *(i) * * *<ITAG tagnum="21">F<T2>D</T2>=the average daily flow (at least a 30-day average) from: (a)Boiler blowdown streams, non-contact cooling streams, stormwater streams,and demineralizer backwash streams; provided, however, that where suchstreams contain a significant amount of a pollutant, and the combinationof such streams, prior to treatment, with an Industrial User's regulatedprocess wastestream(s) will result in a substantial reduction of that pollutant,the Control Authority, upon application of the Industrial User, may exerciseits discretion to determine whether such stream(s) should be classifiedas diluted or unregulated. In its application to the Control Authority,the Industrial User must provide engineering, production, sampling andanalysis and such other information so that the Control Authority can makeits determination; or (b) sanitary wastestreams where such streams arenot regulated by a Categorical Pretreatment Standard; or (c) from any processwastestreams which were or could have been entirely exempted from categoricalPretreatment Standards pursuant to paragraph 8 of the <T3>NRDC v. Costle </T3>Consent Decree (12 ERC 1833) for one or more ofthe following reasons (see Appendix D of this Part):</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(1) The pollutants of concern are not detectable in the effluent fromthe Industrial User (paragraph (8)(a)(iii));</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(2) The pollutants of concern are present only in trace amounts andare neither causing nor likely to cause toxic effects (paragraph (8)(a)(iii));</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(3) The pollutants of concern are present in amounts too small tobe effectively reduced by technologies known to the Administrator (paragraph(8)(a)(iii)); or</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(4) The wastestream contains only pollutants which are compatiblewith the POTW (paragraph (8)(b)(i)).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(ii) * * *<ITAG tagnum="21">F<T2>D=</T2>the average daily flow (at least a 30-day average) from: (a)boiler blowdown streams, non-contact cooling streams, stormwater streams,and demineralizer backwash streams; provided, however, that where suchstreams contain a significant amount of a pollutant, and the combinationof such streams, prior to treatment, with an Industrial User's regulatedprocess wastestream(s) will result in a substantial reduction of that pollutant,the Control Authority, upon application of the Industrial User, may exerciseits discretion to determine whether such stream(s) should be classifiedas diluted or unregulated. In its application to the Control Authority,the Industrial User must provide engineering, production, sampling andanalysis and such other information so that the Control Authority can makeits determination; or (b) sanitary wastestreams where such streams arenot regulated by a categorical Pretreatment Standard; or (c) from any processwastestreams which were or could have been entirely exempted from categoricalPretreatment Standards pursuant to paragraph 8 of the <T3>NRDC v. Costle </T3>Consent Decree (12 ERC 1833) for one or more ofthe following reasons (see Appendix D of this Part):</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(1) The pollutants of concern are not detectable in the effluent fromthe Industrial User (paragraph (8)(a)(iii));</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(2) The pollutants of concern are present only in trace amounts andare neither causing nor likely to cause toxic effects (paragraph (8)(a)(iii));</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(3) The pollutants of concern are present in amounts too small tobe effectively reduced by technologies known to the Administrator (paragraph(8)(a)(iii)); or</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(4) The wastestream contains only pollutants which are compatiblewith the POTW (paragraph (8)(b)(i)).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(3) <T3>Self-monitoring. </T3>Self-monitoring required to insure compliancewith the alternative categorical limit shall be conducted in accordancewith the requirements of andSection; 403.12(g).(4) <T3>Choice of monitoring location. </T3>Where a treated regulated processwastestream is combined prior to treatment with wastewaters other thanthose generated by the regulated process, the Industrial User may monitoreither the segregated process wastestream or the combined wastestream forthe purpose of determining compliance with applicable Pretreatment Standards.If the Industrial User chooses to monitor the segregated process wastestream,it shall apply the applicable categorical Pretreatment Standard. If theUser chooses to monitor the combined wastestream, it shall apply an alternativedischarge limit calculated using the combined wastestream formula as providedin this section. The Industrial User may change monitoring points onlyafter receiving approval from the Control Authority. The Control Authorityshall ensure that any change in an Industrial User's monitoring point(s)will not allow the User to substitute dilution for adequate treatment toachieve compliance with applicable Standards.4. Section 403.8 is amended by revising paragraphs (b), (f)(1)(iii), and(f)(1)(vi)(A), and adding a new paragraph (f)(4) to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 403.8</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">POTW pretreatment programs: Development by POTW.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(b) <T3>Deadline for Program Approval</T3>. A POTW which meets the criteriaof paragraph (a) of this section must receive approval of a POTW PretreatmentProgram no later than 3 years after the reissuance or modification of itsexisting NPDES permit but in no case later than July 1, 1983. POTWs whoseNPDES permits are modified under section 301(h) of the Act shall have aPretreatment Program within three (3) years as provided for in 40 CFR Part125, Subpart G. POTWs identified after July 1, 1983 as being required todevelop a POTW Pretreatment Program under paragraph (a) of this sectionshall develop and submit such a program for approval as soon as possible,but in no case later than one year after written notification from theApproval Authority of such identification. The POTW Pretreatment Programshall meet the criteria set forth in paragraph (f) of this section andshall be administered by the POTW to ensure compliance by Industrial Userswith applicable Pretreatment Standards and Requirements.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(f) * * *(1) * * *(iii) Control through permit, order, or similar means, the contributionto the POTW by each Industrial User to ensure compliance with applicablePretreatment Standards and Requirements;<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(vi)(A) Obtain remedies for noncompliance by any Industrial User with anyPretreatment Standard and Requirement. All POTW's shall be able to seekinjunctive relief for noncompliance by Industrial Users with PretreatmentStandards and Requirements. All POTWs shall also have authority to seekor assess civil or criminal penalties in at least the amount of $1,000a day for each violation by Industrial Users of Pretreatment Standardsand Requirements. POTWs whose approved Pretreatemnt Programs require modificationto conform to the requirements of this paragraph shall submit a requestfor approval of a program modification in accordance with andSection; 403.18by November 16, 1989, unless the State would be required to enact or amenda statutory provision, in which case the POTW shall submit such a requestby November 16, 1990.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(4) <T3>Local limits. </T3>The POTW shall develop local limits as requiredin andSection; 403.5(c)(1), or demonstrate that they are not necessary.5. Section 403.9 is amended by revising paragraphs (b)(1)(ii) and (2),and (e) to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 403.9</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">POTW pretreatment programs and/or authorization to revise pretreatmentstandards: submission for approval.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(b) * * *(1) * * *(ii) Identify the manner in which the POTW will implement the program requirementsset forth in andSection; 403.8, including the means by which PretreatmentStandards will be applied to individual Industrial Users (e.g., by order,permit, ordinance, etc.); and,<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(2) A copy of any statutes, ordinances, regulations, agreements, or otherauthorities relied upon by the POTW for its administration of the Program.This Submission shall include a statement reflecting the endorsement orapproval of the local boards or bodies responsible for supervising and/orfunding the POTW Pretreatment Program if approved;<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(e) <T3>Approval authority action.</T3> Any POTW requesting POTW PretreatmentProgram approval shall submit to the Approval Authority three copies ofthe Submission described in paragraph (b), and if appropriate, (d) of thissection. Within 60 days after receiving the Submission, the Approval Authorityshall make a preliminary determination of whether the Submission meetsthe requirements of paragraph (b) and, if appropriate, (d) of this section.If the Approval Authority makes the preliminary determination that theSubmission meets these requirements, the Approval Authority shall:(1) Notify the POTW that the Submission has been received and is underreview; and(2) Commence the public notice and evaluation activities set forth in andSection;403.11.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>6. Section 403.10 is amended by revising the references in paragraphs (d)(1)and (3) to ``andSection; 403.12(h)'' to read ``andSection; 403.12((k)'' andalso by revising paragraph (g)(1)(iii) to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 403.10</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Development and submission of NPDES State pretreatment program.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(g) * * *(1) * * *(iii) States with approved Pretreatment Programs shall establish Pretreatmentregulations by November 16, 1989, unless the State would be required toenact or amend statutory provision, in which case, such regulations mustbe established by November 16, 1990.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>7. Section 403.11 is amended by revising the introductory text of paragraph(b) to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">403.11</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Approval procedures for POTW pretreatment programs and POTW grantingof removal credits.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(b) <T3>Public notice and opportunity for hearing.</T3> Upon receipt of a Submissionthe Approval Authority shall commence its review. Within 20 work days aftermaking a determination that a Submission meets the requirements of andSection;403.9(b) and, where removal allowance approval is sought, andSection;andSection;403.7(d) and 403.9(d), the Approval Authority shall:<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>8. Section 403.12 is amended by revising the introductory text of paragraph(b), paragraphs (b)(5)(iii), (b)(5)(iv), (d), (f), and (g); re-designatingparagraphs (h) through (l) as paragraphs (k) through (o); revising newlydesignated paragraphs (l), (n) and (o)(3); and by adding new paragraphs(e)(3), (h), (i), and (j) to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 403.12 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Reporting requirements for POTWs and industrial users.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(b) <T3>Reporting requirements for industrial users upon effective date ofcategorical pretreatment standard_baseline report.</T3> Within 180 daysafter the effective date of a categorical Pretreatment Standard, or 180days after the final administrative decision made upon a category determinationsubmission under andSection; 403.6(a)(4), whichever is later, existing IndustrialUsers subject to such categorical Pretreatment Standards and currentlydischarging to or scheduled to discharge to a POTW shall be required tosubmit to the Control Authority a report which contains the informationlisted in paragraphs (b)(1)-(7) of this section. Where reports containingthis information already have been submitted to the Director or RegionalAdministrator in compliance with the requirement of 40 CFR 128.140(b) (1977),the Industrial User will not be required to submit this information again.At least 90 days prior to commencementof discharge, New Sources, and sourcesthat become Industrial Users subsequent to the promulgation of an applicablecategorical Standard, shall be required to submit to the Control Authoritya report which contains the information listed in paragraphs (b)(1)-(5)of this section. New sources shall also be required to include in thisreport information on the method of pretreatment the source intends touse to meet applicable pretreatment standards. New Sources shall give estimatesof the information requested in paragraphs (b) (4) and (5) of this section:<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(5) * * *(iii) A minimum of four (4) grab samples must be used for pH, cyanide,total phenols, oil and grease, sulfide, and volatile organics. For allother pollutants, 24-hour composite samples must be obtained through flow-proportionalcomposite sampling techniques where feasible. The Control Authority maywaive flow-proportional composite sampling for any Industrial User thatdemonstrates that flow-proportional sampling is infeasible. In such cases,samples may be obtained through time-proportional composite sampling techniquesor through a minimum of four (4) grab samples where the User demonstratesthat this will provide a representative sample of the effluent being discharged.(iv) The User shall take a minimum of one representative sample to compilethat data necessary to comply with the requirements of this paragraph.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(d) <T3>Report on compliance with categorical pretreatment standard deadline.</T3>Within 90 days following the date for final compliance with applicablecategorical Pretreatment Standards or in the case of a New Source followingcommencement of the introduction of wastewater into the POTW, any IndustrialUser subject to Pretreatment Standards and Requirements shall submit tothe Control Authority a report containing the information described inparagraphs (b) (4)-(6) of this section. For Industrial Users subject toequivalent mass or concentration limits established by the Control Authorityin accordance with the procedures in andSection; 403.6(c), this report shallcontain a reasonable measure of the User's long term production rate. Forall other Industrial Users subject to categorical Pretreatment Standardsexpressed in terms of allowable pollutant discharge per unit of production(or other measure of operation), this report shall include the User's actualproduction during the appropriate sampling period.(e) * * * (3) For Industrial Users subject to equivalent mass or concentration limitsestablished by the Control Authority in accordance with the proceduresin andSection; 403.6(c), the report required by paragraph (e)(1) shall containa reasonable measure of the User's long term production rate. For all otherIndustrial Users subject to categorical Pretreatment Standards expressedonly in terms of allowable pollutant discharge per unit of production (orother measure of operation), the report required by paragraph (e)(1) shallinclude the User's actual average production rate for the reporting period.(f) <T3>Notice of potential problems, including slug loading.</T3> All categoricaland non-categorical Industrial Users shall notify the POTW immediatelyof all discharges that could cause problems to the POTW, including anyslug loadings, as defined by andSection; 403.5(b), by the Industrial User.(g) <T3>Monitoring and analysis to demonstrate continued compliance.</T3> (1)The reports required in paragraphs (b), (d), and (e) of this section shallcontain the results of sampling and analaysis of the Discharge, includingthe flow and the nature and concentration, or production and mass whererequested by the Control Authority, of pollutants contained therein whichare limited by the applicable Pretreatment Standards. This sampling andanalysis may be performed by the Control Authority in lieu of the IndustrialUser. Where the POTW performs the required sampling and analysis in lieuof the Industrial User, the User will not be required to submit the compliancecertification required under andSection;andSection; 403.12(b) (6) and 403.12(d).In addition, where the POTW itself collects all the information requiredfor the report, including flow data, the Industrial User will not be requiredto submit the report.(2) If sampling performed by an Industrial User indicates a violation,the user shall notify the Control Authority within 24 hours of becomingaware of the violation. The User shall also repeat the sampling and analysisand submit the results of the repeat analysis to the Control Authoritywithin 30 days after becoming aware of the violation, except the IndustrialUser is not required to resample if: (i) The Control Authority performs sampling at the Industrial User at afrequency of at least once per month, or (ii) The Control Authority performs sampling at the User between the timewhen the User performs its initial sampling and the time when the Userreceives the results of this sampling. (3) The reports required in paragraph (e) of this section shall be basedupon data obtained through appropriate sampling and analysis performedduring the period covered by the report, which data is representative ofconditions occurring during the reporting period. The Control Authorityshall require that frequency of monitoring necessary to assess and assurecompliance by Industrial Users with applicable Pretreatment Standards andRequirements. (4) All analyses shall be performed in accordance with procedures establishedby the Administrator pursuant to section 304(h) of the Act and containedin 40 CFR Part 136 and amendments thereto or with any other test proceduresapproved by the Administrator. (<T3>See, </T3>andSection;andSection;136.4 and 136.5.) Sampling shall be performedin accordance with the techniques approved by the Administrator. Where40 CFR Part 136 does not include sampling or analytical techniques forthe pollutants in question, or where the Administrator determines thatthe Part 136 sampling and analytical techniques are inappropriate for thepollutant in question, sampling and analyses shall be performed using validatedanalytical methods or any other sampling and analytical procedures, includingprocedures suggested by the POTW or other parties, approved by the Administrator.(5) If an Industrial User subject to the reporting requirement in paragraph(e) of this section monitors any pollutant more frequently than requiredby the Control Authority, using the procedures prescribed in paragraph(g)(4) of this section, the results of this monitoring shall be includedin the report. (h) <T3>Reporting requirements for Industrial Users not subject to categoricalPretreatment Standards. </T3>The Control Authority shall require appropriatereporting from those Industrial Users with discharges that are not subjectto categorical Pretreatment Standards. (i) <T3>Annual POTW reports. </T3>POTWs with approved Pretreatment Programsshall provide the Approval Authority with a report that briefly describesthe POTW's program activities, including activities of all participatingagencies, if more than one jurisdiction is involved in the local program.The report required by this section shall be submitted no later than oneyear after approval of the POTW's Pretreatment Program, and at least annuallythereafter, and shall include, at a minimum, the following: (1) An updated list of the POTW's Industrial Users, including their namesand addresses, or a list of deletions and additions keyed to a previouslysubmitted list. The POTW shall provide a brief explanation of each deletion.This list shall identify which Industrial Users are subject to categoricalpretreatment Standards and specify which Standards are applicable to eachIndustrial User. The list shall indicate which Industrial Users are subjectto local standards that are more stringent than the categorical PretreatmentStandards. The POTW shall also list the Industrial Users that are subjectonly to local Requirements. (2) A summary of the status of Industrial User compliance over the reportingperiod; (3) A summary of compliance and enforcement activities (including inspections)conducted by the POTW during the reporting period; and (4) Any other relevant information requested by the Approval Authority.(j) <T3>Notification of changed discharge. </T3>All Industrial Users shallpromptly notify the POTW in advance of any substantial change in the volumeor character of pollutants in their discharge. <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(l) <T3>Signatory requirements for industrial user reports. </T3>The reportsrequired by paragraphs (b), (d), and (e) of this section shall includethe certification statement as set forth in andSection;403.6(a)(2)(ii), andshall be signed as follows: (1) By a responsible corporate officer, if the Industrial User submittingthe reports required by paragraphs (b), (d) and (e) of this section isa corporation. For the purpose of this paragraph, a responsible corporateofficer means (i) a president, secretary, treasurer, or vice-presidentof the corporation in charge of a principal business function, or any otherperson who performs similar policy- or decision-making functions for thecorporation, or (ii) the manager of one or more manufacturing, production,or operation facilities employing more than 250 persons or having grossannual sales or expenditures exceeding $25 million (in second-quarter 1980dollars), if authority to sign documents has been assigned or delegatedto the manager in accordance with corporate procedures. (2) By a general partner or proprietor if the Industrial User submittingthe reports required by paragraphs (b), (d) and (e) of this section isa partnership or sole proprietorship respectively. (3) By a duly authorized representative of the individual designated inparagraph (l)(1) or (l)(2) of this section if:(i) The authorization is made in writing by the individual described inparagraph (l)(1) or (l)(2);(ii) The authorization specifies either an individual or a position havingresponsibility for the overall operation of the facility from which theIndustrial Discharge originates, such as the position of plant manager,operator of a well, or well field superintendent, or a position of equivalentresponsibility, or having overall responsibility for environmental mattersfor the company; and (iii) the written authorization is submitted to the Control Authority.(4) If an authorization under paragraph (l)(3) of this section is no longeraccurate because a different individual or position has responsibilityfor the overall operation of the facility, or overall responsibility forenvironmental matters for the company, a new authorization satisfying therequirements of paragraph (l)(3) of this section must be submitted to theControl Authority prior to or together with any reports to be signed byan authorized representative.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(n) <T3>Provisions governing fraud and false statements. </T3>The reports requiredby paragraphs (b), (d), (e), (h), (i), and (k) of this section are subjectto the provisions of 18 U.S.C. 1001 relating to fraud and false statementsand the provisions of section 309(c)(2) of the Act governing false statements,representations or certifications in reports required under the Act. (o) * * *(3) Any POTW to which reports are submitted by an Industrial User pursuantto paragraphs (b), (d), (e), and (h) of this section shall retain suchreports for a minimum of 3 years and shall make such reports availablefor inspection and copying by the Director and the Regional Administrator.This period of retention shall be extended during the course of any unresolvedlitigation regarding the discharge of pollutants by the Industrial Useror the operation of the POTW Pretreatment Program or when requested bythe Director or the Regional Administrator.9. Section 403.15 is revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;403.15 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Net/Gross calculation.</ITAG>Categorical Pretreatment Standards may be adjusted to reflect the presenceof pollutants in the Industrial User's intake water in accordance withthis section.(a) <T3>Application. </T3>Any Industrial User wishing to obtain credit forintake pollutants must make application to the Control Authority. Uponrequest of the Industrial User, the applicable Standard will be calculatedon a ``net'' basis (i.e., adjusted to reflect credit for pollutants inthe intake water) if the requirements of paragraphs (b) and (c) of thissection are met.(b) <T3>Criteria. </T3>(1) The Industrial User must demonstrate that the controlsystem it proposes or uses to meet applicable categorical PretreatmentStandards would, if properly installed and operated, meet the Standardsin the absence of pollutants in the intake waters.(2) Credit for generic pollutants such as biochemical oxygen demand (BOD),total suspended solids (TSS), and oil and grease should not be grantedunless the Industrial User demonstrates that the constituents of the genericmeasure in the User's effluent are substantially similar to the constituentsof the generic measure in the intake water or unless appropirate additionallimits are placed on process water pollutants either at the outfall orelsewhere.(3) Credit shall be granted only to the extent necessary to meet the applicablecategorical Pretreatment Standard(s), up to a maximum value equal to theinfluent value. Additional monitoring may be necessary to determine eligibilityfor credits and compliance with Standard(s) adjusted under this section.(4) Credit shall be granted only if the User demonstrates that the intakewater is drawn from the same body of water as that into which the POTWdischarges. The Control Authority may waive this requirement if it findsthat no environmental degradation will result.(c) The applicable categorical pretreatment standards contained in 40 CFRSubchapter N specifically provide that they shall be applied on a net basis.10. Section 403.16 is amended by revising paragraph (c)(1) to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;403.16 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Upset provision.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(c) * * *(1) An Upset occurred and the Industrial User can identify the cause(s)of the Upset;<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>11. Part 403 of Title 40 of the Code of Federal Regulations is amendedby adding a new andSection; 403.17 to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 403.17 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Bypass.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Definitions. </T3> (1) ``Bypass'' means the intentional diversion ofwastestreams from any portion of an Industrial User's treatment facility.(2) ``Severe property damage'' means substantial physical damage to property,damage to the treatment facilities which causes them to become inoperable,or substantial and permanent loss of natural resources which can reasonablybe expected to occur in the absence of a bypass. Severe property damagedoes not mean economic loss caused by delays in production.(b) <T3>Bypass not violating applicable Pretreatment Standards or Requirements.</T3> An Industrial User may allow any bypass to occur which does not causePretreatment Standards or Requirements to be violated, but only if it alsois for essential maintenance to assure efficient operation. These bypassesare not subject to the provision of paragraphs (c) and (d) of this section.(c) <T3>Notice. </T3> (1) If an Industrial User knows in advance of the needfor a bypass, it shall submit prior notice to the Control Authority, ifpossible at least ten days before the date of the bypass.(2) An Industrial User shall submit oral notice of an unanticipated bypassthat exceeds applicable Pretreatment Standards to the Control Authoritywithin 24 hours from the time the Industrial User becomes aware of thebypass. A written submission shall also be provided within 5 days of thetime the Industrial User becomes aware of the bypass. The written submissionshall contain a description of the bypass and its cause; the duration ofthe bypass, including exact dates and times, and, if the bypass has notbeen corrected, the anticipated time it is expected to continue; and stepstaken or planned to reduce, eliminate, and prevent reoccurrence of thebypass. The Control Authority may waive the written report on a case-by-casebasis if the oral report has been received within 24 hours.(d) <T3>Prohibition of bypass. </T3> (1) Bypass is prohibited, and the ControlAuthority may take enforcement action against an Industrial User for abypass, unless;(i) Bypass was unavoidable to prevent loss of life, personal injury, orsevere property damage;(ii) There were no feasible alternatives to the bypass, such as the useof auxiliary treatment facilities, retention of untreated wastes, or maintenanceduring normal periods of equipment downtime. This condition is not satisfiedif adequate back-up equipment should have been installed in the exerciseof reasonable engineering judgment to prevent a bypass which occurred duringnormal periods of equipment downtime or preventative maintenance; and(iii) The Industrial User submitted notices as required under paragraph(c) of this section.(2) The Control Authority may approve an anticipated bypass, after consideringits adverse effects, if the Control Authority determines that it will meetthe three conditions listed in paragraph (d)(1) of this section.12. Part 403 of Title 40 of the Code of Federal Regulations is amendedby adding a new andSection; 403.18 to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 403.18 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Modification of POTW Pretreatment Programs.</ITAG>(a) <T3>General. </T3> Either the Approval Authority or a POTW with an approvedPOTW Pretreatment Program may initiate program modification at any timeto reflect changing conditions at the POTW. Program modification is necessarywhenever there is a significant change in the operation of a POTW PretreatmentProgram that differs from the information in the POTW's Submission, asapproved under andSection; 403.11.(b) <T3>Procedures. </T3> POTW Pretreatment Program modifications shall beaccomplished as follows:(1) For substantial modifications, as defined in paragraph (c) of thissection:(i) The POTW shall submit to the Approval Authority a statement of thebasis for the desired modification, a modified program description (<T3>see, </T3> andSection; 403.9(b)), or such other documents the ApprovalAuthority determines to be necessary under the circumstances.(ii) The Approval Authority shall approve or disapprove the modificationbased on the requirements of andSection; 403.8(f), following the proceduresin andSection; 403.11(b)-(f).(iii) The modification shall be incorporated into the POTW's NPDES permitafter approval. The permit will be modified to incorporate the approvedmodification in accordance with 40 CFR 122.63(g).(iv) The modification shall become effective upon approval by the ApprovalAuthority. Notice of approval shall be published in the same newspaperas the notice of the original request for approval of the modificationunder andSection; 403.11(b)(1)(i)(B).(2) The POTW shall notify the Approval Authority of any other (i.e., non-substantial)modifications to its Pretreatment Program at least 30 days prior to whenthey are to be implemented by the POTW, in a statement similar to thatprovided for in paragraph (b)(1)(i) of this section. Such non-substantialprogram modifications shall be deemed to be approved by the Approval Authority,unless the Approval Authority determines that a modification submittedis in fact a substantial modification, 90 days after the submission ofthe POTW's statement. Following such ``approval'' by the Approval Authority,such modifications shall be incorporated into the POTW's permit in accordancewith 40 CFR 122.63(g). If the Approval Authority determines that a modificationreported by a POTW in its statement is in fact a substantial modification,the Approval Authority shall notify the POTW and initiate the proceduresin paragraph (b)(1) of this section.(c) <T3>Substantial modifications. </T3> (1) The following are substantialmodifications for purposes of this section:(i) Changes to the POTW's legal authorities;(ii) Changes to local limits, which result in less stringent local limits;(iii) Changes to the POTW's control mechanism, as described in andSection;403.8(f)(1)(iii);(iv) Changes to the POTW's method for implementing categorical PretreatmentStandards (e.g., incorporation by reference, separate promulgation, etc.);(v) A decrease in the frequency of self-monitoring or reporting requiredof industrial users;(vi) A decrease in the frequency of industrial user inspections or samplingby the POTW;(vii) Changes to the POTW's confidentiality procedures;(viii) Significant reductions in the POTW's Pretreatment Program resources(including personnel commitments, equipment, and funding levels); and(ix) Changes in the POTW's sludge disposal and management practices.(2) The Approval Authority may designate other specific modifications,in addition to those listed in paragraph (c)(1) of this section, as substantialmodifications.(3) A modification that is not included in paragraph (c)(1) of this sectionis nonetheless a substantial modification for purposes of this sectionif the modification:(i) Would have a significant impact on the operation of the POTW's PretreatmentProgram;(ii) Would result in an increase in pollutant loadings at the POTW; or(iii) Would result in less stringent requirements being imposed on IndustrialUsers of the POTW.<ITAG tagnum="56">PART 122_EPA ADMINISTERED PERMIT PROGRAMS: THE NATIONAL POLLUTANTDISCHARGE ELIMINATION SYSTEM</ITAG>13. The authority citation for Part 122 continues to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4> The Clean Water Act. 33 U.S.C. 1251 <T3>et seq.</T3> </ITAG>14. 40 CFR 122.63(g) is revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 122.63 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Minor modifications of permits.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(g) Incorporate conditions of a POTW pretreatment program that has beenapproved in accordance with the procedures in 40 CFR 403.11 (or a modificationthereto that has been approved in accordance with the procedures in 40CFR 403.18) as enforceable conditions of the POTW's permits.<ITAG tagnum="40">[FR Doc. 88-22907 Filed 10-14-88; 8:45 am]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 6560-50-M</ITAG></ITAG></ITAG></TEXT></DOC>